H. CIVIL AND POLITICAL RIGHTS 

10. Please provide an overview of legislation or case law relevant to the right to life. Also provide an overview of national legislation, case law and custom/practice relating to the death penalty. 
The right to life as a fundamental human right has been guaranteed with Article 10 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03), according to which: The human right to life is inviolable. This article stipulates unconditional protection of human life from all possible threats, and not only from intentional deprivation of life. The fundamental character of right to life has also been reiterated in Article 54 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, which stipulates the cases in which citizens’ freedoms and rights may be restricted, emphasising that such restriction shall not apply to the right to life.  The legal protection of life has been laid down in the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 04/02, 43/03 and 19/04), which provides for several incriminations whose object is the protection of human life. These criminal acts have been systematised in a separate Chapter under the title Crimes against Life and Body. The crimes in this chapter have been divided in several groups:    Criminal acts of life deprivation: murder (Article 123), murder with noble motives (Article 124), instant murder (Article 125), murder from negligence (Article 126), murder of a child at birth (Article 127), instigation to suicide and helping in suicide (Article 128);   Criminal acts related to deprivation of future life (embryo): unlawful interruption of a pregnancy (Article 129);   Criminal acts related to body injuries: body injury (Article 130) and a grave body injury (Article 131);   Criminal acts related to endangering: participation in a brawl (Article 132), threatening with a dangerous instrument during a brawl or a quarrel (Article 133) and exposure to danger (Article 133); and   Criminal acts related to deserting: deserting a feeble person (Article 135) and not giving help (Article 136).  Article 6 of the International Covenant for Civil and Political Rights and Article 2 of the European Convention on Human Rights prohibit the arbitrary deprivation of life. The protection from arbitrary deprivation of life and particularly the prevention of life deprivations resulting from the use of lethal force in the line of duty by police and security forces’ members has been laid down in the Macedonian legislation with legal provisions on the conditions of official use of firearms. In accordance with Article 35 of the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.19/95, 15/97, 38/02, 33/03 and 19/04), an authorised official person of the Ministry of the Interior shall use firearms, if by using other means of coercion he/she cannot: a) protect the life of citizens; b) reject direct life-threatening attack on himself/herself; c) reject attack on a facility or person secured; and d) prevent the escape of a person caught in the act of committing a crime for which the sentence of at least 5-years imprisonment is provided, as well as to prevent the escape of a person arrested or a person for whom an arrest warrant has been issued for committing such a crime.  Authorised officers who officially perform duties under direct command of their superior may use means of coercion or firearms only if ordered by him/her (Article 36). Before the use of coercion means or firearms, the authorised officer shall be obliged to warn, in a loud voice, the person for whom he/she shall use coercion means, i.e. firearms.  The grounds and justification for the use of force or firearms in each and every case is directly assessed by his/her superior. If the means of coercion or firearms are used within authorised limits and in compliance with the Law, the responsibility of the authorised official person who used them shall be excluded as well as the responsibility of the person in charge who ordered use of force and firearms, including the person who, upon the call of the Ministry or the authorised official person extended assistance in the execution of official activities. The manner of using firearms and coercion means are laid down in detail in the Guidelines on the Use of Force and Firearms, brought upon by the Minister of the Interior. Provisions on the use of firearms and coercion means are also stipulated in Article 185 of the Law on Execution of Sanctions (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 03/97, 23/99 and 74/04), according to which: A member of security forces during official duty shall use firearms only if he/she cannot act differently: ) in order to protect human life; b) in order to reject a direct life-threatening attack; c) in order to reject an attack on the facilities he/she guards; d) in order to prevent the escape of a convicted person from a penitentiary institution, and to prevent the escape of a convicted person while escorted in the event the convict has been convicted of a criminal act for which sentence of at least 15 years or more has been presribed. Firearms shall only be used upon the institution director’s order or upon an order of the official person in charge of the security service, and only if by use of other coercion means, he/she cannot execute the official duty. When using firearms, the member of security forces is obligated to be cautious and not endanger lives of other persons.  A report shall be created on the use of coercion means and firearms, and the Directorate for Execution of Sanctions shall be informed in writing on the justification of the use of coercion means. The legal protection of right to life is also secured by providing for a right of compensation of damages in case the death has been caused purposely or by negligence. This right shall be implemented in accordance with the rules of civil law, contained in the Law on Obligations (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 18/01, 04/02 and 05/03).  Capital punishment in the Republic of Macedonia has been abolished. Article 10, paragraph 2 of the 1991 Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia reads: The death penalty shall not be imposed on any grounds whatsoever in the Republic of Macedonia.  The Republic of Macedonia has ratified the Second Optional Protocol to the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights. In the beginning of 1997, the Republic of Macedonia also ratified the European Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms and the Protocol No. 6 on the abolition of the death penalty. In 2004, the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia passed a Law on Ratification of the Protocol No.13 to the European Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms, with regard to the abolition of death penalty in all circumstances. The Republic of Macedonia as one of the legal successors of the former SFRY acceded to the Convention on the Prevention and Punishment of the Crime of Genocide in 1993 (ratified by the former SFRY on 21.06.1950) and the Convention on the Non-Applicability of Statutory Limitations to War Crimes and Crimes Against Humanity (ratified by the former SFRY on 11.11.1970).  On the basis of statistical data in 2000, criminal acts against life and body comprise 11,1% of the total number of convicted persons. In 2001 and 2002, this number was 8,9% and in 2003 it was 9%. 
11. What strategies are in place to ensure the respect for fundamental rights? Please refer particularly to measures which relate to human dignity, the right to life, the right to integrity of the person, the prohibition of torture and inhuman or degrading treatment or punishment. 
According to provisions of the Constitution (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) and respective laws, the Republic of Macedonia has a comprehensive system of human rights protection. The development and promotion of human rights is one of the most important issues in international politics, through which the International Community determines its political stance toward a particular State. This is important as the human rights situation in the Republic of Macedonia is subject to continuous interest of the International Community. Hence, the adequate treatment of human rights issues on  national level has been a strategic goal of the Republic of Macedonia. Human rights issues, especially from the viewpoint of the International Law, are treated  by the Unit of Council of Europe and Human Rights within the Multilateral Sector at the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, through:    Monitoring of the political dimension of human rights through participation in international meetings and specialised bodies (committees, commissions) that tackle the human rights issues (most of all within Council of Europe, OSCE, UN, CEI and the Stability Pact);   Monitoring, analysis and cooperation with international monitoring on the human rights situation in the Republic of Macedonia;    Monitoring the development of International Law on Human Rights and active participation in the work of International Bodies that prepare the novelties in the area; producing analyses on the conformity of domestic legislation with relevant international documents;    Inter-ministerial coordination in producing Reports and other duties arising from International Human Rights Conventions  as well as preparing and presenting the defence;   Producing general information on the human rights situation in the Republic of Macedonia, as well as on particular human rights cases that provoke the interest of the International Community. As of 1997, a special Human Rights Unit within the Ministry of Justice has been operating. Its authorities are to: initiate proposals for signing and ratifying procedures of international legal instruments by analysing the legislation that needs to be changed with the ratification; participate in preparing the initial, regular and periodic Reports on the ratified international instruments within its competence; initiate the creation of studies and Reports as basis for proposing respective changes in the domestic legislation; and prepare Opinions on individual cases before International Bodies. In 1997 the Government has also founded a Unit of Gender Equality Promotion. This Department coordinates national, regional and international activities that aim to promote the gender equality.  At the same time, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia has adopted or is preparing several national programmes intended to promote and improve the state of human rights in several areas, among which the most important are:  1.  One segment of the Project for Technical Co-operation between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the UN High Commissioner of Human Rights is the foundation of a Human Rights National Committee as well as the preparation of a National Human Rights Action Plan. The project is to be realised in the near future. 2.  The Government also implements the part of the foregoing Project in the field of education, by incorporating human rights topics into curricula of elementary and secondary education and by providing training for teachers.  In that respect:   A Partnership Strategic Group has been established, comprising representatives of relevant Ministries, the civil society and International Organisations that are already implementing projects in human rights education intended for integration and harmonisation of all programmes into one.    On 29 and 30 January 2004, a National Consultation on Human Rights Education was held in Skopje. This consultation concluded the activities taken in the period of 2002-2004. The participants at the Consultation (representatives of governmental and non-governmental organisations, independent experts, representatives of international non-governmental organisations and direct participants into the education process) have agreed to apply certain changes in the legislation (mostly in the laws regulating primary and secondary education) and to institute a national body (a national committee for human rights education) that will draft the National Human Rights Education Action Plan. 
1.  In 2002 the Government of the Republic of Macedonia adopted a National Plan for Gender Equality pursuant to Constitutional provisions on equality of citizens regardless of gender and special protection of  maternity, children and juveniles; and pursuant to principles of the UN Charter, the Universal Declaration of Human Rights and other international human rights instruments and especially the Convention on the Elimination of all Forms of Discrimination Against Women (CEDAW), the Declaration on the Right to Development, the Beijing Declaration and the Platform for Action.   Chapter I covering Human Rights and Women determines the following strategic goals:   Securing the exercise of all human rights and fundamental freedoms to women and female children;   Creating protection mechanisms for these rights; and    Eliminating all forms of discrimination. Chapter II covering Women in Government and Decision-Making determines the following strategic goals:   Constructing a national mechanism for the purpose of overcoming gender inequality on all levels;   Securing equal access to women in politics and all structures of power and decision-making; and   Enhancing women's capabilities for quality participation in politics. Chapter III covering Women and the Economy determines the following strategic goals:   Long-term objectives and activities in macroeconomic policies that should stimulate the process of employment;   Short-term measures regarding the labour market. 
Chapter IV covering Women and Social Policy determines the following strategic goals: 
  Securing equal treatment of genders in employment, promotions and awards;   Raising the level of employment of the female population;   Special care for the rural women;   Care for the elderly;    Special care for the marginalised women;    Special care for female children; Chapter V related to Women and Health determines the following strategic goals:   Increasing women’s access to adequate and quality health, information and other services;   Strengthening prevention programmes that promote women’s health;   Undertaking gender-sensitive initiatives on sexually transmitted diseases, HIV/AIDS as well as problems in sexual and reproductive health;   Promoting researches and widely disseminating information regarding women's health;   Increasing funds and monitoring future activities regarding women's health; Chapter VI related to Women and Education determines the following priorities:   Eliminating illiteracy among women;   Incorporating as many children as possible in pre-school institutions;   Eliminating the drop-outs of female students in the final classes of elementary education;   Including more female children into the secondary education from rural areas, and especially from the Albanian and Roma communities;   Creating non-discriminatory education and training;   Continuous (lifetime) education and easier access of women to expert training and technologies;   Establishing gender studies. Chapter VII related to Violence Against Women determines the following priorities:   Determining the problem's dimensions and weight (diagnosis of the situation);   Undertaking prevention measures and eliminating the violence against women;   Determining the reasons for and consequences from the violence against women as well as the effects from the undertaken activities;   Fight against trafficking in women and prostitution and helping the victims of violence. 2.  The Government in February of 2003 has adopted The National Programme for Fight Against Trafficking in Human Beings, and it specifies the following activities:   Harmonisation of the national legislation with the Palermo Convention and the Protocol on Trafficking in Human Beings by introducing the crime of trafficking in persons in Article 418-a of the Criminal Code, as amended in 2002;    Development and implementation of methods for the prevention of trafficking in human beings through locating and reducing social factors that contribute to women and children becoming victims of trafficking in persons, and identifying the level of family violence and its economic and social impact on women and children;   Support and assistance to victims of trafficking in human beings in order to improve their chances for a safe and humane departure through the establishment of shelter centres offering the victims accommodation, mental, social and medical assistance, information on their rights as well as legal aid;   Providing the victims their right to return and reintegration into the states of origin through the signing of bilateral and multilateral agreements on cooperation and cooperating with non-governmental organisations;   International co-operation and coordination in law enforcement through the exchange of information so that perpetrators of criminal offences related to trafficking in human beings would be efficiently prosecuted;   Training of the operative workers in the Ministry of the Interior, the prosecution staff, customs officers, and social and health workers in order to strengthen the institutional capacities of the Republic of Macedonia;   Coordination of activities by establishing a single information database for detected cases of trafficking in persons, criminal charges or data on felons;   Raising awareness of the public about the fight against trafficking in human beings with an aim to prevent future cases of trafficking in persons by active media coverage and dissemination of information through videos and documentaries. For more details on The National Programme for Fight Against Trafficking in Human Beings  see 24_Annex_02The National Plan on the Fight against Trafficking in Children is currently being prepared.  3.  The National Youth Strategy of the Republic of Macedonia is a comprehensive policy document of the needs and the problems of the youth in Macedonia aged 15 to 30 and it relates to the implementation of the following strategic goals:    Social development through quality education system for the youth;  Economic development through employment of young people;   Participation of the youth into the society;   Quality of living, quality of health and prevention.   Development of local youth work. The process of drafting of the National Youth Strategy of the Republic of Macedonia was divided in two parts: preparatory and consultative process. The first part consisted of a “Basic Study on Youth Trends" determining the problem of the youngsters in the last ten years. The study was a basis for the creation of the strategy. In 2004 within the consultative process several fora and a large number of local debates were held, hence incorporating a large number of young people that had not been part of youth non-governmental sector programmes. In the course of consultations experiences of countries with highly developed models of dealing with youth issues have been used. 
The National Strategy envisages the following measures and activities for the realisation of its strategic goals:    Improvement of the legislation regarding activities and programmes of the Ministries of education, science, justice, culture, health, local self-government, finance and defence in order to:   Include a youth dimension into those programmes and activities;   Incorporate the youth and their organisations into the creation and implementation of these programmes.    Institutional development through the creation of mechanisms for the incorporation of youth organisations into the process of decision-making.  The National Youth Strategy was recently adopted by the Government. 4.  The National Action Plan for the Children in the Republic of Macedonia has envisaged the following:   To define Macedonia’s policy with regard to the children’s rights for the next ten years;   To establish standards providing protection and improvement of conditions for an equal access to the basic rights of every child, as a part of the child's correct development and part of human dignity.    To place children and their best interest on top of all priorities;   To encompass all children and to eliminate all forms of discrimination against children and their rights;   To reduce the differences among children; to pay equal attention to each child, especially to children coming from poor families or some ethnic communities, or children with special needs;   To reduce poverty, which has been the main obstacle in the acquisition of basic rights as, guaranteed by the Convention on the Rights of the Child. Poverty may be reduced by investing into children as envisaged by the Poverty Reduction Strategy - A Child's Eye View of the World and the Millennium Goals,    To provide access to education to every child, i.e. all male and female children should be entitled to compulsory, free of charge and proper-quality elementary education;   To create conditions for an equal access of children to secondary education;   To provide children with special needs with all necessary conditions and opportunities so that they may exercise their rights without being discriminated against;   To protect children against all forms of abuse and violence;   To provide all children with adequate standard of living necessary for normal growth and development;   To provide children with healthy environment and with healthy food and drinking water;   To provide every child with the highest possible level of health care and, above all, to provide them with protection against the HIV/AIDS and other infectious diseases;   To hear children's opinion on all issues that concern their rights and interests and to include them in decision-making on issues related to the protection of their rights. The National Action Plan unites all tasks and goals that the Republic of Macedonia needs to undertake in order to provide children, without exceptions, a full implementation of guaranteed rights based upon the principles of equality, accessibility, quality and efficiency. For the purpose of implementing the National Action Plan’s goals, the following guidelines and priorities are determined:   Full incorporation of the Convention on the Rights of the Child provisions that address the children's rights and interests as well as its implementation into policies and practices of all individuals, institutions and the state as a whole. This requires the adoption of new laws and amendments to existing ones.   Establishing respective mechanisms and modes of coordination of entities involved in the enforcement of the legal regulation;   Securing all possible sources of funds and setting priorities in allocation of budgetary funds for the exercise of children’s rights, with an emphasis on children living in poverty or in a difficult economic situation;   Education of the general public on children’s rights, and education of children on the concept of human rights and freedoms with an intention to train and prepare them to differentiate between rights and duties and to acquire skills in self-protection against various kinds of violations and abuses;   Incorporation of all children into the education process, especially children from rural areas and homeless children, with state support including measures of encouragement that would give the children incentives to attend education institutions;   Waiving health fees in health services, medicines, and orthopaedic instruments for all children aged 18 and below in order to secure the highest level of health care to every child;   Creating a strong legal system for juveniles by adopting a separate Law on Juvenile Justice and by amending other laws, in order to: protect children from risk groups; bring alternative instead of penal measures for delinquent children; and undertake measures on rehabilitation and re-socialisation of children that had broken the law;   Adopting respective legal solutions and change of practices with regard to protection of children from all forms of abuses, violence and exploitation;   Promotion of cooperation between government and other institutions with regard to the exercise of children’s rights, and in particular establishment of a special department in one of the Ministries that shall unite, coordinate and assist all relevant institutions and shall create a database of all aspects of children’s lives.  Promotion of co-operation between Government institutions and non-governmental organisations and a greater engagement of the non-governmental sector into matters under state competence.      The National Action Plan for the Children in the Republic of Macedonia shall be adopted during the first half of 2005. 
5.  The National Strategy for Levelling the Rights of the Persons with Disabilities in the Republic of Macedonia is a Government document adopted in 2001 consisting of thorough analyses and recommendations for adopting respective decisions on protection, education, rehabilitation, training and employment of the persons with disabilities. These recommendations in particular refer to:   Prevention, early detection, early diagnosis and treatment;   Pre-school education, primary education, secondary education and higher education for all persons with special needs and if possible;   Training and employment;  Family and social life;  Health care;  Social protection;  Rehabilitation;   Availability of services and accessories;   Securing incomes and social security;   Housing and providing conditions (in families, day care centres, small capacity dispensary services or apartments intended for small groups and persons with disabilities) for all persons with disabilities in need;  Recreation and sports;  Religion; and   Raising public awareness. 6.  The National Strategy on the Roma addresses the specific needs and problems of this ethnic community. The motive for creating such a document, dedicated exclusively to the Roma, has been determined by the necessity to put together a comprehensive and consistent policy identifying the crucial subjects and problems and offering a concrete Working Programme for the implementation of the declared policy.  In the beginning of October 2004, the Republic of Macedonia prepared the Draft-Strategy for the Roma, which was offered for public discussion. The Government on its session on 31.01.2005 adopted the Strategy. The priority areas encompassed by the Strategy are the following: housing, employment, education, health, social care, culture, media, the Roma women and their special needs, and political participation. General objectives of the National Strategy for the Roma in Macedonia are:   Realisation of a greater integration of the Roma into the mainstream of the Macedonian society;   Poverty reduction in the Roma as the most marginalised group;   Realisation of a long-term development of the Roma community in every aspect;   Securing the full participation of the Macedonian state into the implementation of the priority resolves of the Strategy;   Establishing normative and institutional prerequisites for the realisation of European Union standards.       In the past several years, the Republic of Macedonia has  initiated a critical review of the existing legal regulations in order to put a modern legal basis in place for the legislation and practice concerning police authorities. The Law Amending the Law on Criminal Procedure of September 2004 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 74/04) constitutes a serious legislative effort to define comprehensively the investigative police measures. Particular attention has been dedicated to the conduct with persons detained and apprehended in police station. They may only be apprehended in specially designed and equipped police stations; specially trained officers for reception shall be responsible for these persons, who shall not be involved in police investigation, but shall rather take care of the rights and interests of persons apprehended in police. Additional novelties have been incorporated in provisions stipulating efficient access to legal representative, notification of the family, medical examination, information on the rights, special detailed files and for other mechanisms aimed at prevention of abuses of suspects.  In order to reduce the occurrences of arbitrariness and discrimination, major changes are under preparation in the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.19/95, 15/97, 38/02, 33/03 and 19/04), Law on Communication Interception (in parliamentary procedure) and other laws in this  field, in terms of ensuring detailed regulation of police authorities. Changes in the national legislation and practice in the aforementioned sense is consistent implementation of the European standards incorporated in the various Council of Europe Recommendations, including the concrete Recommendations resulted from the visits of the Council of Europe’s Committee for Prevention of Torture. In 2004, the Code of Police Ethics (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 03/04) was adopted, which determines the mode of conduct, operation and goals of police; relations between the police and the judicial bodies; police interventions; responsibilities and control of police and other issues relevant for the enhancement of the democratic role of police in a legal state (for more details see 24_Annex_05). Besides the efforts at the normative level, significant measures have been undertaken for enhancement of the internal control within the Ministry of the Interior and for provision of training of police in the human rights sphere. Important segment in the overall strategy of the Ministry has been the preventive aspect. It has been implemented through additional and continuing education of the members of the Ministry in the protection and respect of human rights and freedoms. The training has been continuously carried out with the current police officers. It will also be part in the future education and police training at the Police Academy. An integral part of the education has been the instruction in the international and national instruments addressing human dignity, right to life, right to personal integrity, prohibition of torture and inhuman or degrading treatment or punishment. The Government of the Republic of Macedonia is actively co-operating with the European Committee Against Torture (CPT). The Committee has hitherto had three regular visits to the Republic of Macedonia in 1998, 2001 and 2002 and three extraordinary in 2001, 2002 and 2004. The Government of the Republic of Macedonia has requested publication of all Reports and Comments of the Committee, except for the report based on the Committee’s last visit in July 2004, which has been submitted to the Government at the end of November. The Government has thus demonstrated its strong commitment to address the issues identified by the CPT.   On 10.02.2003, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia reviewed and adopted the Information on the CPT's Report on Macedonia of July 2002 and the preliminary remarks on the visit in November 2002, in order to realise one of the key Recommendations of the Committee, which establishes that the national authorities must give a formal statement aimed at law enforcement officers saying that abuse of detainees is contrary to fundamental freedoms and rights, and shall not be tolerated. At the same time, several Conclusions have been adopted with regard to the improvement of the government’s co-operation with the CPT as well as the conclusion asserting that the harassment of detainees by law enforcement officers is contrary to the basic principles and values upon which the democratic society rests, that such phenomena shall not be tolerated and that the offenders shall be subjects to rigorous punishment determined by law.  The main Recommendations of the Committee refer to two key issues: managing impunity and protection measures against harassment.  The Ministry of the Interior and the Ministry of Justice have undertaken several activities in order to overcome the detected problems.  The European Partnership Action Programme, in the part related to human rights, has given emphasis on the implementation of the Recommendations contained in the Reports of the CPT’s visits to the Republic of Macedonia, and before all the Recommendations on managing impunity and protection measures against harassment. Another key activity is a continuous training in all institutions involved in the implementation of the foregoing convention.  The main activities with regard to the impunity are the following: submitting annual Reports to the Government on Detected Cases of Exceeding of Authorities; submitting Annual Reports to the Government on the Disciplinary and Criminal Procedures Undertaken; improvement of the co-operation with the public prosecutor’s office and the courts of law for the resolution of such cases; strengthening of the capacities of the Professional Standards Unit at the Ministry of the Interior for detection and investigation of irregularities; improvement of the procedures for detection and investigation of irregularities and their implementation.  The Implementation of the Convention, with regard to protection measures against harassment, envisages the following: improvement of procedures for arrest and detention in police stations and prisons; keeping records on cases of violated procedures during arrest and detention; undertaking measures for the resolution of such cases; full respect of persons deprived of freedom; and training of police officers to comply with legal rights of detainees during a 24 hour detention. 
12. Please provide information on specific national legislative as well as administrative measures designed to prevent the occurrence of torture, inhuman or degrading treatment or punishment in state institutions, prisons or police stations etc. In this respect, what measures are in place providing for the inspections of detention centres or police stations? Is legal redress foreseen for victims? 
The prohibition of torture and other cruel, inhuman or degrading treatment and punishment is provided in Article 11 of the Constitution (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03), according to which: The human right to physical and moral dignity is irrevocable. Any form of torture, or inhuman or degrading treatment or punishment is prohibited. Article 54, paragraph 4 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia rules out any restrictions to this right.  The Republic f Macedonia has signed and ratified the following international instruments: of the UN Convention Against Torture and Other Cruel, Inhuman or Degrading Treatment or Punishment (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 9/91); the European Convention for the Prevention of Torture and Inhuman or Degrading Treatment or Punishment – Council of Europe (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 23/97); and the Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedom – Council of Europe (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 11/97).  The Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 42/2002, 43/2003 and 19/2004) in Chapter 15 titled “Crimes against Freedoms and Rights of Individuals and Citizens” contains a new Article 142, which reads: An authorised official, a person induced by an official person, or a person who upon a consent by an official person, while performing his/her duty, applies force, threat or some other unacceptable means or in an unacceptable manner, with the intention of extorting a confession or some other statement from an accused, a witness, an expert or from some other person, or causes severe physical or mental pain in order to punish a person for a crime that he/she has perpetrated or been accused of, or with the intention to intimidate or force a person give up a right, or causes such pain due to any form of discrimination, shall be punished with imprisonment of one to five years.  When the injured party suffers serious body injuries or other sever consequences as a result of the foregoing crime, the perpetrator shall be punished with imprisonment from one to ten years. Apart from this crime, the Criminal Code contains the following incriminations: murder (Article 123); body injury (Article 130); severe body injury (Article 131); coercion (Article 139); abduction (Article 141); mistreatment in performing duty (Article 143); endangering security (Article 144); rape (Article 186); statutory rape of a helpless person (Article 187); sexual attack upon a child (Article 188); neglecting and mistreating a juvenile (Article 201); extortion (Article 258); blackmail (Article 259); mistreatment of a subordinate or younger person (Article 335); coercion against a judiciary employee (Article 375); and violence (Article 386), which all contain forms of torture or inhuman or degrading treatment. 
2001 2002 2003 CRIME STATISTICS rep Acc Con Rep Acc. No. Con Rep Acc Con Crimes against life and body 1. Murder (Article 123) 88  28 20  130 43  34 172 48 41 2. Body injury (Article 130) 7  573  276 8  496  261 557  322 3. Severe body injury (Article 131) 306  150  128  304  186  149 320 215  190 Crimes against freedoms and rights of individuals and citizens 1. Coercion (Article 139) 2. Abduction (Article 141) 26 14 30 2. Mistreatment in performing duty (Article 143) 27 28 35 4. Endangering security (Article 144) 5  82 41 35 95  41 58 82 47 Crimes against sexual freedom and sexual morality 1. Rape (Article 186) 47  25 19 49 29  23 38 20 15 2. Statutory rape of a helpless person  (Article 187) 3. Sexual attack upon a child (Article 188) 25  25 18 35 26  26 32 23 20 4. Neglecting and mistreating a juvenile (Article 201) 46  16 13 26 26  21 30 32 26 Crimes against property 1. Extortion (Article 258) 30  12 25 16  11 25 13 2. Blackmail (Article 259) 
Crimes against Armed Forces 1. Mistreating a subordinate or younger person (Article 335) - -  - 
Crimes against official duty 1. Coercion against a judiciary employee (Article 375) - -  - 
Crimes against legal traffic 1. Violence (Article 386) 122  54 51  230 90  82 203 79 75 Source: State Statistical Office Article 15 of the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) determines unconditional exclusion of all illegally obtained evidence, prescribing that evidence collected in an illegal mode by a violation of freedoms and rights as determined by the Constitution, laws and ratified international treaties, as well as evidence arising thereafter, may not be used in court. The Law on Criminal Procedure also determines the modes of interrogation of the accused; prescribing that in the course of interrogation his/her personality must be fully respected. At the same time the Law prohibits the use of force, threats or similar means used to obtain his/her confession. Article 251, Paragraph 2 explicitly prohibits the use of medical interventions and means against the accused or the witness that would influence their will upon giving statements. If these prohibitions are violated, the statement of the accused or the witness may not be subject to court decision i.e. it is an essential violation of the provisions of the criminal procedure against which an appeal may be filed. Article 195, paragraphs 3 and 4 of the Law on Criminal Procedure prescribes that representatives of the European Committee for the Prevention of Torture and Inhuman or Degrading Treatment or Punishment of the Council of Europe (CPT) have a right to visit detainees and communicate with them without surveillance and upon an approval of the investigative judge, who is obliged to issue such approval. According to paragraph 5 of the same Article, Red Cross representatives are entitled to visit detainees and communicate with them without surveillance and upon the judge’s approval. Article 20, Paragraph 1, Subparagraph 5 of the Law on the Public Prosecutor’s Office (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/04) determines that the public prosecutor is obliged to observe the consistent implementation of judgements passed for punishable acts and the protection of persons who have been detained. At the same time, Article 39 of the Law on Movement and Residence of Aliens (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/92, 26/93 and 45/02) - regulating the modes of enforcement security measures of expelling an alien, determines that an alien may not be forcibly expelled from the Republic of Macedonia into another country if such expulsion would result in torture or inhuman treatment. The prohibition of torture or inhuman or degrading treatment or punishment has an absolute character and therefore the violation of this prohibition may not be justified by an execution of a superior’s order. In that respect Article 6 of the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/2002, 33/2003 and 19/2004) prescribes that an employee of the Ministry of the Interior is obliged to execute the orders of the Minister or of a person delegated by the Minister related to execution of the Ministry’s operations, unless such execution of orders is a criminal offence. The Rulebook on Modes of Executing the Duty of a Guard in Prisons contains the same provision. Pursuant to the Law on Defence (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 42/01 and 05/03) the orders of a superior warrant officer shall not be executed if their execution is a criminal offence.  The Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 37/96, 80/99, 04/02, 43/03 and 19/04) prescribes that a subordinate shall not be punished for a criminal act if it has been perpetrated upon the superior’s order in the line of duty, unless the order has been aimed at perpetrating a war crime or any other severe crime or if the subordinate had been aware that the execution would lead to a criminal offence. The legislation of the Republic of Macedonia explicitly determines the conditions under which the police and security services may apply coercion methods. Pursuant to Article 34 of the Law on Internal Affairs, the authorised official person may use coercion methods for the purpose of: restoring law and order after a large-scale disorder; b) overpowering a person disturbing the public peace and order or a person upon arrest; c) rejecting an attack from another person or a defending a guarded facility; d) forcible removal of persons from a certain place, or a person not obeying orders of an official person. Authorised official persons carrying out official duties under direct supervision of a superior may use coercion means only upon the superior’s order. If the means of coercion or firearms are used within authorised limits, the responsibility of the authorised official person who used them shall be excluded as well as the responsibility of the person in charge who ordered such use.  Any case of use of firearms by an authorised officer shall be investigated and assessed by the Sector of Internal Control and Professional Standards. The manner of using firearms and coercion means by police officers has been regulated by an Instruction adopted by the Minister of the Interior. Pursuant to Article 65 of the Law on Internal Affairs, acting in violation of rules and regulations of the Ministry or performing activities that are criminal offences (crimes against freedoms and rights of individuals and citizens, severe crimes against life and body), is a violation of the working discipline, which in accordance with the Law on Internal Affairs is an obstacle to employment in the Ministry. In the event of a more severe violation of the working discipline, the employee may be temporarily removed from the office, and he/she may be dismissed. Severer cases of working discipline violation due to which the employee has been removed from office, the dismissal period and cases when such right is not exercised are regulated by an act of the Minister.  The Law on Execution of Sanctions (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 3/97, 23/99, 74/04) in Article 184 paragraph 1 and Article 185 determines the limits to using force. The conditions under which a convicted person may be subject to coercion means are: when it is necessary to prevent his/her escape from prison or during arrest, in case of physical attacks, inflicting injury, self-injuring, inflicting material damages, or when overpowering convicted persons upon the order of an official person. The Law also defines the means of coercion: separation from a crowd, handcuffing, use of truncheons, water cannons and chemical substances. Article 19, paragraph 4 explicitly forbids collective punishment of convicted persons as well as use of coercion means as punishment.  The mode of using force and firearms are laid down in detail in the Guidelines on the Use of Firearms and Means of Coercion. A Report shall be created on the use of coercion means stating the reasons for such use. The Report is submitted to the Ministry of Justice - Directorate of Execution of Sanctions authorised to assess the justification of the use of force. If the means of coercion are used pursuant to the Law, the responsibility of the authorised official who used them or ordered such use is excluded. However, if it is determined that in the course of the use of coercion means authorities have been exceeded, the official shall be subject to a disciplinary measure. With regard to the disciplinary responsibility of the members of security service and the prison personnel, in general, the Law on the Execution of Sanctions (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 03/97, 23/99 and 74/04) points to the general labour regulations, i.e. Law on Labour Relations (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 80/93, 3/94, 14/95, 53/97, 59/97, 21/98, 25/00, 34/00, 50,01, 25/03 40/03 and 80/03-consolidated text) and Law on Organisation and Operation of State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02). These Laws stipulate disciplinary responsibility of an employee for violation of working duties or other violations of working discipline, when these have been his/her fault, and in particular when he/she has performed the duties in a negligent manner, if he/she has not abided by laws and other regulations and rules of conduct during working hours or in relation with his/her work. Heads of diplomatic and consular missions may visit foreign citizens that have been detained following an approval of the investigative judge in the Republic of Macedonia. These visits may not be supervised. The treatment of persons serving a sentence has been regulated by the Law on Execution of Sanctions, which contains an explicit provision in Article 12, Paragraph 2 prohibiting torture, inhuman or degrading treatment or punishment of prisoners. The principle of humaneness in execution of criminal sanctions has been stipulated in several provisions of the law. Special provisions have regulated the disciplinary punishment of convicted persons in the Law on Execution of Sanctions prescribing the types of disciplinary punishments, conditions on applying such punishments and modes of execution. The convicted person who seriously endangers the security of the institution or endangers the security of other persons may be subject to solitary confinement if other disciplinary measures have proved unsuccessful. The Director of the Directorate orders the placing in solitary confinement for Execution of Sanctions. The convicted person may appeal against this decision to the Minister of Justice within three days. The appeal does not postpone the execution of the decision. The procedure on deciding upon the appeal is urgent. The Law on Execution of Sanctions contains special provisions that regulate the conduct of authorised officials toward convicted persons. Article 159 determines that officials persons in the line of duty must treat convicted persons with respect, tolerance, seriousness and with a necessary firmness and equity in order to encourage their self-esteem and a sense of personal responsibility. Official persons must carry out their duties honourably and impartially, in good faith, regardless of position, gender, race, ethnicity, religious confession or political convictions of the convicted persons. In addition, the Law on Execution of Sanctions contains special provisions pertaining to the protection of rights of prisoners by the use of legal remedies. Article 163 stipulates that they are entitled to file complaints and other submissions to protect their rights related to their position and treatment in the institution and are entitled to discretion rights.  Information and training of police officers with regard to prohibition of torture is part of their education and training system. The Program has been prepared in the context of the legislation in force in the Republic of Macedonia and is implemented at all levels of police education in order to stimulate the development of civilised, well-mannered and humane relations between the police and citizens. The Police Academy puts special emphasis in their curricula on the humane aspects of treating citizens, and respecting their dignity.  With regard to training of institutional personnel, it is important to note that the Ministry of Justice and the Directorate for Execution of Sanctions regularly organise courses and seminars for the purpose of a successful, efficient and lawful execution of the operations at confinement institutions. The Ministry of Justice carries out this activity in cooperation with the Association of Penology of the Republic of Macedonia. In addition, in cooperation with the OSCE, a pilot project has been created for the establishment of a training centre as an organised form of training and education of employees in confinement institutions, using expert knowledge and experiences of foreign experts in the  field.  Given that a medical treatment may also endanger the individual's physical integrity, Article 50 of the Law on Healthcare stipulates: surgical and other interventions may only be undertaken with a prior consent of the ill person, or the parent or the custodian if he/she is a juvenile or disabled.  If in the course or after the treatment permanent consequences occur (disability), the patient or his/her family have a right to request inquiry regarding the health care he/she has received. In accordance with Article 55 of the Law, the beneficiary of healthcare has a right to request compensations to damages pursuant to regulations on obligations if they have been inflicted due to errors or inadequate treatment. The State Sanitary and Health Inspectorate carries out inspection supervision in mental health institutions. The inspectors are professional doctors bound by both medical deontology and the Code of Civil Servants.  The Law on Healthcare offers possibilities not only for legal remedies but also for expert supervision of the work of professional healthcare workers. The Strategy on Promotion of Mental Health and the Law on Mental Health are expected to improve the protection and exercise of rights in this field. The Criminal Code criminalises the unconscientious treatment of ill persons. In addition, the Code criminalises the deeds not providing medical assistance; and quackery. An important novelty is Article 20 of the Law on Execution of Sanctions determining that the prisoners may not be subject to medical or other experiments that degrade their physical, mental and moral integrity and that the convicted persons' consent to participate does not exclude the responsibility of the person who had approved the experiments. The Law on Criminal Procedure in Article 251 stipulates that a person may be subject to physical examination without his/her consent if such examination is necessary for the establishment of facts important for the criminal procedure. Physical examination of other persons may be performed without their consent only if it has to be determined whether certain marks or consequences of a criminal act can be found on their bodies. Medical interventions or use of means to influence the will of accused persons or witnesses upon giving statements are prohibited.  The Law on Scientific and Research Activities (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia, Nos. 13/96 and 29/02) stipulates the principle of inviolability of human integrity, the protection of personality and human dignity and the principle of ethics as main principles in the execution of scientific researches. The Code of Medical Deontology (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 24/95) adopted by the Chamber of Medical Doctors of Macedonia contains detailed provisions on bio-medical researches.  The conditions on taking, exchanging, transporting and transplanting parts of human body for the purpose of medical treatment have been regulated by a special Law. The unauthorised transplantation of parts of the human body is a crime pursuant to Article 210 of the Criminal Code. Victims of torture and other forms of inhuman or degrading treatment or punishment may exercise their rights pursuant to Article 50 of the Constitution according to which every citizen may invoke the protection of freedoms and rights set forth in the Constitution, before the courts of law in a procedure based upon principles of priority and urgency.  In cases when torture and other forms of inhuman treatment have elements of a criminal offence, victims of crimes may file criminal charges to the public prosecutor, while acts subject to private lawsuit may be filed to the court of law. In cases of criminal acts subject to prosecution ex officio, if the public prosecutor drops the charges, the victim has a right to take over the prosecution as a subsidiary prosecutor. If as a result of a criminal act the person has been damaged, he/she has a right to file a damages claim, and if he/she is referred to a lawsuit the case shall be resolved in a civil suit in accordance with general provisions on indemnity.  In cases of torture or other forms of inhuman or degrading treatment or punishment by authorised official, the protection may be sought from the Ombudsman, Articles 24, 31, 32 from the Law on the Ombudsman (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 60/03), who in accordance with the Constitution protects the freedoms and rights of citizens when they are violated by an act or activity of state administrative bodies or bodies and organisations with public mandates. If the Ombudsman detects violation, he/she may propose an initiation of a disciplinary measure against the official, or may file a request to the public prosecutor on initiation of criminal proceedings against that person. 
13. Is there any independent body which oversees the conditions in such institutions? Give details on disciplinary and criminal sanctions for State agents accused of ill treatment or torture during the exercise of their duties. 
Pursuant to the Law on the Ombudsman (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No 60/03), the Ombudsman is an independent and autonomous body authorised to monitor the respect and protection of constitutional and legal rights of persons in institutions and organisations where their freedom of movement has been restricted. This especially refers to apprehended, detained and imprisoned persons serving a sentence or a correctional measure in penitentiary or correctional institution (Articles 31, paragraphs 1 and 2).  The Ombudsman may carry out visits and inspections anytime without prior announcement or approval; he/she may talk to persons placed in these institutions or organisations without the presence of official persons; and he/she may receive submissions from persons deprived of liberty in a closed envelope and send them answers that may not be inspected by official persons (Article 31, paragraphs 3 and 4). In practice, the Ombudsman has not been facing obstacles in carrying out such authorities. In accordance with its own Working Programme and legal authorities, the Ombudsman has visited such organisations or institutions at least once a year, for which he/she submits an annual report to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia. In addition, pursuant to Article 195, paragraph 3 and 4, the Law Amending the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 74/04), detained persons may be visited by members of the European Committee for the Prevention of Torture and Inhuman or Degrading Treatment or Punishment (CPT) as well as members of the International Committee of the Red Cross. Upon the CPT’s request, the investigative judge is obliged to approve them a visit and communication with detained persons. These visits may not be supervised. Foreign citizens that have been detained following an approval of the investigative judge may be visited by heads of diplomatic and consular missions in the Republic of Macedonia. Concerning the issue on whether disciplinary and penal measures have been undertaken for misconduct or torture by official persons to persons confined in organisations or institutions, from 01.01.2002 to 30.09.2004, the Ombudsman filed 4 criminal charges against officials from the Ministry of the Interior and one proposal for initiation of disciplinary measures. Namely, performing his/her duties in the protection of human rights, and implementing his/her legal authorities pursuant to Article 32 of the Law, the Ombudsman has filed a proposal on initiation of proceedings against one official of the Ministry of the Interior for determining his/her disciplinary responsibility due to exceeding the limit of authorisation. The Ombudsman has been notified that charges have been pressed to the competent public prosecutor against this individual. At the same time the Ombudsman has filed three indictments against nine officials of the Ministry of the Interior due to a reasonable doubt that they had committed crimes of torture pursuant to Article 142, violence pursuant to Article 386 and abuse of official duty pursuant to Article 143 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 04/02, 43/03 and 19/04). One person has been found guilty by the Basic Court II in Skopje; two persons are under investigation before the Basic Court II in Skopje; five are in criminal proceedings before the Basic Court in Kumanovo; and a pre-trial procedure against one person has been conducted by the Basic Public Prosecutor of Prilep. The Directorate for Execution of Sanctions, according to data received from penitentiary institutions in the Republic of Macedonia and from the Educational and Correctional Institute in Tetovo, has not reported disciplinary measures in the course of 2001, 2002, and 2003 against employees for abuse of powers pertaining to inhuman treatment or torture of convicted or detained persons. An exception is the disciplinary measure currently underway against three employees in the Penitentiary Institution-Idrizovo for determining their responsibility in their line of duty due to exceeding authorities for the use of truncheons. It is important to note that the reports hitherto published by the European Committee for the Prevention of Torture have not detected forms of physical abuses of detainees by the prison staff. 
14. In the fields of medicine and biology, do precise rules exist which indicate what is and what is not permitted? Are these rules subject to a permanent monitoring process, in particular with regard to the right to integrity of the person? 
Pursuant to Article 11, Paragraph 1 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03), human physical and moral integrity is irrevocable. Article 39 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia guarantees every citizen the right to health care.  Pursuant to the Law on Health Care (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 38/91, 46/93, 55/95, 17/97-consolidated text and 10/04) surgical and other medical interventions are undertaken only upon written consent of the hospitalised person, or his/her parent or custodian if he/she is a juvenile or has been deprived of civil capacity. If the sick person or his/her parent or custodian does not agree with the suggested surgical or other intervention, the competent physician is obliged to inform him/her about the consequences that might arise due to his/her refusal of medical or other intervention. In addition, the physician may request a written statement or may write an official note. Patients are obliged to adhere to internal rules of the health organisation and guidelines given by health workers. Otherwise, the health institution may refuse to provide health treatment, except in cases of emergency treatments, communicable disease subject to mandatory reporting, mental illness, or if the sick person is a juvenile. The Ministry of Health is authorised to supervise the professional conduct. Special rules exist in the  field of taking, exchange, transport and transplantation of human body parts for medicinal purposes, prescribed by the Law on Conditions for Taking, Exchange, Transport and Transplantation of Human Body Parts for Medicinal Purposes (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 30/95). The Law determines that individuals, while still living, and if adult and sane, may donate any parts of their body for medical purposes, if it does not seriously endanger their health. As an exception, bone marrow donors may also be juveniles, and their biological parents may only give the consent.  The transplantations of human body parts, pursuant to the Law may be carried out only by written consent of the recipient, after he/she has been informed about the potential risks to his/her health. If the recipient is a juvenile or a mentally ill person or is not in a condition to express his/her will due to his/her condition, written consent on transplantation is given by his parent or custodian. The written consent of the donor and the recipient is valid only if given voluntarily and after the nature and purpose of donating and transplantation, the involved risks and the success probability have been explicated. The Law also determines that no monetary or property compensations may be requested for the donation of organs, including services or any other benefits. The Law on Conditions for Taking, Exchange, Transfer and Transplantation of Parts of Human Body for Medical Treatment is in line with the Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Dignity of the Human Being with Regard to the Application of Biology and Medicine: Convention on Human Rights and Biomedicine of Oviedo, 04.04.1997, entered into force on 01.12.1999, that the Republic of Macedonia signed on 04.04.1997, although it still has not been ratified.  The Republic of Macedonia signed on 15.03.2002 (though still not ratified) also the Additional Protocol to the Convention on Human Rights and Biomedicine, on Transplantation of Organs and Tissues of Human Origin. This Protocol regulates in more detailed manner not only the medicinal, but also ethical and other aspects of transplantation of human organs. The Law on Conditions for Taking, Exchange, Transfer and Transplantation of Parts of Human Body for Medical Treatment complies with the principles of this Protocol (although the latter has been more recent than the Law and has not still entered into force), in particular in setting forth that the transplantation shall be done only for the purpose of medical treatment, in stipulating the mandatory consent of the donor and in prohibiting that transplantation yields financial gain. Solutions included in the Law are also in line with the Guiding Principles on Human Organ Transplantation (World Health Organisation, 1991), in particular Principles Nos. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 8 and 9.  The Ministry of Health performs control over the implementation of the Law. Legal protection from non-compliance with provisions of the Law Regarding Conditions on Taking, Exchange, Transport and Transplantation of Human Body Parts for Medicinal Purposes has been regulated by Article 210 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04), which stipulates that a person who takes a part from the body of another for the purpose of transplantation, or who transplants a part of the body even though the taking or the transplantation is contrary to the medical profession or science, shall be punished with imprisonment of three months to five years. The same punishment shall be applied to a person who, with the intention of transplantation, takes a part of the human body intended for transplantation before death has been determined in a prescribed manner. Simultaneously, the Criminal Code prescribes a fine or imprisonment of up to three years for a person who takes a part of the body of another or who transplants a part of the body, without consent from the donor or the recipient, or of their legal representative. The same punishment also applies to a person who contrary to the law, for compensation, sells or mediates in the giving of parts of the body of living or deceased persons for the purpose of transplantation. The prohibition of conducting medical or other experiments also applies to convicted persons. Namely, Article 20 of the Law on Execution of Sanctions (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 03/97, 23/99 and 74/04) prescribes that convicted persons are entitled to health care. Convicted persons may not be subject to medical or other experiments that degrade their physical, mental or moral integrity.  Regarding medicine, Article 64 of the Law on Drugs, Additional Medicines and Medical Instruments (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 21/98) determines that clinical drug testing may be conducted in accordance with ethical principles laid down in the Helsinki Declaration on the Protection of Patients’ Rights. Clinical testing may only be conducted by an authorised health institution that is obliged to acquire written consent of persons subject to drug testing prior to the testing and to obtain written proof that the persons had been informed about the purpose of the testing and the possible risks to their health. Drug inspectors that are authorised to halt a clinical testing of a drug in the event that the testing had begun prior to the fulfilment of the stipulated conditions carry out the control of implementation of the Law. Penal protection has been provided by misdemeanour provisions that prescribe a fine of 80.000-150.000 MKD to the legal entity, or 10.000-30.000 MKD to the responsible person in the legal entity performing clinical testing contrary to ethical principles. Same applies if he/she starts clinical testing of a drug without written consent of persons subject to testing. Apart from a fine, the responsible person in the legal entity shall be punished with a provisional ban on performing operations from three months to one year. In relation to the protection of personality and integrity, worth mentioning is that the Republic of Macedonia on 12.01.1998 signed  (though has not ratified yet) the Additional Protocol to the Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Dignity of the Human Being with regard to the Application of Biology and Medicine, on the Prohibition of Cloning Human Beings, of Paris, 12.01.1998, that entered into force on 01.03.2001. 
15. Has the Republic of Macedonia established specialised services specifically designed to combat trafficking in human beings? If so, what are the institutional context, the composition, the functions and the powers of these services? 
In 2002, the National Programme for Fight Against Trafficking in Human Beings and Illegal Migration in the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 10/2002) was adopted, providing for legislative and preventive actions; help and support for victims of trafficking in human beings; return and reintegration of victims; international cooperation and coordination in enforcing laws; staff education, coordination of actions and informative advertising influence on the public opinion on trafficking in human beings. It also determines the carriers of these activities. The carriers of activities are determined in accordance with the legally established competencies of the Law on Organization and Operation of State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02). In accordance with the National Programme and the competencies of state administrative bodies determined by law, most of the provided activities are within the jurisdiction of the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia, i.e. the organisation units in this Ministry authorised to fight against trafficking in human beings, smuggling of migrants and illegal migration (for more details see 24_E_2). A specialised Section for Trafficking in Human Beings and Other Violent Crime is established under the Sector for Violent Crime - responsible body for the prevention, detection, documenting and processing criminal offences in trafficking in human beings and illegal migration. The Sector is within the Ministry of the Interior’s Department for Organised Crime. This Section acts upon criminal offences in the field of trafficking in human beings, i.e. undertakes measures and actions to discover the perpetrators of such criminal activity. It also coordinates the work among the Sectors within Ministry of the Interior, which operate on local level. The authorised officers, within their duties, collect operative information upon which they undertake adequate legal actions against perpetrators of crimes, i.e. file criminal charges to the Basic Public Prosecutor, who will thereafter process the act before the competent courts. The Ministry of the Interior is also responsible for the establishment of appropriate databases of the perpetrators of this kind of criminal offences and databases of the victims of trafficking in human beings, as well as databases for the identified illegal migrants. If it is established that a case involves victims of trafficking in human beings, they will be accommodated in the Transit Centre for Aliens, opened in March 2001. There are standard operative procedures for processing victims in the Transit Centre, regulating the relations of the Ministry of the Interior, the International Organisation for Migrations and NGOs involved in the work of the Centre. In addition to the Section for Trafficking in Human Beings, in the field of fighting trafficking in human beings within the Ministry of the Interior there are a total of 20 operative workers treating this issue. In April 2003, a Unit for Fighting Trafficking in Human Beings with jurisdiction over the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia was established within the Ministry upon an Order by the Minister of  the Interior. This unit consists of officers with different ethnic background and has a total of 45 staff. It contains 32 people from the Special Task Unit and the Police Department, and 13 members of the Department of Organised Crime. On 12.02.2002, within the Ministry of the Interior, with a Decision brought by the Minister, a Commission for Deciding Upon Requests for Approval of Residence on the Grounds of  Employment as Dancers, Waitresses etc. in Night Clubs and Other Catering Facilities was established. This is a Multi-Sector Commission and was formed in order to establish stricter control of employment in catering facilities on the quoted grounds, and also to prevent any possible attempts at corruption in the competent sectors in the Ministry. Within the Border Police Department, established in May 2004, in the Sector for Support of Border Operations – the Section for Illegal Immigration has four operative inspectors.   In accordance with the National Programme for Fight of Trafficking in Human Beings and Illegal Migration in the Republic of Macedonia, the carrier of the legislative activity is the Ministry of Justice, working on preparing amendments to criminal legislation. The Ministry of the Interior, the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy and the Ministry of Health are responsible for amending, i.e. making the penal provisions more stringent in the field of market, sanitary and labour inspection and modification of the legal regulations with respect to the special conditions for employing foreign citizens, as well as the conditions for granting approval for temporary residence for employment.   The following are responsible for international cooperation and coordination in enforcing legal acts: the Ministry of Justice, the Ministry of the Interior and the Ministry of Foreign Affairs. Their activities include  concluding of bilateral and multilateral agreements with states to and from which people are subject to trafficking in human beings, promoting communication and cooperation among public prosecutor’s offices and the police services in the states of Southeast Europe; for the purpose of efficient criminal prosecution and closing channels for trafficking in human beings, exchanging data on criminal groups and individuals with other countries; and cooperation with the appropriate government and  non-governmental organisations.  In 2001, by the way of a Decision of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, the National Commission on Fight Against Trafficking in Human Beings and Illegal Migration (“Official the of Republic of Macedonia”, No. 18/01) was formed, involving representatives from the Ministry of the Interior, Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Ministry of Justice, Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, Ministry of Health and the Ministry of Finance – Customs Administration. Within this Commission a Subsection for Fighting Trafficking in Children was formed in January 2004. The National Commission on Fighting Trafficking in Human Beings and Illegal Migration is a coordinative body responsible for monitoring and analysing the situation of trafficking in human beings and illegal migration and coordination of the activities of the competent institutions in the Republic of Macedonia which actively work on solving the problems in this field, as well as to adopt strategic determinations. In order to establish an appropriate method of cooperation and a constructive approach in the joint action of national authorities, international organisations and the NGO sector in fighting trafficking in human beings and illegal migration in the Republic of Macedonia, the National Commission has adopted a Decision establishing a Secretariat of the National Commission. The Secretariat works within the jurisdiction of the National Commission and it is a technical and logistical body with an operative function in the process of implementation of the National Programme on Fighting Trafficking in Human Beings and Illegal Migration. On the Organisation and mode of work of the Secretariat for more details see 24_E_2
16. Please provide information on any legislative measures designed to protect and uphold respect for private and family life, home and communications. In which circumstances can these rights be infringed upon? 
Everyone enjoys protection of privacy directly invoking Article 8 of the European Human Rights Convention and Article 17 of the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights, ratified international treaties, which according to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) are part of the domestic legal order and are directly applicable by courts and the state administration. As different from the European Human Rights Convention that summarises protection of privacy in one provision, the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia guarantees privacy in several provisions of the Chapter on Basic Human Rights and Freedoms. The provisions on respect for privacy of the personal and family life of the individual and his/her dignity and reputation contained in Article 25 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia provide for a wide framework for protection of privacy. Several very important aspects of privacy are protected  by specific constitutional provisions related to the freedom and confidentially of correspondence and other forms of communication (Article 17 of the Republic of Macedonia); security and privacy of personal information (Article 18 of the Constitution) and inviolability of the home (Article 26  of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia).  As designed, these provisions reaffirm the positive obligation of the state to establish legislation that would not prevent individuals in the choice of (private) lifestyle, i.e. legislation that would ensure that relevant family ties are feasible; that would make available effective legal remedies for those who consider that their right to respect for privacy of personal and family life has been violated; and that would facilitate access to information related to facts of the concerned person’s previous life and to decisions that directly affect him/her; and that would ensure control of information, which could affect someone else’s life.  In the context of protection of fundamental human rights and freedoms, Article 18 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia guarantees security and privacy of personal information. The same Article guarantees citizens protection from violation of the personal integrity, deriving from the registering of personal information through data processing.  Aimed at ensuring privacy and confidentiality of personal information, which are subject to collection, processing, storing, using and exchange in the form of automated or hand kept databases, the Republic of Macedonia adopted a Law on Personal Data Protection in 1994 (amended in 2002). The said Law regulated rights and obligations of persons handling the databases and data securing; the rights, limitations and court protection of rights of persons to whom the data are related; the manner of establishing and maintaining the databases; transferring data outside the Republic of Macedonia; and the manner of supervising the legality of collecting, processing, storage, use and transfer of personal data in the Republic of Macedonia.  However, the harmonisation of the national legislation with the Directive 95/46/EC of the European Parliament and of the Council of 24.10.1995 on the protection of individuals with regard to the processing of personal data and on the free movement of such data imposed the need for adopting a new Law on Personal Data Protection, that has been recently enacted (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 07/05). In respect of the legal solutions offered in the new Law on Personal Data Protection for more details see I_H_39.  Reaffirming fundamental human rights and freedoms, the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia in Article 26 guarantees the inviolability of the home. The right to inviolability of the home may by restricted only by a court decision in cases of detection or prevention of criminal offences or protection of people’s health.  (Article 26, paragraph 2). The Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) defines the cases in which the right, i.e., principle of inviolability of the home may be infringed upon. According to the Law on Criminal Procedure a search of the home or other facilities of the accused or of other person may be conducted if there are reasonable grounds to believe that the search will result in apprehension of the accused or that traces of the criminal offence shall be found or objects of importance for the criminal proceedings (Article 198). According to the provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure, the search is ordered by the court in a written, elaborated order, which explicitly designates the place and the person to be searched, as well as the objects, which are searched for or confiscated from the person (Article 199, paragraph 1). The search warrant is shown before the search to the person who personally or whose home will be searched. Before the search, the person to whom the search warrant refers will be asked voluntarily to turn in the person or give away objects which are searched for. (Article 199, paragraph 2) However, the search may be conducted without prior presentation of a search warrant and without previous request for turning over the person or objects if an armed resistance is presumed or when suspecting that a severe crime is conducted by a group or organisation it is considered necessary to conduct the search suddenly or if the search is to be performed in public premises. (Article 199, paragraph 3). The householder or the holder of other premises will be summoned to be present at the search, and if he/she is absent his/her authorised representative will be summoned or some of his/her adult members of the family or neighbours (Article 200, paragraph 3). During the search of premises or persons, two adult citizens will be present as witnesses. The search of a female is performed only by a female officer, and the witnesses are also female. Before the start of the search, the witnesses will be warned to pay attention to the performance of the search and they will be reminded of their right, before signing the minutes for the search to write in their objections if they consider that the contents of the minutes are incorrect (Article 200, paragraph 3). The Law on Criminal Procedure sets forth the possibility that the search is conducted without the presence of witnesses if their presence is not possible immediately to be provided and there is a danger of delay. The reasons for a search without the presence of witnesses must be written in the minutes (Article 200, paragraph 4). The search of premises and persons is to be performed carefully without disturbing the order of the residence (Article 200, paragraph 7). During the performance of the search, only those objects and identity cards i.e. documents will be temporarily confiscated which are in connection with the aim of the search in that particular case (Article 200, paragraph 8). In accordance with the provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure, authorised officials of the Ministry of the Interior may, without a search warrant, enter a home or other premises if the person who, according to the court order is to be detained or forcefully apprehended, is there. The court order allows only entry into the home, not search. Authorised officials of the police may, without a search warrant, and without the presence of witnesses, perform a search of a person while enforcing a court order for apprehension or while depriving a person from freedom if it is suspected that the person possesses arms or tools for attack or if it is suspected that he/she will throw away, hide or destroy the objects which are to be confiscated from him/her as evidence in the criminal procedure (Article 202, paragraph 2). If during the search of premises and persons, objects are found which have no connection with the crime for which the search is intended, but which point to another crime to be prosecuted ex officio, the objects will be confiscated and a receipt for the confiscation will be immediately issued. The public prosecutor will be immediately informed in order a criminal procedure be initiated. These objects will be immediately returned if the public prosecutor finds that there are no grounds for institution of a criminal procedure and there is no other lawful ground according to which those objects should be confiscated (Article 200, paragraph 9). The Law on Criminal Procedure prescribes the obligation that for each search of residences or persons minutes be made. The minutes are signed by the official conducting the search, the person at whose home or on whom the search is conducted and the persons whose presence is compulsory (Article 201, paragraph 1). The objects and documents, which have been confiscated will be included and notified correctly in the minutes. (Article 201, paragraph 2) After the adoption of Amendment XIX of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia passed by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia on 26.12.2003 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 84/03) Article 17 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia was amended. Hence, the issue of protection and freedom and inviolability of correspondence and all other forms of communication are now differently regulated. Namely, until the latest constitutional amendment, the law and practice in the Republic of Macedonia were not adequate since there was an unrealistic constitutional solution, which prohibited all forms of eavesdropping and wiretapping and similar methods of infringing upon privacy by the state. The said constitutional Amendment ensured the grounds for precise legal regulation of the use of telephone tapping and other special investigative measures in the fight against organised crime and strict judicial control of such measures.  The right to inviolability of correspondence and all other forms of communication may be limited only based on a court decision, under conditions and in a procedure set forth in law, and if necessary for prevention or detection of crimes, for purposes of instituting criminal procedures or when this is required by the interests of the security and defence of the Republic of Macedonia.  In order to precisely regulate the conditions and procedure for communication interception, the manner of implementing, storage and utilisation of acquired information and data, as well as the manner of establishing control of the legality of communication interception, the Ministry of the Interior has drafted a Law on Communication Interception, which is now in the parliamentary procedure. The Draft Law incorporates the principle that no one shall intercept communication without an order of the competent court, unless such acquired information is intended for or if there is consent on the part of the person or persons involved in the communication. The Draft Law sanctions actions that might violate the privacy of communications stipulating that the production, offering for sale, sale and keeping of communication interception devices must be subject of an approval to be applied for at the Ministry of the Interior.  Furthermore, the Law defines the character of the data collected under authorised communication interception and registers kept in this respect, envisaging that such data have confidential character and are under a special protection regime, prescribed by the Minister of the Interior, i.e. the Minster of Defence, who adopted relevant Rulebooks, by the Minster of Justice, who adopts Court Rules of Procedure and by the Public Prosecutor  who issues Guidelines, each within the respective scope of their competencies.  In accordance with the proposed legal provisions, the court may order communication interception regarding a specific person when there are grounds to suspect that the person has committed a crime for which a prison sentence of at least four years is prescribed, or if it is a matter of a crime for which a five year prison sentence is prescribed and in respect of which there are grounds to suspect that it has been committed or is being committed by an organised group, gang, or other crime association. The communication interception order is issued for gathering information and evidence necessary for the successful processing of the case in a criminal procedure, which could not be gathered otherwise.  The competent Public Prosecutor lodges the request for communication interception to the court, upon the Public Prosecutor’s own initiative or upon a proposal by an authorised official of the Minister of the Interior. Furthermore, the Law explicitly designates information that the request must contain, envisaging inter alia, that if it is necessary to enter the residence or other premises, vehicles, in order to install, maintain, use or eliminate communication interception devices, the request must contain specific reference to this, defining at the same time the period in which the measure will be applied.  If, based on the facts and circumstances described in the request, the investigative judge considers that the legally prescribed conditions are met, the judge is obliged to issue a communication interception order within 24 hours at the latest from the submission of the request. As an exception, based on additional and elaborated written proposal for urgent adoption of the interception order, the investigative judge shall issue a communication interception order within three hours from the submission of the request. If the investigative judge does not approve the request for communication interception, the competent public prosecutor has the right to file an appeal to the criminal chamber of the competent court, within 24 hours at the latest from receiving information on non-approval of the request. The criminal chamber will deliver a decision within 24 hours from the submission of the appeal.  However, the investigative judge will reject the request for communication interception if it is related to the communication of the defence lawyer of the person whose communication is object of interception, or if it is related to the communication at the official premises of the President of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia, then of the President of the Republic of Macedonia, the Prime Minister of the Republic of Macedonia, or the communications at the official premises of the members of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia.  In accordance with the proposed legal solutions, the duration of the communication interception may not be longer than 30 days from the day of issuance of the order for communication interception. However, a possibility is provided that this period is prolonged for another 90 days, in which regard a request is lodged which shall contain explanation on the reasons for continuation of the communication interception.  The Draft Law on Communication Interception contains exhaustive list of the data that the order for communication interception must contain, and explicitly stipulates that the interception shall cease when the expected information shall have been acquired even before the period that the court has allowed communication interception has expired. In case it is necessary to enter the home, or other premises or vehicles to install, maintain, use or eliminate communication surveillance devices the order shall contain precise data on the period in which this shall be done.  In cases when the investigative judge shall issue an order for communication interception, the order is forwarded to the competent public prosecutor who further forwards it to the Minister of the Interior. Subsequently, the Minister adopts a ruling designating the authorised official who shall be in charge of the implementation of relevant activities and of the communication interception devices which are explicitly defined in the order.  When the communications are intercepted through a telecommunication system, the authorised official designated as being in charge of the implementation of activities and of the interception devices, is obliged to accordingly inform the telecommunication service provider. At the same time, the responsible person of the telecommunication services provider is obliged to implement the measures and procedures referred to in the court order, and to keep as business secret all data contained in the court order for communication interception, based on which the activities and procedures are applied at the telecommunication services provider.  The Law on Communication Interception prescribes the obligations of the authorised official to apply the measures and devices referred to in the court communication interception order, by ensuring the authenticity, entirety and security of data collected upon communication interception. In order to accomplish the assigned task, the authorised official, by using technical means, is obliged to ensure secure registration and storage of data collected upon communication interception. Data are registered in their original form and are handled in accordance with a specially established regime.  The Draft Law prescribes the obligation that all data, lists and other materials, gathered upon implementing the court communication interception order are submitted to the competent court within the period determined in the order and that they are kept in a special folder, sealed by the judge who has ordered communication interception. The conditions and procedure for opening the folder of documents are also precisely defined, if the evidence gathered upon communication interception is to be used in criminal procedures before court.  The proposed legal solutions place the investigative judge under the obligation to forward all information acquired on the basis of the implementation of the issued order to the competent public prosecutor who is to asses whether there are legal grounds for submission of request for institution of an investigation. If the public prosecutor does not submit a request for institution of an investigation within 30 days from the day of forwarding of the information acquired upon communication interception, the court shall adopt a decision for their destruction. The decision for destruction of the information may be also adopted in cases when it shall be considered that the collected information is of no significance for the proceedings, but based on a previously acquired opinion of the competent public prosecutor.  After a decision on the institution of an investigation has been adopted, the court shall summon the person whose communication has been intercepted to appear before the court within 8 days in order that the person is introduced with the material deriving from the interception of his/her communications. However, the Draft Law envisages certain limitations. i.e., the accused shall not be presented material from the folder of communication interception documents until the parts which according to the public prosecutor could threaten the further investigation, or which could threaten in any way the persons who have been involved in the implementation of activities and measures for communication interception or which could threaten the interests of other person who are not involved in the activities, are made illegible.  The basic objective that data and information acquired upon communication interception are used in the interest and for purposes of criminal proceedings, is realised on the basis of the provisions according to which the court may decide on the admissibility of data acquired upon communication interception as evidence in criminal proceedings, against which the parties have the right to appeal to the criminal chamber at the competent court, within 24 hours from the day of forwarding of the decision. After a legally valid court decision has been adopted following criminal law proceedings, within 15 days, the court shall adopt a decision on destruction of data. Data destruction is conducted by a committee composed of a judge, public prosecutor, and a person authorised by the Minister of the Interior.  The Draft Law prescribes the right to indemnity for persons whose communication has been intercepted contrary to the provisions of the said Law. The indemnity claim is decided upon by the court, which has adopted the communication interception order, in a summary procedure, which may not last longer than three months. The damaged party who is not satisfied with the decision of the court has the right to appeal to a higher instance court, within 8 days from the receipt of the court decision. Citizens who have suffered damages owing to publishing the collected data and information before the court has adopted a decision on the admissibility of the information as evidence in criminal proceedings or owing to the fact that destroyed data has been published are also entitled to indemnity. The compensation funds are paid from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia.  The Draft Law prescribes special conditions and a procedure for communication interception for purposes of protecting the country’s security and defence, which are defined in a separate Chapter of the Law. The Court may order interception of communication of a person regarding whom there are reasonable grounds to suspect that prepares to commit a crime against the state, against the armed forces or against humanity and international law.  In addition to the cases referred to above, the court may order communication interception in cases of preparation, incitement to, organising or participation in an armed attack against the Republic of Macedonia or in disabling the security system to perform its functions, if there is no other way of acquiring information on such activities in order to prevent the preparation of the crime, armed attack or disabling the security system. In the said cases, the bodies competent to lodge a request for communication interception order are the Minister of the Interior and the Minister of Defence.  The Draft Law designates the Supreme Court as the competent court to decide on the approval of the request for communication interception, prescribing the possibility for lodging an appeal to the Supreme Court by the entity lodging the request if the judge does not approve the request. The decision regarding the appeal is deliberated by a three judge chamber of the Supreme Court, and the judge who has participated in the adoption of the decision regarding the communication interception request may not be one of those judges. This facilitates full implementation of the principle of judicial control and protection.  The judge of the Supreme Court shall determine the necessary duration of the communication interception measure in the order, approving the request for communication interception. However, the interception measure may not be applied longer than three months. After the end of this period, and based on an elaborated proposal, the judge may order that communication interception is continued up to a year at the most, counting as well the period of the first order.  In accordance with the principle of protection of privacy, data on the person collected on the basis of communication interception order are kept at the Ministry of the Interior, i.e. at the Ministry of Defence under a special regime, up to a year at most, following the period designated in the court order. Afterwards all data and materials in connection with the implementation of the court decision are destroyed under the supervision of the judge who has adopted the order, in which respect minutes are prepared which only register the number of the court order.  The Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia, establishing a committee of five members, supervises the implementation of the measures by the Ministry of the Interior and the Ministry of Defence. The President of the said Committee is from the ranks of the Assembly opposition party, which at the last parliamentary elections has won the most seats (among the opposition parties), two members of the Committee are from political parties in power, and two members are from other opposition parties having seats at the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia.  Based on its consideration regarding the implemented communication interception measures and the supervision of the legality of the measures applied by the Ministry of the Interior and by the Ministry of Defence, the Committee prepares an annual report submitted to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia within two months after the end of the current year.  Criminal law protection of privacy is envisaged in the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 04/02, 43/03 and 19/04) which contains incriminations of the following criminal offences:  violation of the inviolability of the home (Article 145); illegal search (Article 146); violations of confidentially of letters and other parcels (Article 417); unauthorised publication of personal notes (Article 148); abuse of personal data (Article 149);  preventing access to public information system (Article 149-a); unauthorised disclosure of a secret (Article 150); unauthorised wiretapping and audio recording (Article 151);  unauthorised  recording (152).  
17. Elaborate how the right to marry and the right to found a family is protected within your legislation. 
The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) establishes that the state provides for particular care and protection of the family (Article 40 paragraph 1). Also, the Constitution establishes that the legal relations in the marriage, the family and cohabitation, are regulated by law (Article 40, paragraph 2). The right of the person to freely decide on procreation of children is regulated in Article 41 of the Constitution, together with the provision that the Republic of Macedonia, aiming at harmonised economic and social development, implements a humane population policy. Regarding the relationship between the parents and the children, the Constitution in Article 40, paragraph 3, stipulates that the parents have the right and obligation to provide for sustenance and upbringing of their children, while the children have the duty to provide care to the old and powerless parents. Moreover, the Republic of Macedonia provides for special protection of parentless children and children without parental care (Article 40, paragraph 4), and it especially safeguards the maternity, children and minors (Article 42, paragraph 1). The Law on Family (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 80/92, 09/96, 38/04 and 83/04 – consolidated text) regulates the marriage, the family and the family relations. The law regulates the legal prerequisites for entering into marriage. The marriage is defined as a union of cohabitation of a man and a woman, concluded by their own freely expressed will before a certified registrar. The marital union is based on the equality of the man and the woman, mutual respect and support. The Law on Family recognises the civil marriage, contracted before the competent administrative body, while the marriage contracted according to religions customs does not have a legal effect. However, the marital partners can perform a religious ceremony along the civil one. A marital union can be contracted by persons of full age. A minor after the age of 16 may establish marital union only if the competent court issues a consent through a non-litigation procedure. The Court establishes whether the minor has reached physical and emotional maturity necessary to exercise the rights and the obligations entered into by contract of marriage. The Court brings the decision upon a previously obtained opinion of a healthcare institution and rendered professional assistance in a Social Work Centre. The Law on Family prohibits entering into a marriage union of persons within a certain degree of a blood relationship, or in-law relationship (father-in-law and daughter-in-law, son-in-law and mother-in-law, step-father and step-daughter, step-mother and step-son) regardless of the fact whether the marriage on the basis of which the relationship originated had ceased to exist. The court can, in a non-litigation procedure, and due to justified reasons, permit in-law relatives to conclude a marriage. The Law on Family prohibits bigamy – a new marriage can not be concluded before a previously concluded marriage is terminated. A valid marriage can not be contracted by persons with permanent mental disorder, persons who are not capable of judgement, and persons with severe and most severe intellectual disabilities. The persons categorised as persons with moderate intellectual disability or people with mild intellectual disability, as well as persons suffering from severe congenital diseases in the family, can enter into a marriage after previously obtained opinion about the genetic structure from a competent institution which deals with treatment of such conditions or with genetic researches. The marital partners decide consensually on the choice of the family name they will have after the marriage is contracted, on the joint place of residence and on the joint housekeeping. Each of the marital partners is independent in the choice of the employment and profession. In order to satisfy the needs of their family, the partners take care jointly, each according to their abilities and capabilities. The marriage is terminated by: the death of one of the marital partners; by declaring the missing marital partner dead; by annulment of marriage; and by divorce. The divorce procedure takes place before the basic courts. The Social Work Centre conducts the reconciliation procedure if the parties have joint minor children, and then submits an opinion and proposal to the court to which parent to award the custody of children for their future care, custody and upbringing. The Law on Family arranges the extra-marital union of a man and wife, under the condition that it lasted for at least a year, and it considers it as equal to the marital union in terms of the right to alimony support and property relations regarding the property earned during the life of the union. Pursuant to the Law on Family, the family is defined as a cohabitation of parents and children and other relatives, if they live within a same household. The family is created by giving birth to children or by adoption. The family relations are based on equal rights, mutual respect, mutual support and sustenance, as well as protection of interests of the minor children.  The State provides for protection of the marriage and family from dysfunctional relationships, as well as from marital or domestic violence. In addition, the law prescribes that the state creates and provides for scientific, economic and social conditions for family planning and for free and responsible parenthood, while the parents have the duty to provide optimal conditions for healthy growing and development of their child in the family and in the society. The parenthood is established with the giving birth or adoption, while the parents have equal rights and duties towards their children (parental rights). The relationships between the parents and the children are based on the rights and duties of the parents to take care about the nursing, custody, upbringing and education of their children and development of their working skills and habits. The parental right is exercised by both parents, in accordance with the needs and interests of the children and the interests of the society. The parents have the right and duty to represent their minor children. 
18. Elaborate on the legislative structures in place to ensure protection of the right to freedom of thought, conscience and religion. a) Please give details and explain any limitations to this freedom which are permitted. b) Please give information on the measures taken to prevent discrimination against religious minorities in the Republic of Macedonia. c) What is the constitutional status of religions in your country? Is there any state religion? Is there a legislative framework for conscientious objection? If so, please provide details. 
a)  The freedom of thought, conscience and confession of faith is guaranteed by the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03). 
Namely, pursuant to Article 9 of the Constitution citizens of the Republic of Macedonia are equal in their freedoms and rights, regardless of their gender, race, skin colour, ethnic or social origin, political or religious conviction, property or social status, and they are equal before the Constitution and law. In addition, Article 16, paragraph 1 the Constitution guarantees the freedom of conviction, conscience, thought and public expression of thought. Article 19, paragraph 1 and 2 of the Constitution contains special guarantee of the freedom of religious confession, as well as the right to express one’s faith freely and publicly, individually or with others.  The right to freedom of conscience, thought, public expression of thoughts and religious confessions, including other rights, pursuant to Article 54 of the Constitution cannot be subject to restriction and discrimination on grounds of gender, race, skin colour, language, religion, ethnic or social origin, property or social status. Restrictions to freedoms and rights cannot be applied to freedom of conviction, thought, conscience, public expression of thoughts or religious confessions. Simultaneously, these rights enjoy direct constitutional and court protection pursuant to Article 110, Paragraph 1, Subparagraph 3 of the Constitution determining the competence of the Constitutional Court, according to which the Constitutional Court protects the freedoms and rights of the individual and the citizen relating to the freedom of conviction, conscience, thought and public expression of thought. Constitutionally guaranteed rights and restrictions to religious confession have been incorporated into the Law on Religious Communities and Religious Groups (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 35/97) as specified below. Pursuant to Article 4, Paragraph 4 of the Law, the expression of religious confession or affiliation to a religious community or group does not release citizens from responsibilities that they have before the Constitution, laws and other regulations.  In accordance with Article 6 of the Law, religious gatherings, religious rituals, religious press, religious instruction, religious schools and other forms of expression of faith cannot be used for political aims, for inciting religious, ethnic or other intolerance or for other activities prohibited by law. Pursuant to Article 8, Paragraph 2 of the Law, one religious confession is entitled to one religious community. Pursuant to Article 12 of the Law, the name of the religious group should significantly differ from names of already registered religious communities or groups. The name must indicate the fact that it is a religious group and the religious confession it represents. The name of the religious community or group must not contain the words Republic of Macedonia, names of other countries, names of state or public bodies and institutions or other marks. Pursuant to Article 16, Paragraph 2 of the Law, citizens must not be coerced to or prevented from giving contributions for religious or humanitarian purposes. According to Paragraph 3, religious communities or groups may not determine duties to believers for such contributions. Pursuant to Article 18 of the Law, the practice of religious ceremonies cannot disturb public order and peace and religious feelings and other freedoms and rights of citizens not belonging to the religious community or group. Pursuant to Article 20 of the Law, religious ceremonies (baptism, circumcision, etc.) for juveniles may only be practised upon the parents’ or custodians' consent, and if the juvenile is over 10 years of age he/she must give consent as well. These ceremonies must only be held if necessary hygienic, health or other pre-conditions have been met. Religious gatherings, ceremonies, press, instruction, schools and other forms of expression of the faith may not be used for political goals, for inciting religious, ethnic or other intolerance and for other activities prohibited by law. The organisation of religious gatherings and attendance of religious manifestations, pursuant to Article 21 of the Law may be prohibited by the internal affairs body in cases when measures have been undertaken for the protection of citizens’ health, public order and peace, safety and larger properties. This prohibition shall last until such circumstances have ended. The constitutionally guaranteed right of citizens to establish private educational institutions at all education levels with the exception of primary education (Article 45 of the Constitution) is, among others, also specified through the Law on Religious Communities and Religious Groups, which determines that religious communities and groups have a right to establish religious schools and student dormitories at all education levels, except in the primary education. Prior consent from the competent body on issues of religious communities and groups is obligatory for the establishment of such institutions. Religious schools may be attended by persons with completed mandatory primary education or persons whose obligation to attend mandatory primary education has ended as prescribed by law. An instructor in a religious school may only be a citizen of the Republic of Macedonia. By derogation, a foreign citizen may also teach at religious schools, with a certificate obtained from the competent body on issues of religious communities and groups (Articles 24, 25, 26 and 27). 
b)  The Law on Religious Communities and Religious Groups contains provisions prohibiting discrimination against religious minorities in the Republic of Macedonia. 
Pursuant to Article 2 of the Law, religious communities or religious groups are free to practise religious activities and religious ceremonies. The Law contains explicit prohibition  of any type of coercion or obstruction upon citizens to become members of a religious community or group. Furthermore, citizens must not be coerced to participate or not participate in religious ceremonies or other types of expression of faith, and they cannot be deprived of constitutional and legal rights due to religious convictions, affiliation to a religious community or a religious group, performing or participating in religious ceremonies and other ways of expression of faith (Article 4). Pursuant to Article 7 of the Law, religious communities or religious groups may establish religious schools as well as social and humanitarian institutions and within their operations they may use media and publish printed material (Article 15). Religious communities and religious groups exercise their right to practise religious ceremonies and other activities in churches, mosques and other temples, as well as in backyards part of these facilities, or in cemeteries and other premises in possession of the religious community or religious group (Article 18, paragraph 1). Article 4, Paragraphs 2 and 3 of the Law on Execution of Sanctions (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 3/97, 23/99 and 74/04) proscribes discrimination against persons subject to sanctions on the basis of their race, skin colour, gender, language, faith, political and other convictions, ethnic or social origin, property and social status or any other status of the person subject to sanctions. Religious feelings, personal conviction and moral norms of persons subject to sanctions must be respected. With regard to satisfying religious needs to convicted persons, the Law on Execution of Sanctions determines that convicted persons are entitled to satisfy their religious feelings and needs in accordance with conditions and capacities of the institution (Article 139). 
Pursuant to the Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04), a person who unlawfully obstructs the practice of religious ceremonies shall be punished with a fine or sentenced to imprisonment of up to one year (Article 399). The Macedonian Radio and Television, as a public enterprise established by law, also gives contribution to the non-discrimination of religious communities and religious minorities in the Republic of Macedonia by directly broadcasting religious solemn rites on the occasion of religious holidays such as Easter, Christmas, Ramadan, Eid, Yom Kippur, etc. 
c) The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia guarantees that the Macedonian Orthodox Church, as well as the Islamic Religious Community in Macedonia, the Catholic Church, the Evangelical-Methodist Church, the Jewish Community and other religious communities and groups are separate from the State and equal before the law (Article 19). This Constitutional provision clearly indicates a separation of religious communities from the State, and excludes a possibility of a state religion that would be favoured. Religious communities in the Republic of Macedonia have established relations and co-operation, due to their long tradition of mutual respect and co-operation. The state conveys its responsibilities toward the religious communities and religious groups in an institutional way through the Commission for Relations with Religious Communities and Groups as an independent public administrative body. A director appointed by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia chairs the Commission. The Commission has been established and its competences have been determined by the Law on Organisation and Operation of State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of  the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00, 44/02). The Commission's competences relate to issues regarding the legal position of religious communities and groups and the relations between religious communities and groups and the State. The Law on Holidays in the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 21/98) determines that citizens are entitled to celebrate religious holidays and proclaims them non-working days. Believers of the Christian faith celebrate the first day of Christmas and the second day of Easter and they are non-working days; the believers of the Islamic faith celebrate the first day of Ramadan and the first day of Kurban Bairam; and the believers of the Jewish faith celebrate the first day of Yom Kippur. In non-working days believers of the respective faith have the right to remuneration. Conscientious objection has been regulated by the Law on Defence (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 42/01 and 05/03). Namely, the right to exercise freedom of consciousness is closely related to the right to conscientious objection. Thus, in terms of fulfilling the constitutional duty of a compulsory conscript service (Article 28 of the Constitution) the Law on Defence (Article 8) allows alternative conscript service through unarmed service in the Army of the Republic of Macedonia exclusively due to religious reasons. In that case, the duration of the service is 10 months instead of the regular 6 months. The Law also determines the procedures for the alternative conscript service. The right to freedom of expression is guaranteed by the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia in Article 16, which encompasses freedom of personal conviction, conscience, thought and public expression of thought (Paragraph 1). The right to freedom of thought is guaranteed by the Constitution without any restrictions whatsoever and together with the freedom of personal conviction, conscience, public expression of thought and religious confession it has been raised on the level of a fundamental human right that cannot be restricted even in exceptional circumstances (war or state of emergency). In addition, these freedoms and rights enjoy direct court protection by the Constitutional Court of the Republic of Macedonia. Violation of provisions of the Law on Religious Communities and Groups is subject to respective legal sanctions. Apart from misdemeanours for which the Law prescribes fines (Article 29), depending on each case the deed may also be treated as a criminal act. Namely, the Criminal Code contains a provision (Article 137) according to which a person who, based on a difference in gender, race, colour of skin, ethnic and social origin, political and religious belief, wealth and social position, the language or other personal characteristics or circumstances, takes away or limits the rights of humans and citizens, determined by the Constitution, by law or by ratified international covenant, or who based on all these differences gives citizens favours that contravene the Constitution, a law or a ratified international covenant, shall be punished with imprisonment of three months to three years. If an official person while performing his/her duty commits the crime, he/she shall be punished with imprisonment of six months to five years. With the foregoing provisions, the Republic of Macedonia has accepted international instruments, universal and regional, such as the UN Universal Declaration of Human Rights, European Convention on the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms and the respective Protocols. 19. Are the freedoms of assembly and association assured? a) Provide statistics regarding the number of non-governmental organisations and associations or foundations active in your country? b) What is the legal status of non-governmental organisations and associations or foundations, including as regards financing, taxes, and restrictions on membership or on activities? c) Which, if any, justifications are permitted as regards possible restrictions placed on the exercise of these freedoms? Which body may impose such restrictions? d) Is the right to join or not to join trade unions legislated for? e) How is the freedom of association (trade-unions, professional associations) applied in the public administration in general, and in the Army, the Police and the Judiciary in particular? 
The Constitution (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) regulates the citizens' rights to assemble peacefully and to express public protest without prior announcement or a special approval. This right may only be restricted in case of a state of emergency or war (Article 21 of the Constitution). The citizens’ right to assemble peacefully for the purpose of expressing their opinion and public protest has been regulated by the Law on Public Gathering (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/95). Freedom of association is also one of the fundamental and essential rights of citizens determined by the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia. Article 20 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia guarantees the freedom of association of citizens to exercise and protect their political, economic, social, cultural and other rights and convictions. In order to exercise this right, citizens may freely establish associations of citizens and political parties, join them or resign from them. Only in certain cases the Constitution  restricts the establishment of associations of citizens and political parties. However, the Constitution determines that programmes and activities of associations of citizens and political parties may not be aimed at the violent destruction of the constitutional order of the Republic, or at encouragement or incitement to military aggression or ethnic, racial or religious hatred or intolerance. In addition, the Constitution explicitly prohibits military or paramilitary associations, which do not belong to the Armed Forces of the Republic of Macedonia (Article 20 of the Constitution). By these provisions, the Constitution expresses the protection of freedom of association from the aforementioned abuse. In June 1998 the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia passed the Law on Associations of Citizens and Foundations (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 31/98) that regulates the mode, conditions, and procedures for the establishment, registration, operations and cessation of associations of citizens and foundations . 
a) According to the provisions in the Law on Associations of Citizens and Foundations, there are three types of Registers: Register of Association of Citizens and Foundations, Register of Associations of Foreigners and Register of Foreign Organisations. Registers are kept at basic courts, and on the basis of data entered into the Registers, the Basic Court Skopje I in Skopje keeps a Single Register of all registered associations of citizens and foundations in the  State. As of the entry into force of the Law on Associations of Citizens and Foundations, 3.100 associations of citizens and foundations have been registered (according to data obtained from the Basic Court Skopje I in Skopje). The Registers and the Single Register of registered associations of citizens and foundations are public documents.  
b)  The non-governmental activities in the Republic of Macedonia, based upon the Constitutional concept, are carried out in accordance with the Law on Associations of Citizens and Foundations, adopted in 1998. The Law on Associations of Citizens and Foundations enables citizens to freely associate in citizens’ associations or to establish foundations for the purpose of accomplishing economic, social, cultural,  scientific, professional, technical, humanitarian, educational, sport and other rights, interests and convictions. This Law regulates questions related to associations of citizens and questions related to foundations in separate chapters.  An association of citizens may be founded by at least five adults who must be citizens of the Republic of Macedonia. The association of citizens at the founding assembly brings a founding decision, programme, statute, and elects its bodies. A member of association of citizens may be every citizen who voluntarily joins it, whereas foreign citizens may become its members if the association's statute allows such possibility. A foundation, according to the Law, is a property mass acting as a legal person that has been provided by one or more founders (donors), for accomplishing certain statutory goals. Its founders may not use the foundation’s property and assets for private purposes.  Associations of citizens and foundations may acquire monetary assets, objects and property rights from membership fees, donations, contributions, gifts, etc. All assets belong to associations of citizens and foundations, and each member has a right to inspect the use of assets and revenues. Non-governmental organisations may also acquire assets from the budget of the Republic of Macedonia. Assets from the budget are obtained on the basis of a Law and on the basis of the Decision on the Criteria and Procedure for Distribution of Financial Assets to Associations of Citizens and Foundations from the budget of the Republic of Macedonia, adopted by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia in 2000. Non-profit foreign and international non-governmental organisations, foundations, confederations and their branch-offices may be established on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia. Other organisations that are solely financed by bilateral and multilateral agreements for the purpose of their incorporation into the development processes of the Republic of Macedonia may also be founded on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia. The activity of foreign organisations must not contravene neither the Constitution nor the laws in the Republic of Macedonia nor international agreements that the Republic of Macedonia has signed or to which it has acceded.  Associations of citizens and foundations may associate into confederations or into other forms of associations for a joint promotion of their operations and activities. They may co-operate, join or interconnect with international organisations if it does not contravene the Constitution and laws. Article 13 of the Law on Associations of Citizens and Foundations stipulates that an association of citizens and foundation has a right to tax and duty relieves in accordance with a law. The level and utilisation of donations and tax relieves have been regulated by adequate financial and customs laws. This may also be regulated in the act on delegation of public authorisation awarded by a public authority. 
c)  Operations of associations of citizens and foundations may be terminated if they undertake political activities or use their property and assets for the accomplishment of political parties’ objectives. Moreover, their activities may be prohibited if they undertake actions aimed at the violent overthrowing of the constitutional order of the Republic, incite or call for military aggression and incite ethnic, racial or religious hatred and intolerance (Articles 3 and 4 of the Law).  Everybody may initiate a termination of an association of citizens and a foundation if he/she has a well-founded suspicion that they perform activities contravening the Constitution and the laws. A decision for termination of an association of citizens and a foundation is adopted by the basic court that has territorial jurisdiction according to the seat of the association of citizens and the foundation. The procedure before the basic court is initiated upon the proposal of the basic public prosecutor.  Association of citizens and foundations may appeal to the appellate court against the decision of the basic court on their termination. Also, the public prosecutor may demand protection of legality against the final decision. 
d)  The right of workers to organise in trade unions is a constitutional category. The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia in Article 37 stipulates that in order to exercise their economic and social rights, citizens have the right to establish trade unions. Unions may constitute confederations and become members of international trade union organisations. The law may restrict the conditions for the exercise of the right to trade union organisation in the armed forces, the police and administrative bodies. The trade union organisation has been regulated in a separate chapter of the Law on Labour Relations (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 80/93, 03/94, 14/95, 53/97, 59/97, 21/98, 25/00, 34/00, 50/01, 25/03, 40/03 and 80/03 - consolidated text). Article 84 of this Law regulates the labourers’ rights to constitute trade unions for the purpose of exercising their economic and social rights with regard to their employment, determined by law and the Collective Agreement. Workers are free to become members or accede to trade unions. 
e)  The Law on Civil Servants (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,  Nos. 59/00, 112/00, 34/01, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03, 17/04 and 69/04) that regulates the status, rights, duties and responsibilities of civil servants, regulates the question of trade union organisation under a separate article. Pursuant to Article 26 of this Law, civil servants may constitute trade unions and may become their members under conditions and modes determined by law, in order to exercise their economic and social rights. According to the Law, the civil servant, apart from appealing to other bodies, may also appeal to the trade union for protection in exercising his/her rights related to his/her employment.  Apart from the Constitution, the Law on Labour Relations, and the Law on Civil Servants, the trade union organisation in the Republic of Macedonia is regulated by statutes and special programmes adopted individually by trade unions. Laws or by-laws have not restricted the right to trade union organisation in the public sector. The employees in the public sector may freely, by their own conviction, join or resign from a trade union organisation in the area of their employment. The conditions for trade union organisation in the Republic of Macedonia have been laid down in the Law on Defence (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 42/01, 05/03) and the Law on Army Service (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 62/02, 98/02, 25/03 and 71/03). An independent trade union for the employees of the defence has been organised within the Army. This trade union has concluded an Agreement on Regulation of the Rights, Duties and Responsibilities related to employment with the Minister of Defence. Pursuant to Article 49 of the Law on Defence, trade union organisation within the Army during war or state of emergency is prohibited. Members of police are organised in the Macedonian Police Union. All employees in the police may freely become members of the union. The employees in the judiciary are organised in the Union of Workers in the Administration, Justice and Associations of Citizens of the Republic of Macedonia. A statute adopted by the members’ assembly has regulated the organisation, establishment and operation of the trade union.   The hitherto experiences from the implementation of the Constitution and the Law on Labour Relations, as far as trade union organisation is concerned, have not detected serious impediments in unions' operations and activities. There are special laws in selected fields that provide for the establishment of professional associations of citizens in a certain profession, such as: health, notary, attorney, veterinary, agriculture, etc.  In the aforementioned legislative acts and provisions the Republic of Macedonia has accepted the international  instruments  such as the Universal Declaration of Human Rights of the United Nations, the Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms of the Council of Europe, as well as other international legal  documents. 
20. Right to asylum (see also specific section on asylum in Chapter 24 – Justice and Home Affairs): Give details on how the right to asylum is being respected, particularly with respect to the rules of the Geneva Convention and Protocol relating to the status of refugees. 
In order to establish a legal and institutional framework for development of the Macedonian asylum system that would be compatible to the system in the European Union, the Republic of Macedonia, in January 1994 ratified the 1951 Geneva Convention Related to the Status of Refugees and the 1967 Geneva Protocol Related to the Status of Refugees. Hence, the Republic of Macedonia fully accepts the obligations deriving from these fundamental international agreements that regulate the asylum policy.  These obligations are implemented in the Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 49/03) that entered into force on 25.07.2004. It contains the fundamental provisions set forth in the abovementioned international agreements, thereby determining the definition, status, rights and obligations, as well as the procedure for the recognition of the right to asylum of refugees. More precisely, this Law regulates the conditions and procedure for granting and revoking the asylum status to an asylum seeker or a stateless person requiring asylum in the Republic of Macedonia, as well as the rights and duties of the asylum seekers and persons whose right to asylum has been recognised in the Republic of Macedonia. Thus, Article 2 of the Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection stipulates the right to asylum and persons to whom such right pertains, thereby explicitly asserting that definitions contained in this Article are in conformity with the 1951 Geneva Convention Related to the Status of Refugees and the 1967 Geneva Protocol Related to the Status of Refugees, as well as with the 1950 Convention on the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms and the 1984 Convention against Torture and Other Cruel, Inhuman or Degrading Treatment or Punishment.  In addition, Article 7 of the same Law contains the “principle of non-refoulement” which is one of the fundamental elements stipulated in Article 33 of the 1951 Geneva Convention Related to the Status of Refugees. The main characteristics of the Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection that have been harmonised with the relevant provisions contained in the 1951 Geneva Convention Related to the Status of Refugees and the 1967 Protocol Related to the Status of Refugees are:   Principle of manifestly unfounded application;   Principle of safe country of origin;   Principle of safe third country or first country of asylum;   Subsidiary protection;   Shared responsibility between the ministry of the interior (a procedure for recognition of the right to asylum) and the ministry of labour and social policy (activities related to accommodation, alimentation, assistance and integration of recognised refugees);  Normal and accelerated procedure;   Three phases of decision-making (the ministry of the interior – section for asylum, the second instance commission for administrative procedure in the field of judiciary, internal affairs, state administration, local self-government and religion within the government of the Republic of Macedonia in second instance and the supreme court in cases of submitted  lawsuit against the commission decision). For the purpose of completing the legislative framework and determining the procedure on recognition of the right to asylum, a bylaw to the Law on Asylum was adopted in 2004 regulating all types of forms and identification documents used and issued in the course of procedure following the filed request for recognition of the right to asylum. These legal acts have been adopted pursuant to envisaged priorities on issues of asylum set forth in the National Action Plan on Asylum and Migration adopted on 09.12.2002 (for more details see I_Annex_01) and prepared by a state team comprising of representatives both from the country and from Sweden, Norway, Denmark, and Bulgaria. Prior to the adoption of the National Action Plan, Macedonia had been conducting serious activities in order to develop an institutional framework for the creation of a Macedonian asylum system in conformity with European standards. Thus, at the end of 1998 a regional unit (the Asylum Section) competent to carry out procedures upon submitted requests for the recognition of the right to asylum was established within the Ministry of the Interior. The subsequent year the Ministry of the Interior established a shelter centre for asylum seekers. The Republic of Macedonia also cooperates with the EU on establishing a national asylum system compatible to that of the EU, and much of the cooperation is conveyed through the CARDS projects. Implementation activities of the CARDS-2002 Project started at the end of 2003 and are in their final phase. These activities have been realised in two phases:   Construction of a new shelter centre for asylum seekers within the competence of the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy; and    Technical assistance and training for the development and implementation of the National Action Plan on Migration and Asylum. On the respect of the right to asylum, as well as on statistical data’s for the number of asylum seekers and persons whose asylum right has been recognised, for more details see 24_F_1 through 24_F_11.  
21. Are there measures in place to prevent a person from being removed, expelled or extradited to a State where there is a serious risk that s/he would be subjected to the death penalty, torture or other inhuman or degrading treatment or punishment? Which bodies are responsible for fact-finding in such cases and do they have an adequate institutional framework to facilitate effective action? 
Pursuant to Article 29 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,  Nos. 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) aliens in the Republic of Macedonia enjoy freedoms and rights guaranteed by the Constitution, under conditions determined by law and international agreements. The Republic of Macedonia guarantees the right to asylum to foreign nationals and stateless persons who have been expelled because of their democratic and political conviction and activity.  An alien may only be extradited pursuant to a ratified international treaty and upon the principle of reciprocity. An alien may not be extradited for a political criminal offence. Acts of terrorism are not considered as  political criminal offences. Pursuant to Article 39 of the Law on Movement and Residence of Aliens (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,  Nos. 36/92, 36/92, 66/92, 26/93 and 49/03) an alien may not be expelled from the Republic of Macedonia if his/her life would be in danger due to racial, religious or ethnic affiliation, political convictions or if he/she would be exposed to mistreatment or inhuman conduct.  Article 3 of the European Convention on Extradition with the Protocols (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 32/99) specifies that extradition may not be approved for acts that fall within the category of political criminal offences or offences related with such criminal offences. The extradition may not be approved for prosecution of persons for their racial affiliation, religion, ethnicity or political convictions.  Article 11 of the European Convention on Extradition with the Protocols specifies that extradition may be approved only if the requesting state guarantees that the death penalty shall not be executed and that it shall be exchanged with another penalty.  Pursuant to the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04), the criminal chamber of the competent court assesses whether the documentation submitted by a foreign state through the Ministry of Justice fulfils the legal prerequisites for the extradition, and adopts a decision. The competent court submits the decision to the Ministry of Justice of the Republic of Macedonia. The Minister of Justice shall not allow extradition of an alien that has been granted asylum in the Republic of Macedonia or if he/she has been accused of political or a war criminal offence. In addition, the Minister of Justice shall not allow extradition of an alien if there are serious grounds for suspicion that he/she may be exposed to torture and other form of cruel, inhuman or degrading treatment or be subject to death penalty. The Government of the Republic of Macedonia upon the proposal of the Minister of Justice and following the detection of the foregoing facts may decide not to allow extradition, if it deems that especially justified interests of the state exist. Obligations arising from the Convention against the Torture and Other Forms of Cruel, Inhuman and Degrading Treatment or Punishment from 1984, ratified by the Republic of Macedonia, and especially Article 3 (the principle of non-refoulement) of the Convention are fully applied to the Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection that entered into force in August 2003. According to Article 7 of this Law, an asylum seeker, recognised refugee or a person under humanitarian protection may not be extradited or forcibly expelled to a country where he/she may be subject to torture, inhuman or degrading treatment or punishment. These persons in accordance with article 30 of the Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection are guaranteed the right to asylum for humanitarian protection and have concrete rights and duties. The Section of Asylum within the Ministry of the Interior is competent to determine the actual situation of those cases (Article 12 of the Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection). Currently in the Republic of Macedonia there are 809 persons whose rights to asylum due to humanitarian reasons have been recognized by the Department in 2003 and 2004, as it has determined in the course of the procedure that they would be subject to inhuman and degrading treatment upon their return to Kosovo – Serbia and Montenegro. The prohibition of expulsion (the principle of non-refoulement) in the sense of Article 4 of the aforementioned Convention has an absolute effect. Namely, pursuant to the Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection this prohibition also refers to foreign citizens who are not entitled to the asylum right, i.e. who are subject to exclusion of this right pursuant to Article 6 of the Law. 22. What steps have been taken to prevent discrimination based on membership of a national minority, ethnic or social origin, sex, race, colour, genetic features, language, religion or belief, political or any other opinion, property, birth, disability, age or sexual orientation? Has the Republic of Macedonia established specialised services to combat discrimination? If so, which legislative framework, institutional context, composition, functions and powers pertain to these services? 
The Republic of Macedonia continuously undertakes activities against discrimination and promotes equality through the constitutional principles of non-discrimination, implementation of legislative measures, through establishment of an adequate institutional framework, as well as by strengthening of the implementation mechanisms.  The principle of non-discrimination is fully incorporated in the legal order of the Republic of Macedonia. The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) in its general provisions defines the fundamental human freedoms and rights, recognised in international law and established by the Constitution as the most relevant constitutional and legal values, i.e., as fundamental values of the constitutional order of the Republic of Macedonia.  Furthermore, fundamental human rights and freedoms have a central place in the normative part of the Constitution. Namely, the provisions establishing the fundamental freedoms and rights in the Constitutions precede the provisions on the organization of the state authority. In this respect Article 9 of the Constitution should be especially underlined, according to which citizens of the Republic of Macedonia are equal in their freedoms and rights, irrespectively of gender, race, skin colour, ethnic and social origin, political and religious conviction, financial and social status. This Article establishes, as well, that citizens are equal before the Constitution and law. In terms of fulfilment of the rights and freedoms, the Constitution is not declarative. Instead it contains all prerogatives, which provide for their efficient exercise and their full legal protection. Namely, the Constitution establishes a consistent system of protection, which provides for their  implementation  it  prevents all possible abuses of these rights and freedoms by third persons and by the state  authority itself. Furthermore, specifying the cases in which rights and freedoms of citizens may be restricted, the Constitution prescribes that such restrictions may not discriminate on the basis of gender, race, skin colour, language, religion, national or social background, property or social status.  Within the context of mechanisms available to the Macedonian citizen for protection of their rights and freedoms, it is important to mention the possibility of access by the citizens of the Republic of Macedonia to the European mechanisms, such as the European Court of Human Rights. Namely, the Republic of Macedonia, as a party to the European Convention for  the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms, as of the ratification of this European Convention has put into practice the right of the citizens to lodge an individual application to the European Court of Human Rights when they consider that by the acts and activities of the bodies of state authority, including the domestic courts,  some of their freedoms and rights guaranteed under the Convention have been violated. After  conclusion of the Framework Agreement of 2001, the 1991 Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia was amended aiming at strengthening of the safeguards for protection of minorities. Thus in addition to the principle of non-discrimination, the principle of equitable representation of communities, as an active principle has been envisaged (for more details see I_J_2 and I_J_3).  The legislative framework for prevention of discrimination and promotion of full and effective equality consists of the criminal, civil and the administrative legislation:   The Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02. 43/03 and 19/04) In the Chapter on Criminal Offences against Human Rights and Freedoms, Article 137 defines as a violation of the equality of citizens the conduct by which the rights established by the Constitution, law or a ratified international agreement, are denied or limited on the grounds of gender, race, skin colour, ethnic and social background, political or social affiliation, material or social status, language or another personal feature or circumstance, or the rights by which, on the basis of these differences the citizens are granted benefits in contravention to the Constitution, law or ratified international agreement. Article 319 of the Criminal Code, in the Chapter on Criminal Offences against the State, establishes that a person will be sanctioned for incitement of ethnic, racial and religious hatred, discord and intolerance, if by force, maltreatment, threatening the safety, derision of the national, ethnic or religious symbols, by desecrating monuments, graves, or in another way causes or incites to national, racial or religious hatred, discord or intolerance. Article 417 of the Criminal Code in the Chapter on Crimes against  Humanity and International Law prescribes that the person who, on the basis of race, skin colour, nationality or ethnic origin violates the basic human rights and freedoms recognized by the International Community is perpetrating discrimination.   The Law on Execution of Sanctions (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.  03/97, 23/99 and 74/04)  
The Law prohibits discrimination on the basis of race, skin colour, gender, language, religion, political and other convictions, ethnic and social background, association, financial or social standing or another status of the person against whom the sanction is enforced. The religious beliefs, the personal conviction and the moral norms of the person against whom the sanctions are executed must be respected. 
There are provisions in both the civil and the administrative law aimed at fighting discrimination. These provisions are not contained within a single act, but are incorporated  in several substantive regulations.   The Law on Courts (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/95, 45/95 and 64/03) Pursuant to the Law, everyone has the right to equal access to courts  to protect the human rights and legally based interests.     Law on Secondary Education (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 44/95, 24/96, 34/96, 35/97, 82/99, 29/2002, 52/02- consolidated text, 40/03, 42/03, 67/04)  It establishes that everyone, under equal conditions established by this Law, has the right to secondary education. Furthermore, the same Law prohibits discriminations based on gender, race, skin colour, ethnic and social background, political and religious affiliation, property and social status.   The Law on Higher Education (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,  Nos. 64/2000 and 49/2003) The Law provides that citizens of the Republic of Macedonia have, under equal conditions, right to education at the higher education institutions in the Republic of Macedonia. At the same time, foreign nationals may, applying the principle of reciprocity, study at the higher education institutions in the Republic of Macedonia under the same conditions as the nationals of the Republic of Macedonia. In addition to foreign nationals, stateless persons, as well, have the right to higher education under conditions established by law and ratified international treaties. 
  Law on Associations of Citizens and Foundations (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 31/98) 
It prescribes that the activity of the citizens’ association will be prohibited if such activity violates the human rights and freedoms guaranteed by the Constitution or incite to ethnic, racial or religious hatred or intolerance.   Law on Political Parties (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 76/04) In its general provisions it establishes that the platform, statute and the activity of a political party may not be directed towards violent overthrow of the constitutional order of the Republic of Macedonia, incitement to or calling to military aggression, flaring up ethnic, racial or religious hatred or intolerance. The Law proscribes an obligation for political parties, in their activity, to ensure the application of the principle of gender equality in the access to positions within the political party. The Law prohibits any discrimination on the basis of membership or non-membership in a political party.   Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,  Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/2002, 33/2003 and 19/2004) The Law, in its general provisions, defines internal affairs as affairs related to the protection of freedoms and rights of citizens, guaranteed by the Constitution, as well as prevention of incitement to ethnic, racial or religious hatred or intolerance.   Law on Telecommunications (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 33/96, 17/98, 22/98, 28/00, 04/02, 37/04) This law explicitly prohibits transmission and delivery of messages inciting to ethnic, racial or religious hatred or intolerance.   Law on Legal Status of Religious Communities and Religious Groups (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 35/97) It establishes that the religious conventions, religious ceremonies, religious media, religious schools, religious teaching and other types of expression of religion may not be used for political purposes, incitement to religious, ethnic or other intolerance and other actions prohibited by law.   Law on Courts (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/95, 45/95 and 64/2003) 
In the course of election of judges and lay judges, pursuant to the Law, there must not be any discrimination on the basis of gender, race, skin colour, ethnic or social background, property or social status.    The Law on Labour Relations (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 80/93, 3/94, 14/95, 53/97, 59/97, 21/98, 25/00, 34/00, 50,01, 25/03 40/03 and 80/03-consolidated text) Article 9 of the Labour Relations Law prohibits the employer to place under unequal legal treatment the job applicant or the employee because of their race, skin colour, gender, age, health status or disability, religious, political or other belief, membership in trade unions, ethnic or social background, family status, property or other personal circumstances.  This Law establishes that women and men must be provided equal opportunities and equal treatment with regard to employment, advancement, employment insurance, working conditions, working hours and cancellation of employment contracts. Article 77 of the said Law places the employer under an obligation to pay equal salary to the employees for equal work with equal requirements, regardless of the gender. The provisions of the employment contracts and the provisions of the collective agreements, which are in contravention to these provisions, are null and void.   Law on Election of Representatives in the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 42/02, 50/02 and 46/04)  It specifies that in the proposed list of candidates each gender will be represented by at least 30%.   The Law on Local Elections (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 46/96, 48/96, 56/96, 12/03, 35/04, 42/04, 45/04, 52/04 and 60/04)  It prescribes that in the proposed list of candidates for members of the Council of the Municipality and the City of Skopje, each gender will be represented by at least 30% in both the upper and the lower half of the list.     Law on Culture (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 31/98, 49/03 and 66/2003 – consolidated text) Article 3 of the Law establishes that everyone may participate in culture, as individual, local or national interest, with a profit or non-profit purpose, in adherence to the law. Based on this, it can be concluded that the access to cultural values is related to the exercise of cultural rights of all citizens in the Republic of Macedonia.  The Article 4 of the Law establishes that everyone has the right, irrespectively of the age, education, religious, ethnic or other affiliation, to create freely, non-professionally or professionally, as well as right to education for the field of culture. Within the meaning of this Law, the term “culture” involves participate artists, independent artists, public and private institutions, other legal and natural persons, whereby the term ”artist” means and marks any natural person who creates a copyright work in the  field of artistic creation or performs  copyright work, or  folklore work, irrespective of their education, legal status, registration, ethnicity, other type of affiliation, etc.   Law on Employment of Persons with Disabilities (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 44/00 and 16/04)  It prescribes skill development of the disabled person for practical work for certain jobs, in conformity with the needs of the employer and the person with disability. The employer sends the employed disabled person to vocational training, if the person is not skilled to perform the appropriate tasks. The finances needed for vocational training are provided from a special fund, earmarked for this purpose. Pursuant to the Law on Social Care (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 50/97, 16/00, 17/03 and 65/04) persons with disabilities have the right to non-institutional and institutional social welfare. Persons with disabilities, pursuant to this Law, may exercise the right to social welfare. These two legal acts indicate the fact that in the Republic of Macedonia there is no discrimination on the basis of disability, and they are also measures for prevention of such type of discrimination.   Law on Civil Servants (Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia, Nos. 59/00, 112/00, 34/01, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03, 17/04 and 69/04).  Equal access to jobs and competence-based selection are the two fundamental principles for employment of civil servants, as envisaged in the Law on Civil Servants. With regard to education, the Ministry of Education and Science has envisaged a programme in the elementary schools by which children attain knowledge on tolerance, non-discrimination and the democratic values.  Thus, in primary education, for pupils in grades from 1 to 8, there are programmes introduced preparing  pupils for life in modern civil society. For the pupils from the primary education, a pilot project entitled “Basics of Civil Society” is implemented, which deals with elements from the field of human rights. In the higher grades of the primary education, in the Macedonian language courses, there are contents on the topic “The World and Us” from the UN Charter. Furthermore, within the project “Civil Education – A Road towards the Civil Society“„ there are programmes “Basics of Democracy” in the pre-school education and in the first four grades and “We the People – project Citizen” in the higher grades of the primary education. In this context, it should be added that the new concept of primary education provides that a cycle of contents within the course “Civil Culture” is implemented in the higher forms. In the  field of the secondary education, it is important to mention the existence of the curricula implemented in all secondary schools as a result of the project for introduction of civil education in the secondary vocational schools in 1999/2000.  Within the context of gender equality, as of 2000 onwards the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy in cooperation with the local self-government and the Association of Women’s Organizations in the Republic of Macedonia established eight committees on gender equality within eight municipal councils in the State and facilitated the preparation of a local action plan on gender equality in the municipality of Veles. The gender equality committees implement their activities in cooperation with the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy and the local NGOs. In March 2000 the Macedonian Women’s Lobby was established, under activities related to the Stability Pact Initiative Working Table on Gender Equality. The same year, with the support of the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, a National Office of the Macedonian Women’s Lobby was opened, which provides logistical support for the implementation of the programme activities. Again, in the context of the gender equality, in March 2003 a Club of Women – Members of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia was established. The coordinator of these activities was the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, in cooperation with the NGO Association of Women’s Organizations of the Republic of Macedonia.  The Constitution provides for several forms of constitutional and legal protection of the rights and freedoms of the citizen, which directly or indirectly guarantee their exercise. In the first two forms the protection is rendered through a procedure based on the principles of expediency and priority in the decision-making.  
1.  Courts in the Republic of Macedonia:  
Pursuant to the Law on Courts, the courts protect the  rights and freedoms of the citizens, as well as the rights of other legal entities if, pursuant to the Constitution, that is outside of the scope of  jurisdiction of the Constitutional Court. The  jurisdiction of courts also comprises the protection of citizens from the individual illegal acts of the state  bodies and of other public institutions. The regular courts have a general  jurisdiction for protection of human rights.  2.  Constitutional Court of the Republic of Macedonia:  
Article 108 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia establishes that the Constitutional Court is an  body of the Republic, protecting constitutionality and legality. Pursuant to Article 110 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, the Constitutional Court, inter alia, protects the  rights and freedoms of citizens with regard to the freedom of conviction, conscience, thought and public expression of thought, political association and action and prohibition of discrimination of citizens on the basis of gender, race, ethnic, social and political affiliation. The Constitutional Court exercises its jurisdiction in two ways: through constitutional review, i.e., assessment of general legal acts, and through specific procedure, i.e., through specific protection of certain rights and freedoms provided by the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia. 3. Ombudsman: The Amendment XI of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia provides for an obligation to pay particular attention  to the protection of principles of non-discrimination and equitable representation of the communities in the public bodies at all levels, and in the other areas of public life.  This Constitutional Amendment was transposed into the Law on Ombudsman (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 60/2003) which establishes a new competence according to which the Ombudsman undertakes actions and measures to protect the principle of non-discrimination of the members of ethnic communities and their appropriate and equitable representation in the state bodies, bodies of the units of local self-government and in the public institutions and services. In the practical functioning of the Ombudsman, starting in 2003 special records are maintained through which the number of submitters of petitions can be sorted according to their ethnic affiliation, according to the type of violated rights, and the institution for several years has a special  Department for Protection of Children, which annually receives about 40 cases. This Department, aiming at improvement and promotion of children’s rights, in the period from 2001 to 30.09.2004 has submitted to the Government amendments to certain laws (Law on Protection of Children, Law on Health Insurance, Criminal Code, Law on Local Self-Government, Law on Social Protection, Law on Prohibition of Smoking, Law on Catering Industry, Law on Trade, etc.) that were approved. In relation to the principle of non-discrimination on any grounds, in the period between 01.01.2002 and 30.09.2004 approximately 50 to 60 applications were registered (out of which approximately 40 are related to issues concerning rights of the child, and other forms of discrimination), which amounts to 2,5% to 2,7% of the total number of applications submitted to the Ombudsman. 

4.  Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia, Permanent Survey Committee for Protection of Freedoms and Rights of Citizens: The  Standing Inquiry Committee for Protection of Freedoms and Rights of Citizens has the purpose of ensuring the freedoms and the rights of citizens in case of their inability to exercise the rights in the practice, or of violation of the rights by the competent state bodies. Its establishment enables institution of procedures to establish the responsibility of public officials.  
5.  Government of the Republic of Macedonia and state administrative bodies:  
The institutional mechanisms for safeguarding the principle of non-discrimination operating within the Government are established at two levels:    General-monitoring and promotion of human rights protection, through implementation of the international standards and enhancement of the implementation mechanisms. At this level, within the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, there is a Unit on the Council of Europe, while at the Ministry of Justice a Unit for Human Rights, Legal Analysis and Comparative Law was established.      Ministerial level: The Ministries, within the competences established under the Law on Organisation and Operation of State Administrative Bodies, are responsible for enforcement of the laws from their respective areas, which contain anti-discriminatory clauses. Therefore, various sectors and units in the Ministries and other state bodies, in accordance with their scope of work, propose and undertake measures to prevent discrimination.   Thus, within the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy - Labour Sector, by a decision of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia in January 1997 a Unit for Promotion of Gender Equality  was established. The basic function of the Unit is to exert a positive influence on the improvement of the position of women and promote gender equality in conformity with the international conventions that the Republic of Macedonia has ratified, ensuring the women full enjoyment of human rights. Also, the Unit initiates and coordinates activities in the area of gender equality at the  level of governmental institutions, with a clear purpose and strategy to overcome the problems, which the women in the Republic of Macedonia face. At the same time the Unit cooperates, participates, supports and coordinates many activities initiated by the non-governmental organisations. Upon an initiative of the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy (the Gender Equality Unit) contact persons in the Ministry of Justice, Ministry of the Interior, Ministry of Foreign Affairs and the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning, contact persons have been designated primarily employed at the human rights sectors, who, among other tasks, have the obligation to monitor the activities from the perspective of gender equality and to inform the Unit about certain proposals and solutions in the area of gender equality. Cooperation with non-governmental organisations and international cooperation The Government of the Republic of Macedonia, aware that the principle of non-discrimination in itself is not sufficient to protect the citizens from discrimination, or to provide for full and effective equality through normative regulation of the  field, continuously undertakes a number of measures through implementation of many activities, such as: media campaigns, organisation of national and international seminars and workshops, open panels, researches, trainings, etc. In this context, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, closely and continuously cooperates with the non-governmental organisations, political parties, other institutions in the  State, as well as with the international organisations. 
23. Please provide details on legislative measures which ensure equality between men and women, commenting particularly on equality in areas such as employment, work and pay. 
In  the Chapter on  fundamental human rights and freedoms, the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) determines that citizens of the Republic of Macedonia are equal in their rights and freedoms, regardless of  gender, race, colour of skin, ethnic and social origin, political and religious beliefs, property and social status (Article 9). The same Article guarantees equality of citizens before the Constitution and law. By introducing gender equality provisions in the substantive provisions of the Constitution the Republic of Macedonia has expressed its political will to rank itself among democratic states that base their state order on full recognition and promotion of gender equality, as one of key prerequisites for sustainable development.  The Law on Labour Relations (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 80/93, 3/94, 14/95, 53/97, 59/97, 21/98, 25/00, 34/00, 50,01, 25/03 40/03 and 80/03-consolidated text) prohibits direct and indirect discrimination regarding:    Conditions for employment, including the selection criteria and conditions for a specific job, in any branch of economic activities and at all levels of personnel hierarchy;   Promotion;   Access to all types and levels of vocational training, re-training and additional training;    All rights arising from and related to employment, including equality of pay;   Termination of an employment contract;   Rights of members and work of employees’ or employers’ associations or any other professional organization, including the membership privileges;    Insurance at work;  Working hours;   Health status, i.e. disability;   Religious, political or other belief;   Ethnic or social origin;  Family status;  Property status;   Other personal circumstances.  The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia guarantees everyone the right to work, to free choice of employment, guaranteeing also that every job is open to all under equal conditions (Article 32).  In accordance with the above said the Law on Labour Relations contains provisions, which, inter alia, prohibit unequal treatment (placing a person in an unequal legal position) based on the gender of persons seeking employment. (Article 9). The same Article guarantees that men and women must be provided equal opportunities and treatment in employment, promotion, insurance at work, conditions for work, working hours, and in termination of employment contracts.  The Law on Labour Relations does not contain provisions, which explicitly prohibit referring to the gender of persons seeking jobs in the vacancy announcement.  Furthermore, the Law does not contain provisions prohibiting posing any pregnancy related questions to women when applying for any job.  As already stated, according to the Law on Labour Relations, personal circumstances, which could be related to gender or pregnancy of women seeking jobs must not be considered an obstacle to employment.  The definition of indirect and direct discrimination has not been introduced in this area of legislation (Directive 2002/73/EEC).  The provisions of the Law on Labour Relations prescribe protection of women employees (during pregnancy, as well) from underground work, strenuous physical labour or health damaging work, especially from work in night shifts.  Pregnant women may not be dismissed from work in the course of pregnancy or maternity leave.  Maternity leave, according to the Law, lasts nine consecutive months, while in cases of a birth of twins, triplets, etc., the maternity leave lasts twelve months. Maternity leave for adopted children is of the same duration. These rights are exercised under equal conditions by both parents, who have the right to be returned to the formerly held or to appropriate positions.  In cases of a legal action on grounds of employment related discrimination, the burden of proof is on the employee who has instituted the dispute. If the dispute has been resolved in favour of the employee, the costs for the legal action and other rights are determined following regulations on regular court proceedings. Equal access to jobs and competence-based selection are the two fundamental principles for employment of civil servants, as envisaged in the Law on Civil Servants (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/00, 112/00, 34/2001, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03, 17/04 and 69/04).  In respect of compensation for work, the Law on Labour Relations places employers under the obligation to disburse equal pay for work of equal value of the employees regardless of their gender (Article 77). The same principle is further transposed and elaborated in collective agreements, which must not be in collision with the law.  Any differences in this respect are related exclusively to differences between jobs performed mainly by women and those mainly performed by men.  
24. Give an overview of possible incentives which exist for both the public and private sectors to refrain from discriminatory employment practices. 
Equal access to jobs and competence-based selection are the two fundamental principles for employment of civil servants, as envisaged in the Law on Civil Servants (Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia, Nos. 59/00, 112/00, 34/01, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03, 17/04 and 69/04).  The principle of equitable representation of citizens belonging to the communities in the state bodies and other public institutions at all levels is one of the basic values of the Constitutional order of the Republic of Macedonia. The Law on Civil Servants elaborates this principle in detail, while the criteria of expertise and competence are fully observed in employment of persons belonging to  the communities in the Republic of Macedonia.  Aimed at creating preconditions for equal job opportunities, the legislation and the practice of the Employment Agency of the Republic of Macedonia, i.e. the active employment policy measures provide incentives for employment of targeted groups of persons having difficulties in employment under the usual labour market conditions.  Law on Employment of Persons with Disabilities (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 44/00 and 16/04) and the Rulebook on the Criteria for and  Mode of Allocation of Finances from the Special Fund Creating Conditions for Employment and Work of Persons With Disabilities (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 34/04) envisage that employers who shall employ unemployed disabled persons, in accordance with the provisions of the said Law, are entitled to grant allocations from the Special Fund. The grant allocations from the Special Fund are given in the following cases:    Grant allocation in the amount of 20 average monthly salaries paid in the Republic of Macedonia in the month prior to the long term employment of disabled persons i.e. for employment of person with sight, hearing, voice and speech impairments, physically disabled persons, persons with slight psychosocial impairments, persons with combined impairments and persons with psychosis conditions who owing to the extend of their disability have specific requirements in respect of work; or grant allocation in the amount of 30 average monthly salaries paid in the Republic of Macedonia in the month prior to employment of a blind person with sight impairment of over 97% or of a person of more than 90% physical disability.    Under the Law on Employment of Disabled Persons, employers have the right to grant allocations from the Special Fund, in the amount of up to 30 average monthly salaries paid a month before the application has been lodged, for purposes of adjusting the work place for disabled persons; then for purposes of procuring equipment required for employment and work of disabled persons the employer is entitled to grant allocation in the amount of up to 50 average monthly salaries paid in the Republic of Macedonia for the month prior to the lodging of application, according to the number of newly employed disabled persons; and for purposes of completion and adjustment of the facilities to employment and work of disabled persons depending on the technical-technological process, employers have the right to grant allocations in the amount of 50 average monthly salaries paid in the Republic of Macedonia for the month prior to the lodging of the application, according to the number of newly employed disabled persons.    Furthermore, the Law on Employment of Disabled Persons envisages training for disabled persons for practical work at certain jobs according to the needs of the employer and the disabled person. The Employment Agency assigns disabled persons to training for employment purposes, while employed disabled person who are lacking relevant the employer sends job training for training. The job training may be organized at the employer’s facilities or with another employer, following special programmes and under conditions and in a manner set forth by the Rulebook on Job Training of Disabled Persons.  The employer lodges the application for grant allocation from the Special Fund to the Management Board of the Employment Agency of the Republic of Macedonia, through the Employment Centre  covering the specific territory employer.  The application is supported with: documents of the court registration of the company, ruling on fulfilment of hygiene-technical and fire job safety conditions, solvency certificate, a certificate that the company is not under bankruptcy proceedings, a certificate issued by the Union of Associations for the Protection of Disabled Persons of Macedonia that the conditions set forth in the Law on Employment of Disabled Persons have been fulfilled, monthly calculation of paid salary, calculated and paid personal income tax and salary based contributions for the nine months before the application has been lodged, as well as signed and certified copy of the employment contract. One of the commitments under the employment policy to be pursued in the forthcoming period is encouraging integration of persons with less favourable position at the labour market, such as those who have left school early, unskilled labour, persons with diminished capacities, ethnic minorities etc.  The following proactive measures will be undertaken in this respect: promoting contracts for public works under infrastructure upgrading projects and specific targeting of local authorities’ resources to implementing projects of public interest; support for new forms of flexible employment, especially for persons with special needs and other active measures to facilitate conditions for employment of persons in underprivileged position in terms of job opportunities.  Furthermore, the Employment Agency implements active measures to encourage employment, which are to reduce negative unemployment trends, having on the other hand a positive impact on increase of employability of specific target groups. Some of these measures are aimed at encouraging employment of young people, matching the labour market demands with jobs in demand through various education programmes. In light of the importance of education and expert proficiency vis-à-vis the labour market requirements, in the context of improving the general business climate, there will be a focus on improving the quality and efficiency of the education and training systems.  The Roma in the Republic of Macedonia are one of the target groups of measures for their empowering at the labour market. In order to contribute to full emancipation and integration of Roma in society, the Republic of Macedonia is one of states involved in the international project “Decade of Roma Inclusion 2005-2015”. The goals of the Decade are to plan; design and implement actions in a ten-year period that would help improve conditions for development and full integration of Roma in all fields. In this respect, there is a National Strategy on the Roma that was approved by the Government on 31.01.2005, as well as an Action Plan of the Decade of Roma Inclusion. Considering that one of the key segments of advancing the emancipation and integration of Roma is to improve their economic status, which primarily implies their employment, the Employment Agency is involved in the Decade related activities.  Under the Programme and in the context of its regular tasks the Employment Agency focuses its activities on successful preparation of Roma for employment and their larger scale coverage by the pro-active employment measures. Hence, a series of measures are undertaken to upgrade the level of informing Roma about their rights and obligations as employed and as unemployed, through job counselling clubs. The purpose of these activities is to empower the Roma for their more successful participation in the labour market, promoting their active approach towards job seeking and employment. Considering the low skills structure of this population, it is necessary to involve them in all types of vocational training. The Employment Agency also works on facilitating their access to training programmes, re-training and advanced training.  One of the measures for job opportunities advancement is engagement of Roma on public works, in which regard in addition to pecuniary compensation for the performed job, there will be also training in order that they acquire certain knowledge and skills to enhance their competitiveness at the labour market.  Unemployed persons - social assistance beneficiaries are offered the opportunity of receiving the assistance in the form of single payment or in instalments, encouraging thus development of small, family businesses and contributing towards resolution of unemployment problems through self-employment.  In addition, the Employment Agency will design and implement other pro-active measures to alleviate the problem of unemployment among the Roma, by their successful inclusion in the labour market.  
25. Elaborate on the legislative structures in place to ensure effective access to legal aid, commenting on the scope and resources of the legal aid service. 
In accordance with the legal system of the Republic of Macedonia, every citizen is entitled to free access to a court and may represent himself/herself in civil cases or may defend himself/herself in criminal cases if charges have been raised against him/her.  Article 53 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 1/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) determines that the Bar is an autonomous and independent public service providing legal assistance and carrying out public mandates in accordance with the Law. The Bar Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 59/02) regulates the provision of legal assistance by the bar to natural and legal persons in exercise and protection of their rights and law-based interests in proceedings before courts, state bodies and other legal entities; implementation of public competence determined by law; organisation of the bar; terms of performance, termination and rest of the bar activity; as well as lawyers’ rights and duties. An exception to the foregoing is stipulated in the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) where in certain criminal proceedings the defendant must be appointed a defence attorney. Thus, if the defendant does not appoint a defence attorney, the state shall provide legal assistance while the Court pays expenses. On the Answer to this Question pertaining to the part on free legal aid, for more details see I_D_15
26. What is the average length of time a person may be detained without being brought before a competent legal authority? What is the average length of time between the lawful arrest and detention of a person and his trial? (See also the section on the judiciary.) 
Although arrests are usually conducted by police, the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) empowers any person to deprive of liberty a person caught while perpetrating a criminal offence prosecutable ex officio. A person shall be regarded caught while perpetrating a criminal offence when seen while perpetrating the offence or has been caught in circumstances which indicate that he/she has just committed the offence. In such case, the citizen is obliged to immediately hand over to police or court the person deprived of liberty, or notify them thereof. 
The police officer, by rule, has to provide a court order prior to arrest. Article 12, paragraph 2 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 1/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) strongly favours existence of court order so as to allow that a person be deprived of liberty. The Constitutional Court of the Republic of Macedonia similarly insists on this condition in a number of its decisions. In that sense, no person may be deprived of liberty if legal guarantees have not been respected consistently. The court order is regarded as one of the most important such guarantees. In that way, it has been left to the judiciary to make an unbiased assessment of the facts which indicate to whether a person has violated the law. Arrest without court order is regarded as an exception to this rule. The court may issue an order for forced apprehension, i.e. arrest if: a decision for detention has been adopted; if the regularly summoned defendant has failed to appear and has not provided justification for absence or if no orderly delivery has been possible of the summons, while the circumstances of the case clearly indicates that the defendant has been avoiding to receive the summons; or when a court warrant has been issued. The order shall be enforced by the Ministry of the Interior. The person arrested by a court order shall be without delays brought before the competent investigative judge without delays. 
In case when the deprivation of liberty has been done under an issued warrant for person escaped from serving a prison sentence, the person shall be handed over to the penitentiary, i.e. the institution for serving criminal and misdemeanour sanctions.  Pursuant to Article 12 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia and Article 188 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, the police may only by derogation deprive a person of liberty without a court order in cases when the person has been caught while perpetrating the offence (in flagranti) or in case of danger of delay (that has to be proved before court), if concurrently some of the reasons for arrest have been met. The Law on Criminal Procedure specifically defines situations when the suspected may be put in custody in police station, over a maximum of 24 hours. Authorised officers of the Ministry of the Interior may place the person in police custody only when necessary in order to determine his/her identity, verify an alibi, collect necessary data for the procedure, and if simultaneously conditions for detention have been met. In all other cases, the suspect must be immediately brought before an investigative judge who shall decide on the lawfulness of the deprivation of liberty and shall order his/her release if no conditions for arrest exist (Article 188 of the Law on Criminal Procedure). The detention may not exceed 24 hours from the moment the person has been detained. After this time, the detainee shall be either acquitted or brought before an investigative judge.  The person shall be detained in specialised police stations. The official person of the Ministry keeps records for every detainee, entering the following data: day and time of detention; reasons for deprivation of liberty; reasons for detention; the time when he/she has been legally advised; marks of visible injuries; illness; mental derangement; time when his/her family, attorney, doctor, and diplomatic-consular offices have been notified; data on interrogation; whether he/she has been transferred to another police station; acquittal or bringing before the court; and other relevant data. When the detained person has been brought before an investigative judge, the judge shall ex officio examine the legality of detention for which he/she adopts a decision. If the detained person has not been brought before an investigative judge, he/she may request examination of the legality of detention within 30 days, for which the investigative judge adopts a decision. An appeal against the decision may be filed within 48 hours, and a decision on the appeal shall be adopted within three days. The Law on Criminal Procedure in Article 185 stipulates that only the investigative judge of a competent court may order detention. In this manner, any other body apart from the court has been excluded from the possibility to decide upon detention. The investigative judge may order a short-term detention of 48 hours of the detainee upon the proposal of the public prosecutor if there is reasonable doubt that the detainee has performed a crime and when the legal terms for detention have been met. This short-term detention is pronounced if the public prosecutor has not initiated an investigation or pressed charges against the person. If within 48 hours the public prosecutor does not request detention, the accused person shall be acquitted. The investigative judge may order a 24-hour detention for the detainee upon the proposal of the public prosecutor if there is reasonable doubt that the person has committed a crime and legal bases for detention are met (the detainee hides; his/her identity cannot be determined; there is danger of escape; there is danger of destruction of evidence for the crime; and danger of hindering the investigation by influencing witnesses, aides or abettors), when detention is necessary to determine his/her identity or verify his/her alibi. The investigative judge may only extend this detention for another 24 hours. An appeal against the detention decision may be filed within 5 hours, and within three hours upon the receipt, the competent bodies shall adopt a decision on the appeal (Article 186- of the Law on Criminal Procedure). 
The time of the detention must be reduced to the shortest necessary duration. All bodies involved in criminal proceedings and those that provide legal assistance are obliged to act with particular urgency if the defendant is in detention. Throughout the proceedings, the detention shall be cancelled as soon as the reasons cease to exist on the basis of which it has been ordered.  Detention by a investigative judge’s order or detention ordered by a Chamber for the first time during an investigation may last up to 30 days from the day of deprivation of liberty. Any deprivation of liberty shall count to the duration of detention. Upon an elaborated proposal by investigative judge or public prosecutor, the trial Chamber of the first-instance court may extend the duration of detention by up to 60 days. If a crime is in question punishable by a prison sentence of at least 5 years, after the expiration of the 60 days period, the Chamber of the immediately superior court may extend the detention by up to 90 days, upon an elaborated proposal by an investigative judge. The overall duration of the detention in the course of investigation, including the deprivation of liberty prior to the detention decision, may not be longer than 180 days. After the expiry of this term, the detainee shall be immediately acquitted. (For less serious offences for which summary proceedings are prescribed, detention may last only until necessary to conduct certain investigative actions, but no longer than 8 days.) The latest Amendments to the Law on Criminal Procedure introduced absolute time frames for duration of detention, after charges have been brought and until the completion of the main hearing. Namely, detention may last up to a year for criminal offences punishable by a prison sentence of up to 15 years, and up to two years for offences punishable with life imprisonment.  For more details please refer to answer to question No. 12, Chapter I Political Criteria, D Judicial System. 
27. To what extent is victim support provided? 
In accordance with Article 50 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 1/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03), every citizen may invoke the protection of freedoms and rights,  as stipulated by the Constitution, before the courts of law and the Constitutional Court of the Republic of Macedonia, in a procedure based upon the principles of priority and urgency.  Victims of crimes may exercise their right to protection by filing criminal charges to the public prosecutor. As regards offences subject to private suits, victims may file them to a court of law. If the public prosecutor drops the charges of a criminal offence subject to prosecution ex officio, the victim i.e. the injured party has a right to take over the prosecution as a subsidiary prosecutor. If, as a result of a criminal offence the person has been damaged, he/she has a right to file a damages claim, and if he/she is referred to a lawsuit, the case shall be resolved in a civil suit in accordance with general provisions on indemnity.  According to Article 96 of the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04), resulting from a criminal act may be litigated in criminal procedure upon the proposal of authorised person, only if such litigation is not prolonged. may refer to indemnities, return of objects or cancellation of a legal action. In case of insurance, such claims may be filed to an insurance company. The proposal may be submitted not later than the end of the principal process before the basic court. The claimant is obliged to define his/her claim and submit evidence. Authorised persons may renounce the proposal and may exercise their right through a civil suit before the end of the principal process.  In case the defendant has been found guilty, the court brings a full or partial ruling on the property claim, and if the evidence presented is incomplete the court shall rule only on the counts of accusation, while the amount of the claim or the rest of the amount shall be subject to additional ruling. In case the defendant has been found not guilty or if the charges have been dropped, the court shall refer the injured party to claim his/her property claims in litigation. (Article 101) The Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03,and 19/04) also contains provisions regarding the protection of the injured party. Namely, pursuant to Article 99, the injured party that has been referred to a litigation with regard to his/her property claims may demand that this be settled from the confiscated value, if he/she starts a litigation within six months from the day the ruling has been effective and if he/she demands indemnity from confiscated value within three months from the day the ruling has been effective. The injured party that has not petitioned a property claim may request indemnities from confiscated value if, in order to determine his/her claims, he/she has filed a lawsuit within three months from the day he/she learned about the ruling on confiscation; and not later than two years from the day the ruling on confiscation has been effective provided that within three months from the day the ruling determining his/her claims has been effective, he or she demands indemnities from the confiscated value. The indemnification shall be determined on the basis of the indemnification rules laid down in the Law on Obligations (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 18/01, 4/02, and 05/03). The indemnification includes a compensation of all damages (both material and non-material) that the injured person has suffered. In case of death, body injury or health damages a financial compensation shall be determined in a form of rent covering treatment costs, losses due to working inability, losses due to missed or reduced promotion chances, etc. In addition, the Law on Obligations also prescribes indemnities for non-material damages. Pursuant to Article 189 of the Law on Obligations in case of sufferings due to physical pain, mental pain resulting from decreased life activities, disfigurement, defamation, violation of freedom or rights, death of a relative and fear suffered thereafter, the court shall rule in favour of equitable financial benefit (without regard to the material indemnification or its absence) if the intensity of pain and fear and their duration justifies it. In case of death of a person or in case of severe disability, the court may award his/her family members (spouse, children and parents) equitable indemnification for their mental pains (Article 190). The court determines the following to be special cases of liability: liability for terrorist acts, public demonstrations or public events; liability for corruption by civil servants in the line of duty; and liability for damages due to violent criminal acts perpetrated by an unidentified offender. In all such cases the state shall indemnify damages (Articles 166, 167 and 168). Furthermore, the Law on Criminal Procedure has been amended by a new Chapter XIX-a, "The Protection of Witnesses, Collaborators of Justice and Victims”. Namely, the public prosecutor, the investigative judge and the Chamber president shall undertake activities for securing efficient protection of witnesses, collaborators of justice, and victims in the course of the procedure, if they appear as witnesses, and if there is clear and present danger of their exposure to intimidation, threats to life, health or physical integrity or if their protection is required. The protection is carried out in a special mode of interrogation and participation into the procedure. In such cases witnesses shall only be heard in the presence of the public prosecutor and the investigative judge, or the Chamber president and in a location that guarantees the protection of witness's identity. In addition, other communication and telecommunication devices may be used upon the witness's consent. Transcripts from the minutes containing the witness’s testimonies without his/her signature shall be submitted to the defendant and his/her attorney, who may pose questions to the witness in writing through the court.  Protection may also be carried out through employing the Programme for the Protection of Witnesses. A request to participate into the Programme is filed to the Public Prosecutor of the Republic of Macedonia, and submitted by the competent public prosecutor, investigative judge or the Chamber president. If circumstances allow such participation, the Public Prosecutor of the Republic of Macedonia submits a proposal to a competent body to adopt a decision on participation in the Programme. In line with the objective for protection of victims of illegal trafficking in human beings a Shelter based in Skopje has been established within the Ministry of the Interior. It sheltered 131 women in the course of 2003, all from Eastern European Countries (56 Romanian, 51 Moldovan, 14 Bulgarian, 9 Ukrainian and 1 Belarusian). Two percent of all are persons involved in juvenile prostitution. As far as activities reflecting regional co-operation on the issue, it is important to note that in June 2004, Ministers of the Interior and representatives of countries in Southeast Europe signed a Declaration on Prosecuting Perpetrators of Criminal Acts of Human Trafficking and the Protection of the victims (witnesses).   
28. What guarantees are in place to ensure a public hearing? Give details of the circumstances in which limitations may be placed on the public pronouncement of judgements and the extent to which this occurs. 
Publicity in the court proceedings and the mixed composition of the court essentially contribute to the external and internal control of hearings, and indirectly to the promotion of the defendant’s right to defence. Pursuant to Article 102 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 1/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03), debates before courts and the pronouncing of verdicts are public. The public may be excluded only in cases determined by law. The principle of publicity refers to debates before courts in general, and it is equally applied in criminal and civil proceedings. Article 103 of the Constitution sets forth that court tries cases in chamber, while a law prescribes when a case is tried by a single judge. Lay judges also participate in hearings, when so stipulated by law. Similarly as judges, lay judges may not be taken accountable for opinions or decisions made when rendering judgement. Trial parties and their representatives (attorneys) and third parties not directly interested in the outcome of criminal proceedings (general public) have a right to attend the main hearing and the pronouncing of the verdict. The principle of publicity is contained in Article 279 of the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) according to which the main hearing is public. The main hearing may only be attended by adults. The Law determines cases when the public or a part of the public may be excluded from the main hearing: a) for the protection of secrecy; b) for keeping public order; c) for the protection of morality; d) for the protection of personal matters of the defendant, witness or the injured party; and e) for the protection of the interest of a juvenile. The court may exclude the public anytime from the opening until the completion of the main hearing ex officio or upon the proposal of the parties, but only after they have been heard. (Article 280) The exclusion does not refer to the parties, the injured, or their representatives and attorney, but to third parties participating in the main hearing. The Chamber may allow the attendance of certain official persons at hearings in which the public has been excluded, and upon the request of the defendant the Chamber may allow the attendance of their spouses or partners and their close relatives (first-degree blood relatives, foster-parent, foster-child, brother, sister or custodian). The Chamber President shall warn the persons attending the main hearing at which the public has been excluded that they are obliged to keep matters from the hearing in confidence and shall notify them that revealing such secrets is a criminal offence. (Article 281) The decision on exclusion of the public is adopted by the Chamber which must explicate and publish such decision. This decision may only be challenged in the appeal against the verdict.  (Article 282) The main hearing may only be attended by adults. If a witness younger than 14 years of age is heard, the Chamber may decide to exclude the public during his/her hearing. The juvenile attending the main hearing as a witness or as an injured party shall be removed from the courtroom as soon as his/her presence is deemed not necessary. (Article 316) 
The publicity of the main hearing entails a public announcement of the verdict. Pursuant to Article 337, the verdict is pronounced and published on behalf of citizens of the Republic of Macedonia, and pursuant to Article 344, the Chamber President in the presence of the parties, their legal representatives, plenipotentiaries and attorneys shall publicly read the verdict and give a brief explication. The public announcement shall also be delivered when the party, legal representative, plenipotentiary or the defence attorney are absent. In that case the announcement is carried out before the present public. If the public has been excluded from the main hearing, the announcement of the verdict shall be carried out at a public sitting. The Chamber shall decide whether to exclude the public during the announcement of the reasons for the verdict. This only refers to cases when public has been excluded from the main hearing.  The Law on Criminal Procedure in the part regulating the procedure on juveniles includes several provisions relating to the public, i.e. the exclusion of the public in proceedings against juveniles. Pursuant to Article 467 of the Law, in a proceeding against a juvenile the public shall always be excluded. The Chamber may allow the attendance at the main hearing of persons engaged in education of juveniles or in suppression of juvenile crime, as well as academics. In the course of the main hearing the Judicial Council may decide to exclude all persons except for the public prosecutor, the defender and the representative of the guardian institution. During the exhibit of certain evidence or parties’ speech, the Chamber may order a removal of the juvenile from the sitting.  The Law also prescribes certain restrictions regarding the publication of the verdict and information of the public on the proceeding against the juvenile. For instance, without the court’s approval the proceeding against a juvenile or a verdict passed must not be published. Only the approved part of the proceeding or verdict may be published; however, the juvenile’s name or other data revealing his/her identity must be excluded. Decisions and other information regarding the juvenile may not be submitted through their exposure on the court's information board. With regard to the civil procedure, pursuant to the Law on Litigation Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 33/98, 44/02) public trial is also one of the fundamental principles. In the course of the civil procedure, the public may be excluded by the force of law in statutory disputes (paternal, maternal and marriage disputes). The court may exclude the public by a decision if the interests of keeping an official, business or personal secret require privacy; if interests of public order or moral reasons require privacy; and if measures on securing the order as stipulated in the Law on Litigation Procedure (Articles 291-295) do not provide an unimpeded debate. Within the project of monitoring the implementation of international standards on fair trials in domestic courts and assessment of the courts’ functioning in the Republic of Macedonia, the Coalition of citizens’ associations “All for Fair Trial” prepared a final report in September 2004 based on monitored trials from July 2003 until July 2004. The report states that 643 criminal cases and 720 civil cases have been observed. With regard to the implementation of the principle of public trial, it has been determined that only in five criminal cases the public has been partially or fully excluded by a court’s decision (in one of the cases the public has been partially excluded for lack of space in the courtroom; in another the public has been excluded for reasons of privacy of the defendant, witness or the plaintiff; and in three cases the public has been excluded for reasons of protecting a juvenile’s interests). As far as civil cases are concerned in 696 out of 720 monitored trials (or 96,7%) the main hearing has been public, and only in 24 cases or 3,3% the public has been excluded. All of the 24 cases were related to a divorce. The aforementioned provisions are in accordance with the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, the International Covenant for Civil and Political Rights and the European Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Freedoms. 
29. Is the presumption of innocence a central part of your criminal justice system and, if so, how is it applied in practice? 
The  presumption of innocence is stipulated in Article 13 of the Constitution (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 1/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) and Article 2, paragraph 1 of the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04). Pursuant to these provisions, a person indicted for an offence shall be presumed innocent until his/her guilt is established by a final court decision. The second paragraph, Article 2 of the Law establishes the in dubio pro reo principle as one of the significant consequences of the application of the principle of presumption of innocence. Namely, in cases of doubt, the existence or non-existence of facts that constitute the character of a criminal offence or upon which an application depends of certain provision of the Criminal Code, is established by the court in a manner favourable for the defendant. It follows from the principle of presumption of innocence that the burden of proof rests on the prosecution. The defendant is freed from the obligation to prove his/her innocence; he/she has a right to remain silent and not respond to allegations. A defendant may not be forced to testify against him/herself, his/her immediate family or to admit his/her guilt. Extorting a confession is forbidden and punishable (Article 10 of the Law on Criminal Procedure) and a court decision may not be based upon statements extorted under force, threat or other similar means (Article 210, paragraph 7). In line with the principle of presumption of innocence is the provision of Article 1 of the Law on Criminal Procedure under which prior to a final court judgment, rights and freedoms of a defendant and of other persons may be restricted only to a necessary extent and under conditions prescribed by law. In addition, Article 11 of the Law on Criminal Procedure determines that a person who has been illegally deprived of liberty, detained or convicted, is entitled to compensation of damages from the budget, to rehabilitation and to other rights established by law. The Law stipulates another procedural consequence of the principle of presumption of innocence. Namely, Article 342 sets forth that the court shall pronounce a judgment acquitting the defendant unless it has been proved that he/she has committed the offence for which accused (acquittal due to lack of evidence).  The Constitutional and legal provisions which regulate the presumption of innocence are in compliance with the European Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms, the Universal Declaration of Human Rights and the International Covenant on the Civil and Political Rights. 30. Regarding the rights of defence, please provide information on how the following rights are guaranteed in legislative and practical terms. (Please comment on the allocation of resources and the institutional framework in place to facilitate the exercise of these rights.) a) The right of the defendant to be informed promptly in a language which s/he understands of the nature and cause of the accusation against him/her; b) The defendant’s right to have adequate time and facilities for the preparation of his/her defence; c) The right to defend oneself in person or through legal assistance of one’s own choosing; d) The right to examine, or have examined, witnesses against him/her and to obtain the attendance and examination of witnesses on his/her behalf under the same conditions as witnesses against him/her; e) The right to have the free assistance of an interpreter if s/he cannot understand or speak the language used in the court. 
In reforming the criminal procedure, particular attention has been dedicated to the defendant’s rights to fair trial with the rights and practice stipulated in the European Convention on Human Rights. The rights to defence mentioned here, the list of which is not exhaustive, reflect only a number of aspects of the fair trial concept in criminal proceedings guaranteed to the defendant as minimum rights, in order to give him/her a fair possibility to defend from state charges. 
a)  The Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) contains several provisions that regulate the right of the defendant to be informed in the language he/she understands on the accusations against him/her. Article 3 determines that the person summoned, apprehended or deprived of freedom must immediately be informed in a language he/she understands on the reasons for summoning, apprehension or deprivation of freedom and on any other charges against him/her, as well as on his/her rights. The person must not be compelled to give a statement. Article 4 of the Law on Criminal Procedures determining the minimum rights to which every defendant is entitled stipulates the right of the defendant to be informed immediately in a language he/she understands and in detail on the charges and evidence against him/her. If the court violates the provisions on the language use in the course of the procedure it makes an essential violation which can be basis for disputing the verdict (Article 355). These general provisions have been further elaborated. In the first interrogation of the defendant in investigation (Article 210), the body conducting the interrogation is obliged to notify the defendant of the charges against him/her or of the grounds of suspicion existing against him/her. The same obligation has been stipulated for cases when prior to the adoption of decision for conducting investigation, the investigative judge shall interrogate the person against whom investigation is requested (Article 152). Pursuant to Article 254, the bill of indictment includes detailed information on the offence he/she has been charged with, its legal qualification, evidence it has been based upon, etc. Somewhat more summarised information shall be contained in the summons (Article 176), the decision for detention (Article 185) and the decision to conduct investigation (Articles 151 and 152). However, significantly less detailed information is prescribed for summary proceedings for less serious criminal offences, especially given that the indictment proposal (Article 421) includes only a brief description of the criminal offence, and the defendant has not been previously heard so as to inform him/her within the meaning of Article 210, paragraph 2. 
b)  The defendant's right to have adequate time and facilities for the preparation of his/her defence has been regulated in Article 4, paragraph 2 and subparagraph 2 of the Law on Criminal Procedure as one of the minimum rights of the defendant in the criminal procedure.  The defendant is given enough time to prepare for the main hearing. Pursuant to Article 273, paragraph 3 of the Law on Criminal Procedure the summons to the defendant must be submitted in such a way that between the day of submitting the summons and the day of the main hearing the defendant is given adequate time to prepare his/her defence, or at least 8 days. In the event of summary proceedings (for crimes punishable with imprisonment of up to three years or a fine) this period is at least three days.  The court may suspend the main hearing to allow time for the preparation of the defence if the plaintiff changes the indictment, or modifies it with new charges on crimes carried out or detected in the course of the main hearing.  As regards the time given for submitting appeals, the Law prescribes 15 days (in summary proceedings it is 8 days) from the day of submission of the verdict’s transcript.  One of the conditions for the defence preparation is the right to inspection into the procedural documents. Pursuant to Article 69 of the Law, the defendant has a right to review procedural documents and subjects serving as evidence from the moment of the indictment, i.e. from the time the investigative judge before adopting a decision on opening an investigation performs the required investigation actions. The same right applies to the defendant, but only after he/she has been examined (Article 124).  Pursuant to Article 166 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, if before the completed investigation the investigative judge finds that it is in the interest of the defence to introduce the defendant and his/her attorney to important evidence collected during the investigation, he/she shall inform them within certain period of time that they are entitled to have access to the material and records referring to the evidence and that they may give proposals for presentation of new evidence.  The Law on Criminal Procedure does not contain provisions on the basis of which the public prosecution would be obliged to reveal evidence in favour of the defence; however, the obligation for objectivity must be taken into consideration (the obligation to pay equal attention to facts charging the defendant and those in his/her favour, as stipulated in Article 14 of the Law on Criminal Procedure). 
c)  Article 4 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, within the minimum rights prescribed to every defendant also stipulates the right of the defendant to defend him/herself in person or through legal assistance of his/her choosing. If the defendant cannot pay for an attorney, he/she is entitled to receive free defence in the interest of justice.  The defendant’s presence is one of the prerequisites for the main hearing.  Article 292, paragraph 3 of the Law on Criminal Procedure determines the conditions when the defendant may be tried in his/her absence, i.e. if the defendant is a fugitive or not available to the state agencies and there are particularly significant reasons to be prosecuted although absent. In the event the defendant is tried in his/her absence the Law guarantees him/her the right to a defence attorney (pursuant to Article 66 of the Law on Criminal Procedure the defendant tried in absence must have an attorney at the time the decision on a trial in his/her absence is adopted), as well as the option to reopen the procedure in case the defendant and his/her attorney submit a request for reopening of the procedure within the period of one year as of the day the convict has learnt of the verdict pronounced in his absence (Article 398 of the Law on Criminal Procedure). The defendant is present at the main hearing from the beginning until the closure, and his/her presence is active. The defendant has a right to propose the determination of new facts and present new evidence until the closure of the main hearing, as well as to examine the co-defendants, witnesses and experts. An exception to this rule is the option to temporarily remove the defendant from the main hearing if he/she disturbs the order in the courtroom (Article 287).  The defendant may also be removed if other defendants or witnesses refuse to give a statement in his/her presence or if circumstances imply that his/her presence prevents the other defendants to tell the truth. The latter is carried out under the condition that the defence attorney is present and the defendant has been informed about the content of their statements.   As regards summary proceedings, if the defendant does not appear at the main hearing and if he/she has been properly summoned or the summons could not be delivered due to change of address or residence, the court may decide to hold the main hearing in his/her absence only if his/her presence is not necessary and if he/she has been examined. Juveniles must not be tried in their absence.   The right to an attorney is a constitutionally guaranteed right. Pursuant to Article 12 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, the person summoned or detained has a right to an attorney in the police station or in court procedures.  This right has been implemented in Article 3, paragraph 2 of the Law on Criminal Procedure according to which the suspect or the defendant must first be clearly advised on his/her right to remain silent, his/her right to consult a lawyer and to acquire an attorney of his/her choosing during the examination. Pursuant to Article 63 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, the suspect in the preliminary proceedings, i.e. the defendant before the first examination must be advised that he/she has a right to an attorney of his/her choosing and that the attorney may attend his/her examination. The defendant may defend him/herself alone and is free to choose and appoint an attorney. This right is not absolute as the defendant may only appoint a lawyer as an attorney, and Article 66 of the Law on Criminal Procedure stipulates the cases of mandatory defence. Hence, if the defendant is hearing or visually impaired, or incapable of defending himself/herself, or in case of a criminal procedure against him/her for a crime punishable with a life sentence, he/she must be represented by a defence attorney from the first hearing. In the event the defendant has been sentenced to detention, he/she shall have a defence attorney while detained. Following the indictment for a crime punishable with ten or more years of imprisonment, the defendant must have an attorney at the time of delivery of the bill of indictment against him/her. The defendant tried in absence must have an attorney upon the decision on his/her trial in absence. If, in cases of mandatory defence the defendant has not appointed an attorney, the President of the Court shall appoint an ex officio attorney for the rest of the proceedings until the verdict comes into effect. The defendant shall be informed on the appointment of an ex officio attorney along with the issuance of the indictment.  Except cases of mandatory defence, the Law on Criminal Procedure stipulates a right to free legal assistance in cases when the defendant cannot pay the defence costs. When conditions of mandatory defence have not been met (Article 67), and the procedure is underway for crimes punishable with over one year imprisonment, the defendant may be appointed a defence attorney upon his/her request, provided that his/her property status would not allow him/her to cover defence costs.  As regards defence costs, even when the defendant has been found guilty he/she is exempted from costs when the attorney has been appointed by the court (for reasons of lack of funds of the defendant). Same applies in cases when the payment of such costs would raise the issue of the ability to support him/herself or his/her family (Article 93). The defendant may have the advice of defence attorney during the course of the entire proceedings. A defendant who has been detained may exchange letters and talk with the defence attorney freely and without supervision (Article 70). Only by derogation, this right may be subject to supervision in the course of the proceedings if the detention has been determined due to a risk of influence over the evidence (Article 184, paragraph 2). Such an order may only be given by the investigative judge, who is sole authorised to review the written correspondence and to be present during conversation. 
d)  The right of the defendant to examine the witnesses is one of the minimum rights the defendant has been guaranteed pursuant to Article 4 of the Law on Criminal Procedure. The defendant is entitled to this right both in the course of the investigation and the main hearing. Namely, the defendant and his/her attorney may attend the examination of witnesses and have them examined by the investigative judge. Upon the judge's approval they may also directly examine witnesses. The defendant and the attorney have a right to request that their remarks be recorded in the minutes as far as the implementation of certain investigative actions is concerned, and they may request presentation of particular evidence. Witnesses at main hearings are examined in the defendant’s presence, and when the Chamber President closes the examination of a particular witness or expert the Chamber members may directly examine the witness. Upon the Chamber President’s approval, the defendant and his/her attorney may directly examine witnesses and experts. The President may prohibit the examination or the response to an already posed question if such question is inappropriate (i.e. a suggestive question which implies the answer or a capricious question which takes as a starting point that the defendant has confessed something that he/she has actually not – Article 211) or if it does not refer to the subject. In that case the parties may request the Chamber's deliberation on the issue. In practice, the Court dominates the examination of witnesses which arises from its obligation to determine all the relevant facts in the line of duty. Namely, pursuant to Article 14 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, courts and state bodies are obliged to truthfully and fully determine facts relevant for bringing a decision. They are bound to pay equal attention and determine both facts on behalf of the defendant and facts against him/her. However, parties until the closure of the main hearing may propose a presentation of new facts and collect new evidence.  Consequently, the defence may propose the examination of new witnesses, yet the court is the deciding factor on whether the examination of the proposed witnesses would contribute to the establishment of truth. Otherwise the court may refuse to examine them. This authorisation of the court is somewhat restricted by its obligation to always note the reasons on why it has refused the parties’ proposals and the reasons on why it has decided not to directly examine the witness or expert whose statement has been read without the parties’ consent.  Following the completion of the examination of every witness or expert, the Chamber President shall ask the parties if they have remarks. As far as probative proceedings, after their closure the Chamber President shall ask the parties if they have proposals on their modification.  The Law on Criminal Procedure stipulates that all evidence relevant to rightful decision-making must be presented before the court (the principle of directness). This principle has been reinforced by the obligation to directly examine a person if proving a fact is based on his/her witnessing. The examination may not be replaced by the reading of minutes of a previous hearing. The Law also determines the cases excluding the principle of directness, i.e. the approval to read minutes containing witnesses’ statements. Namely, pursuant to Article 325 of the Law, minutes of witnesses' statements may be read upon the Chamber's decision only if the examined persons have died, have suffered mental illnesses or cannot be traced, or if their presence before the court is deemed impossible or hindered due to age, disease or other important reasons and if witnesses and experts refuse to give statements without legal grounds.  
e)  Pursuant to Article 3, paragraph 1 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, the person summoned, apprehended or detained must immediately be informed in a language he/she understands on the reasons of summoning, apprehending or detaining and on any indictments against him/her, as well as on his/her rights. He/she may not be extorted a statement. Any accused person has a right to be informed immediately in a language he/she understands on the indictments and evidence against him/her (Article 4). Pursuant to Article 6 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, official language in the course of criminal proceedings is the Macedonian language and its Cyrillic alphabet. A language spoken by at least 20% of the citizens may also be used in the proceedings, pursuant to the Law. In accordance with Article 7 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, the defendant, the injured party, the plaintiff, witnesses and other persons participating in the procedure and speaking a language other than Macedonian, have a right to use their language and alphabet in the course of preliminary investigation proceedings and the main hearing, as well as in procedures concerning appeals. The Court shall provide oral interpreting as well as translations of documents and other written material. In addition the court shall provide translated written material of importance to the procedure or the defence.  Other parties and witnesses in the court procedure have a right to free interpreting if they do not understand or speak the language in which the procedure is conducted.  The person shall be given legal advice on his/her right to interpreting, which shall be noted in the minutes.  The translation or interpreting is carried out by a court authorised interpreter. Pursuant to Article 8 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, indictments, appeals and other documents are submitted to the court in the language in which the procedure is conducted. Citizens who speak an official language other than Macedonian may submit their submissions in the language they speak and in its alphabet. The court shall translate the submissions and present them to other parties in the procedure. Same applies to other persons who do not speak or understand Macedonian and its Cyrillic alphabet. The defendant that does not understand the language in which the procedure is conducted is given translations into the language he/she has used in the course of the procedure. Foreign citizens deprived of freedom or in detention may submit their submission in their language, and in other cases under conditions of reciprocity. Pursuant to Article 9 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, indictments, appeals and other submissions are submitted to the court in the language in which the procedure is conducted. Citizens who speak an official language other than Macedonian shall receive summons, rulings and other written correspondence into their language. A defendant in detention, in prison or confined in a health institution under compulsory psychiatric treatment shall receive translations of submissions into the language he/she has used in the procedure. The defendant shall also receive a translation of the verdict in the language he/she has used in the course of the procedure. All expenses regarding the right to translator shall be covered by the budget. The aforementioned provisions are in accordance with the International Covenant for Civil and Political Rights and the European Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Freedoms. With respect to determining funds and an institutional framework enabling the exercise of the aforementioned rights, it is important to note that the Law on Criminal Procedure, Chapter IX, also regulates the issues of costs of the criminal procedure. Namely, criminal procedure costs are costs generated from the beginning of its initiation until its closure, and costs for the undertaken investigative actions prior to the investigation. These costs comprise costs for translators, interpreters as well as awards and disbursements for the defendant. In proceedings for crimes prosecuted ex officio costs are paid in advance by the body carrying out the procedure and are charged afterwards from the persons obliged to recompense those costs, as prescribed by the Law. The translation costs occurring from the implementation of provisions referring to the right to a free assistance of an interpreter will not be charged to persons who according to the provisions of the Law are obliged to compensate costs. When the court finds the defendant guilty the verdict shall note that he/she is obliged to recompense the costs of the criminal procedure. The decision determining payment of costs may exempt the defendant from his/her duty to recompense fully or partially the costs of the procedure if payment of such costs would raise the issue of the ability to support him/herself or his/her family. When the proceedings are suspended; the court finds the defendant not guilty or the charges have been dropped, the verdict shall state that the costs of the criminal procedure are to be covered by budgetary funds. In accordance with the Law on Court Budget (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 60/03) judicial budget costs comprise ordinary and capital costs. Costs of the proceedings are covered by ordinary costs. 
31. Provide information about the elaboration and implementation of legislation regarding the following legal concepts: a) The principle that a person cannot be prosecuted for something that was not a criminal offence in national or international law at the time when it took place; b) Non-application of a heavier sentence than was applicable at the time the criminal offence was committed; c) Proportionality of the severity of the penalty to the criminal offence. 
a) The principle of legality is defined as a constitutional principle in the legal system of the Republic of Macedonia. Pursuant to Article 14, paragraph 1 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 1/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03),  person may not be punished for an offence which had not been declared an offence punishable by law, or by other acts, prior to it being committed, and for which no punishment had been prescribed. The principle of legality has been more precisely formulated in the definition of criminal offences and prescription of criminal sanctions. According to Article 1 of the Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04), a person may not be sentenced to a punishment or some other penal action for an act, which prior to its being committed, had not been determined by law to be a crime and for which no punishment had been prescribed by law. The same principle is also regulated by the Law on Misdemeanours (Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia, Nos. 15/97, 35/97). The Law (Article 3) prescribes that a person may not be punished for misdemeanour for an act which, prior to its being committed, had not been determined by law as a misdemeanour and for which no punishment had been prescribed by law. 
b) One of the most important legal consequences from the principle of legality is the prohibition of retroactivity of laws prescribing punishable acts and punishments. The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia clearly determines in Article 52, paragraph 4 that laws and other regulations may not have a retroactive effect, except in cases when it is more favourable for the citizens. In the Criminal Code this constitutional provision has been specified as a rule of validity of legal norms determining criminal offences and criminal sanctions. Article 3 of the Criminal Code prescribes that the offender may be punished with the law that had been applicable at the time when the offence had been committed. If the law has been changed once or several times after the crime had been committed, the law which is more lenient to the offender may be applied. If a new alternative, security or correctional measure has been prescribed, it may be pronounced only if it is compatible with an earlier prescribed measure and if it is not less favourable for the offender. The criteria for assessment of the stringency or lenience of consecutively adopted laws have neither been normatively defined by the Constitution nor by the Criminal Code, and are resolved in the framework of judicial practice in every single case. In practice, Macedonian judiciary has accepted that the law resulting in a more favourable outcome for the offender is more lenient.  
c) The proportionality of the punishment’s stringency to the criminal offence has been incorporated into Article 2 of the Criminal Code. Pursuant to this Article, the protection of freedoms and rights of citizens and other fundamental values as well as the use of criminal and legal coercion when it is necessary for the prevention of activities detrimental to society are a basis for determining criminal offences and prescribing sanctions. Article 4 of the Criminal Code prescribes types of criminal sanctions applied to offenders (punishments, alternative, security or correctional measures), and Article 5 prescribes the limitations in execution of sanctions. Namely, the offender may be deprived of certain rights at the time of the sanction’s execution only to the extent appropriate with the nature and content of the sanction and only if it secures the respect of the offender’s personality and his/her personal dignity. In order to ensure proportionality of the seriousness of punishment with the offence, the Criminal Code includes provisions for meting out of the punishment within the determined framework (Articles 39-47). They stipulate that when determining the punishment, the court shall take into consideration the criminal liability of the perpetrator, seriousness of the offence and the intended purpose of punishment. The court is obliged to take into account all the mitigating and aggravating circumstances. Relevant for the proportionality of the punishment and the offence are also the provisions for alleviating the punishment when the offence has been committed under particularly mitigating circumstances; acquittal of punishment for the purpose of eliminating the detrimental consequences of the criminal offence etc. The foregoing constitutional and legal provisions are in compliance with the European Convention on the Protection of Human Rights and Freedoms. 
32. Please provide details on how the right not to be tried or punished twice in criminal proceedings for the same criminal offence is interpreted in your domestic law. 
Prohibition of double trial or punishment is an internationally established principle aimed at preventing that the same person is tried or punished twice for the same criminal offence (ne bis in idem). The Republic of Macedonia has been bound to this principle under the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights, which in Article 14, paragraph 7 provides that no one shall be liable to be tried or punished for an offence for which he/she has already been finally convicted or acquitted in accordance with the law. The Republic of Macedonia has undertaken similar obligation by the ratification of the Protocol No. 7 to the European Convention on Human Rights, which, like the Covenant, is a part of the internal legal order and is directly applicable in courts. In the Republic of Macedonia, the prohibition of trying or punishing twice the same persons for the same offences is a constitutional principle, stipulated in Article 14, paragraph 2 of the Constitution (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03). Under this provision, no person shall be tried in a court of law for an offence for which he/she already been tried and for which a final court decision has already been made. The Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.15/97, 44/03 and 74/04) in Article 5 contains almost the same wording which, within the meaning of the Covenant, explicitly prohibits both trying and punishing twice the same person for the same offence. The prohibition of trying and punishing twice for the same offence yields a number of legal consequences. Like all European countries, the Republic of Macedonia acknowledges the principle that after the regular legal remedies (appeals) have been exhausted, or after the time frame for their submission has expired, the verdict shall be considered final and shall attain the quality of res judicata. However, extra-legal remedies are allowed against a final verdict. Pursuant to the Amendments to the Law on Criminal Procedure of 1997, extra-legal remedies may only be filed on behalf of the defendant, although this absolute prohibition for final court decisions to be challenged to the detriment of the defendant does not arise from the aforementioned international instruments. Nevertheless, re-opening of procedure is allowed (only on behalf of the convict) if it has been proved that the verdict had been found on a false statement, if new facts or evidence have been presented and in other cases determined by law (Article 388 and 389). Extra-ordinary mitigation of punishment is allowed when circumstances appear that were not present when the verdict was pronounced or the court had no knowledge of their existence, and they would have obviously led to a less serious verdict (Articles 399 - 402). A defendant who has been sentenced to imprisonment by a final verdict may file a request for extra-ordinary renewal of deliberation of the verdict due to specific violations of the Law (Articles 411 - 415 o). Against the final court decisions and against the preceding court proceedings, the Public Prosecutor of the Republic of Macedonia may file a request for the protection of legality, in case the Law has been violated (Articles 403-410). The renewal of the procedure and the request for the protection of legality may now be also used for re-opening of procedure in cases of violation of the European Convention on Human Rights or another international treaty ratified in accordance with the Constitution.  In the domestic legal practice, certain ambiguities arose from the constitutional wording used in the provision prohibiting renewed trial or punishment of an already convicted person. This has been particularly due to the fact that the wording used therein mentions punishable acts, which means that, besides criminal offences, it also includes misdemeanours and thus involves in the delicate relationship between the misdemeanour and criminal procedure. Namely, even thus far it has not been a matter of dispute that in cases when a single offence has been incriminated both as misdemeanour and as criminal offence, only criminal proceedings shall be instituted; in case misdemeanour procedure has already been initiated, it shall be suspended. More perplexing has been the issue whether a person already convicted for a misdemeanour may be tried and punished in criminal proceedings. The court practice so far, pursuant to Article 47 of the Criminal Code, provided that in such cases, the sentence pronounced for misdemeanour shall be counted within the punishment pronounced in the criminal proceedings. However, the more recent court practice started to interpret in a more restrictive manner and in favour of the citizen this constitutional provision, i.e. to reject the possibility to try in criminal proceedings a person already convicted for misdemeanour.  
33. How is the right to vote regulated? Do women and members of ethnic minorities have equal voting rights? Please indicate what measures have been taken to follow-up on the most recent OSCE/ODIHR election reports and analyses of election laws relating to the local, presidential, and parliamentary elections. 
The right to vote is provided for and guaranteed by Article 22, paragraph 1, of the Constitution the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03), which specifies that every citizen on reaching 18 years of age acquires the right to vote. The right to vote is equal, universal and direct, and is exercised at free elections by secret ballot (Article 22, paragraph 2). Equality as a principle of the right to vote implies that the vote of each citizen has equal value, meaning that every citizen, regardless of ethnicity or gender (male or female) has an equal right to vote. The direct aspect of the right to vote rules out any possibility of the exercise of this right by proxy, as it is strictly linked to the person who votes. A logical extension of the right to vote is the right explicitly provided for by Article 23 of the Constitution, that every citizen has the right to take part in the performance of public affairs, meaning that public office is accessible to every citizen. Voting legislation in the Republic of Macedonia consists of the following laws:   The Law on the Voters’ List (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 42/02 and 35/04);   The Law on the Election of Representatives to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 42/02, 50/02 and 46/04);   The Law on Electoral Units for the Election of Representatives to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 43/02);   The Law on the Election of the President of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 20/94, 48/99 and 11/04); and   The Law on Local Elections (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 46/96, 48/96, 56/96, 12/03, 35/04, 42/04, 45/04-consolidated text, 52/04 and 60/04). After the adoption of the Amendments to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, in November 2001, taking into consideration the reports of the OSCE and ODIHR concerning elections, and following the analysis of the laws on local, presidential and parliamentary elections, voting legislation was amended with the aim of creating a legal basis for the running of fair and democratic elections. The main shortcomings of the Law on the Election of Representatives to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia were identified and a new Law on the Election of Representatives to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia was drawn up; it was enacted with the consensus of all parliamentary political parties on 14.06.2002. The Law simplified the running of elections in a single round through the introduction of a proportional electoral model involving six electoral units, based on the election of a list of candidates through proportional representation. Judges were appointed, among others, as members of the election bodies to augment the independence of decision-making in the electoral process. A higher level of professionalism was introduced in the exercise of the Representatives’ office. Voting reliability was increased with the introduction of mandatory signatures (or fingerprints), the use of a special spray and also by strengthening the security of the buildings used for voting. A 30 percent representation on the lists of candidates was guaranteed for both genders. The use of the different languages of the various communities was provided for. All internally displaced persons were given the opportunity to exercise their right to vote. The Law also stipulated the establishment of a Secretariat to support the work of the State Electoral Commission, which certainly increased the operational effectiveness of the electoral bodies. With regard to the protection of the right to vote, modifications have been made to the earlier law, specifying that any submitter of a list of candidates has the right to make an objection before the State Electoral Commission regarding the process of voting, counting and determining the result of the vote, and also to lodge a complaint against the decision of the latter before the Supreme Court of the Republic of Macedonia. Every voter and every submitter of a list of candidates, provided that he or she discovers irregularities in the election process, can make an objection before the Regional Electoral Commission, and a complaint against the decision of the latter can be lodged before the competent appellate court. The procedures for the protection of the right to vote have been simplified by these changes which are essentially in line with the observations and comments of the OSCE/ODIHR. An important part of the continuous development of the electoral administration should include more public education and information for voters to prevent practices such as “group voting” and “voting by proxy” (or “family voting”), which depart from the principle of individual voting, violate voting confidentiality and contribute to the “devaluation” of the status of women. To overcome this situation, the geographic areas (including specific polling stations) where constant problems were encountered in several successive elections should be identified and appropriate measures taken, including the replacement of election officials whose work has proved unsatisfactory. The OSCE/ODIHR recommended that, if possible, “supervisors” be appointed in these polling stations to improve the way in which elections are run. The most recent elections for the election of Representatives to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia took place on 15.09.2002. According to the final OSCE/ODIHR report, the new election laws passed in June 2002 efficiently addressed some shortcomings noticed earlier and generally safeguarded the necessary legal basis for elections. The parliamentary elections of 15.09.2002 were held in accordance with the guidelines of the OSCE and international standards concerning democratic elections. As far as the running of elections is concerned, the Law on the Election of the President of the Republic of Macedonia is linked to the Law on the Election of Representatives to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia. In the period prior to the running of presidential elections, having analysed the existing Law on the Election of the President of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 20/94 and  48/99), representatives from the international community gave their opinion stating that only slight changes in the election laws were needed in order to hold successful presidential elections. Following the sudden tragic death of the President of the Republic of Macedonia, it was necessary to amend the Law on the Election of the President of the Republic of Macedonia so as to address the question of the cessation of the term of office of the President of the Republic of Macedonia during his or her mandate. In reference to this, Article 81, paragraph 7, of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia prescribes that if the term of office of the President of the Republic terminates for any reason, the election of a new President should take place within 40 days of the day of termination. Article 82 of the Constitution states that in case of death, resignation, permanent inability to perform his or her duties, or in case of termination of the mandate in accordance with the provisions of the Constitution, the office of the President of the Republic is carried out by the President of the Assembly until a new President is elected. Paragraph 2 of the same article specifies that the decisions on the applicability of the conditions for the cessation of office of the President of the Republic are the official duty of the Constitutional Court. Taking into consideration these constitutional provisions, modifications were made by the Law Amending the Law on the Election of President of the Republic of Macedonia, enacted in March 2004 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 11/04), regarding the scheduling and holding of elections. It specified that the bodies responsible for the running of elections were the State Electoral Commission, the municipal electoral commissions and electoral boards. The content of the ballot paper and the languages in which the ballot papers for the election of the President were to be printed were determined in accordance with Amendment V of the Constitution. This provision does not deal with the consequences of the rule concerning ballot papers in cases where there are no election candidates from some of the communities. As a result, in the second round of the elections, the names of the two remaining candidates were printed only in Macedonian, as pointed out by the OSCE. The question of the election of a President in case of termination of the incumbent’s term of office was also addressed, and the deadlines for conducting all the election procedures prescribed by the Constitution (Article 81) were specified, in particular the periods concerning the scheduling of elections, the procedures for collecting signatures for candidates running for president, the submission of lists of candidates, the duration of the election campaign (Articles 10a to 10c of the Law on the Election of the President of the Republic of Macedonia). In addition to this, the protection of a citizen’s right to vote was brought into harmony with the Law on the Election of Representatives to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia. The latest (early) elections for the election of the President of the Republic of Macedonia took place on 14 April (first round) and 28 April 2004 (second round). The OSCE/ODIHR report assessed that they were held in accordance with the election recommendations of the OSCE. The 2000 local elections were held in the Republic of Macedonia in accordance with the 1996 Law on Local Elections. With regard to the running of early elections for the election of mayors, in 2003 the section of the Law on Local Elections referring to election bodies was amended in order to specify the competencies of the State Electoral Commission, to implement Amendment V as regards the use of the languages printed on ballot papers for the election of mayors and council members, to improve police protection of buildings used for voting, and to ensure greater voting reliability with the introduction of mandatory signatures (or fingerprints) and the use of a spray. More specific provisions connected to the protection of the right to vote were introduced as well. In accordance with the recommendations of the OSCE/ODIHR concerning the forthcoming local elections to be run in March 2005, the Law on Local Elections was amended with regard to the following: the scheduling and holding of elections, the bodies responsible for the running of elections, a 30 percent representation of both genders on the lists of candidates for council members in both the upper and lower halves of the list, the use of the languages of community members, election campaigns and the financing of local elections, the protection of the right to vote, as well as election monitoring. These provisions are harmonised with the Law on the Election of Representatives to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia, which, according to the OSCE recommendations, represents the groundwork for the development of a comprehensive election code. Bearing in mind the most recent recommendations of the OSCE concerning presidential elections with regard to the implementation of Amendment V to the Constitution, the section of the Law on Local Elections as regards the use of the languages of community members in the election process during local elections was amended. The amendments address the elements given below. In the units of local self-government where at least 20 percent of the citizens speak an official language other than Macedonian, the forms used for taking minutes are printed in the official language and alphabet used by at least 20 percent of the citizens in that unit of local self-government, in addition to the Macedonian language and its Cyrillic alphabet (Article 16). In the work of electoral commissions and electoral boards in the units of local self-government where at least 20 percent of the citizens speak an official language other than Macedonian, the language and alphabet used by at least 20 percent of the citizens in that unit of local self-government are in official use, in addition to the Macedonian language and its Cyrillic alphabet (Article 18). Those submitting lists in the units of local self-government where at least 20 percent of the citizens speak an official language other than Macedonian, submit the lists of candidates, including the lists for a mayor, in the official language and alphabet used by the citizens of that unit of local self-government (Article 25). In the units of local self-government where at least 20 percent of the citizens speak an official language other than Macedonian, the announcement of the lists of candidates, including the lists for a mayor, is made in the official language and alphabet used by the citizens in that unit of local self-government, in addition to the Macedonian language and its Cyrillic alphabet (Article 31). The polling stations where irregularities and violations of election laws have been recorded over several election cycles and where the work of the members of election bodies has been assessed as unsatisfactory, were identified by the State Electoral Commission. These facts will be taken into consideration while forming bodies for the forthcoming local elections at all levels, and none of these persons will be a part of the administration running the elections. The provision in the Law on Local Elections concerning the transfer of the procedures for ruling on possible complaints and objections about violations to the election process at local level is in harmony with the recommendations given in the reports of the OSCE/ODIHR monitoring missions and is in accordance with the current process of decentralisation. This means that the municipal electoral commissions are responsible for making decisions in all such cases in the first instance. On two occasions in 2004, during the organisation of the extraordinary presidential election and the referendum, the State Electoral Commission conducted a comprehensive campaign to instruct voters, in particular women and less well-educated voters, and all members of the electoral boards (15.000 persons). The same course of action is planned for the forthcoming local elections (March 2005). Concerning the participation of judges in the electoral administration, particularly regarding the judges of the Supreme Court who are members of the State Electoral Commission, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia will propose an amendment to Article 13 of the Law on the Election of Representatives to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia in order to eliminate the influence of political parties in their appointment, upon consent of the opposition.  To prevent possible manipulation with the votes of citizens of the Republic of Macedonia who are included in the voters’ lists but who have moved out of the country and have officially registered places of residence in foreign countries, supplementary amendments are planned to the Law on the Voters’ List, in addition to the existing legal guarantees. Through these amendments, this category of voters would be differentiated from those citizens who have permanent residences in the Republic of Macedonia. As described above, the changes recommended by the OSCE/ODIHR concerning election legislation have either been included into the appropriate laws and implemented in practice, or their implementation is under way. 
34. Freedom of expression: a) Provide information concerning the elaboration and implementation of legislation regarding the promotion of the freedom of expression and information in general and, specifically, freedom and pluralism of the media. Please detail measures designed to prevent interference with these freedoms. b) Describe the media landscape (written press and audiovisual sector). How are the audiovisual media financed? Is there a supervisory body for the (audiovisual) media and, if so, how does it function? Have recommendations of experts from the Council of Europe and OSCE been taken into consideration when drafting legislation in the field of media? Is the media legislation aligned to European standards? c) How is libel law organised, and what types of penalties are used? What is the general trend of court decisions in the area of freedom of expression (including the number of libel suits and other cases involving representatives of the news media)? d) Please indicate how laws on telecommunications have been, or will be, amended to take account of international recommendations. 
a) The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 1/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03), in Article 16, guarantees the right to freedom of expression as a complex right composed of the following components: freedom of conviction, conscience, thought and public expression of thought (Article 16, paragraph 1); freedom of speech, public address, public information and establishment of institutions for public information (Article 16, paragraph 2); free access to information, freedom of reception and transmission of information (Article 16, paragraph 3); right to a reply in the mass media (Article 16, paragraph 4); right to a correction in the mass media (Article 16, paragraph 5) and right to protect a source of information in the mass media (Article 16, paragraph 6). Furthermore, Article 16, paragraph 7 prohibits censorship. The right to freedom of thought is guaranteed by the Constitution without any restrictions whatsoever, and together with the freedom of personal conviction, conscience, public expression of thought and religious confession, it has been raised to the level of a fundamental human right that cannot be restricted even under exceptional circumstances (state of war or state of emergency). In addition, these freedoms and rights enjoy judicial protection, as well as direct constitutional protection by the Constitutional Court of the Republic of Macedonia.  The Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 04/02, 43/03 and 19/04) prohibits any form of coercion in general and hence any form of coercion in order to change certain position or conviction of a person. Political or religious conviction may not be grounds for restriction or deprivation of the constitutionally guaranteed rights. Breach of this proscription constitutes a criminal offence (Article 137 of the Criminal Code – violation of the equality of citizens which, among other, sanctions any deprivation or restriction of rights as guaranteed with the Constitution, the laws or international treaties, as well as any privileges granted to citizens on the basis of their political or religious convictions).  Freedom of expression and public information, freedom to establish public information institutions, as well as the freedom of access to information (access to information in international documents has been part of the right to freedom of expression) besides being regulated in the highest legal act – the Constitution, are regulated with a number of laws such as: the Broadcasting Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 20/97 , 70/03), the Law on Public Information (“Official Gazette of the SFRY”, No. 84/90),  the Telecommunications Law (Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia, Nos. 33/96, 17/98, 22/98 – consolidated text, 28/00, 04/02, 37/04). With a view to a comprehensive implementation of this right in all segments of society, as it refers not only to the media, but to all citizens, as well, articles pertaining to this right exist also in the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02), Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03 and 19/04), and the Law on Health Insurance (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 25/00, 34/00, 96/00, 50/01, 11/02 and 31/03). In addition, the Assembly passed the first reading and approved the Proposal to adopt the Law on Free Access to Public Information on its session of 26.01.2005, which also includes provisions regulating this area.   Constitutional provisions have been further elaborated in the Broadcasting Law. Namely, Article 4, paragraph 1 of this Law guarantees that by the broadcasting activities, freedom shall be provided of public expression of thought, freedom of speech, public address and public information. Paragraph 2 of the same Article provides that by the broadcasting activity, free access to information shall be provided, as well as freedom of reception and transmission of information, right to a reply and to a correction and right to protect sources of information.     Furthermore, in Article 8, the following principles are cited upon which the broadcasting activity is based: openness to free competition and information on various political ideas, cultural and other tendencies and opinions (subparagraph 2); independence and autonomy of broadcasting organisations with no right of state bodies to influence the concept and content of their programmes (subparagraph 5); prevention of monopoly in the influence of individuals or groups within broadcasting organisations (subparagraph 6); prohibition of censorship in broadcasting (subparagraph 9). Article 31, which regulates the goals that are to be achieved with broadcasting programmes, cites, among others, the following: respect of freedoms and rights of persons and citizens, their dignity and reputation (subparagraph 1); free promotion of thought and convictions and provision of comprehensive and objective information to listeners and viewers (subparagraph 2).  The Law also stipulates other measures aimed at the protection of the freedom of expression and information dissemination. For instance, Article 32 sets forth that a programme may not serve one-sidedly for the purposes of a political party or certain interests. Article 33 stipulates that the programmes should encourage, among other, the free opinion-making on particular events and issues. Article 34 highlights that state bodies and bodies of the local self-government units, as well as their representatives may not influence the process of radio and TV production or their operation.  The Law also elaborates on the right to a reply and correction (Article 62 and 63), and the access to information and protection of sources of information (Article 64).  Special measures for protection of media pluralism have been stipulated in the provisions on the restriction of media concentration. Namely, Article 10 of the Broadcasting Law stipulates that a natural or legal person may be a founder of only one commercial broadcasting company and a co-founder of only one more commercial broadcasting company, with a maximum of 25% share in its total capital. A foreign natural or legal person may co-found a commercial broadcasting company with a maximum of 25% share in its total capital. More foreign natural or legal persons, being co-founders in a commercial broadcasting company, may own a maximum of 49% in its total capital. Provisions of Article 17 provide a follow-up and pursuant to it only one concession for radio i.e. television may be issued to a single commercial broadcasting company for the territory of the Republic of Macedonia. Two concessions may be awarded for broadcasting on a local level, one for radio and another for television. However, they may be issued for different, non-neighbouring regions. In addition, a broadcasting organisation may not be founded i.e. co-founded by a political party, religious association or group, a public-office holder or a political party official (Article 11, paragraph 2). Furthermore, an additional restriction of concentration is provided by full exclusion of the possibility for associating the spheres of broadcasting and the press. A natural or legal person operating in the sphere of the press may not found an organisation or operate in broadcasting. Similarly, a broadcasting organisation may not found a press organisation or operate in the sphere of the press (Article 11, paragraph 1). There are ongoing activities in the Republic of Macedonia for the adoption of a new Broadcasting Law. The Government and the Ministry of Transport and Communications, which are competent to propose and define the broadcasting law, established in late August 2004 a working group which included all entities involved in the broadcasting sphere. The new law is expected to be adopted in spring 2005. The text also includes provisions guaranteeing and elaborating on the issues pertaining to the protection of freedom of expression and the dissemination of information. The text has been aligned with the European standards. The following laws also include provisions aimed at ensuring the free access to information by citizens, as well as enabling them to be acquainted with developments in various institutions. The state administrative bodies, pursuant to the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies adopted in 2000, are obliged to ensure efficient and legal exercise of citizens’ constitutional rights and to inform the public on their operation. Article 10 of the Law stipulates the following manners of involvement of the public in the preparation of laws within the state bodies’ competence: by public announcements on the type, content and timeframe for the adoption of the respective law or other regulation; organisation of public forums and provision of opinions by stakeholders (citizens’ associations, legal persons etc.). The Ministry of the Interior, under the Law on Internal Affairs is also obliged to inform the public on its operation. The Law provides for restricted access only to information classified as state, business or official secret, as determined by law.  Access to information in specific bodies is ensured through citizens’ participation in governing boards of public institutions, in particular when they bear broader significance for citizens, as is the case, for instance, with the Health Insurance Fund. Pursuant to the Law on Health Insurance, the Fund’s Members include representatives of the insurers. 
With regard to the freedom of expression or more specifically the access to information, particularly important is the existence of a law governing the access to public information. On the Session held on 26.01.2005 the Assembly passed the first reading and approved the Proposal to adopt the Law on Free Access to Public Information. It incorporates most of the recommendations of the Council of Europe, the OSCE as well as of non-governmental organisations active in issues of freedom of expression and access to information. These recommendations specify cases when exception may be made to the principle of free access to information. This has been regulated with Article 5 of the Draft-Law under which possessors of information may reject a request for access to information if it relates to: 1) data which has, under the law regulating classified information, been defined as a secret data for the purpose of protection of defence and security of the state; 2) data which has been defined as a business secret pursuant to law; 3) personal data whose disclosure would entail breach of protection of personal data pursuant to the law regulating protection of such data etc. The Draft-Text also stipulates the margin of appreciation doctrine, i.e. it stipulates that possessors of information may not refuse to give information, unless the consequences upon the interest which is being protected exceed the public interest for their disclosure. The text includes provisions defining the obligations of possessors of information. According to these norms, the possessor of information is obliged to provide information on the organisation, authorities and expenditure of operation, on the services it renders to citizens, and on its activities, to prepare and issue bulletins and to publish its decisions and measures by which it affects citizens’ lives and businesses in official publications and web pages. The text also regulates the procedure for the exercise of the right to free access to information. Establishment is also envisaged of a State Commission on protection of that right.  
b)  Currently, there are 12 daily newspapers published in the Republic of Macedonia, 20 weekly newspapers, 10 bi-weekly and 20 monthly magazines. In addition, 21 periodicals and 21 children magazines are published. In the sphere of the daily press, worth mentioning is the 14 million EUR investment of the German concern WAC which now owns the majority capital share in the three daily newspapers with largest circulation - Dnevnik, Utrinski vesnik and Vest. The investment was followed by a complete reshaping of the accounting and financial control in the three companies that used to publish the three dailies, which are now serviced by the Media Print Macedonia. In early February 2004, the Vreme daily was started, which, in less then a year now, has become, widely read paper in the country. One of the dailies, Veer, that existed before 1990’s and which used to have the largest circulation at that time has now been re-started.  Bearing in mind the commitment to develop a multiethnic Macedonian society, 2 out of the 12 dailies are published in Albanian – Fakti and Koha Ditore, as well as one weekly in Albanian - Lobi.  Considerable number of monthly magazines is issued by the non-governmental sector. Majority of these are specialised in a particular area.  Macedonian broadcasting industry has been organised according to the European dual broadcasting model. There is a public broadcasting service and a commercial sector. At national level, the function of the public broadcasting service is performed by the Macedonian Radio and Television which broadcasts three TV channels and three radio channels. At local level, there are 29 local public broadcasting enterprises. The total number of commercial broadcasters is 137. At national level there are eight commercial broadcasting companies, including five TV and three radio stations (Kanal 55, Antena 5 and Radio Ros). Until mid 2004, there had been only two private televisions. Then, by a Government Decision, national concessions were issued to another three TV stations - Kanal 5, Telma and ALSAT. The latter has for now been broadcasting only in the western part of Macedonia. It is a TV station broadcasting programme in Albanian. On the local level, there are 129 electronic media - 54 TV and 75 radio stations. Commercial broadcasters have been funded by commercials and sponsorship, whereas the public broadcasting service collects most of its funds through the broadcasting fees, though it is also partially funded through commercials and sponsorship. Resources collected from the broadcasting fees paid by citizens, besides being used to fund the public broadcasting service are also used for financing of projects of public interest.  The Broadcasting Council was set up with the 1997 Broadcasting Law as a body with supervisory authority over the broadcasting media. The body has been organised in line with the principles governing the broadcasting regulatory authorities; however, its capacity, under the existing law, is incomplete. Namely, on the key issues (award and revoke of licences, allocation of funds aimed at support of radio and TV production), the Council determines proposals, whereas the final decision is made by the Government. The body follows the model of a collegial body composed of nine competent persons and experts in various fields. Members to the Council are appointed by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia and their term of office is guaranteed, i.e. they may not be dismissed before their term has expired.  The Council of Europe experts have been consulted on the drafting of the existing as well as on the new Broadcasting Law. The recommendations provided by international experts have been taken into consideration with the purpose of approximation with the European standards in this area. One of their major remarks regarding the 1997 Law referred to the incomplete capacity of the Broadcasting Council. This weakness of the existing Law has been fully overcome in the working version of the draft-text of the new Broadcasting Law. Pursuant to its provisions, the Broadcasting Council shall be given full capacity. This means that it should decide autonomously on awarding or revoking licences. (The existing Law stipulates awarding of concessions.) As regards the appointment of the Broadcasting Council Members, the Proposal to Adopt a new Law stipulates a system of authorised proposers, for instance: the President of the State, the Assembly’s Committee on  Appointment, etc. Such a system shall contribute to depolitisation and democratisation of the appointment of the Council Members. The text includes a number of other provisions in which European standards have been almost fully applied, in particular in terms of the functions and duties of the public broadcasting service, protection of minors, protection of media pluralism, commercials and sponsorship, jurisdiction, etc.  Recommendations of the Council of Europe and OSCE experts have been taken into consideration when interventions were made in the working version of the Law on Free Access to Public Information which is a crucial law when the exercise of the freedom of expression is in question and of the right to access to information. More specifically, on the basis of the recommendations of these organisations and the recommendations of international non-governmental organisation Article 19, a Draft-Law on Free Access to Public Information has been prepared. The Assembly passed the first reading of the Law on its session held on 26.01.2005 and approved the proposal to adopt the Law on Free Access to Public Information. Meanwhile, round table discussions have been underway, organised by the non-governmental sector, including in particular the Transparency Macedonia. This organisation has actively participated in the drafting of the Law, while taking into account all recommendations of the international organisations. Domestic and foreign experts in the field have attended the discussions, as well as public institutions representatives, the media, etc. The intention was to raise the awareness on the substance and to point to weaknesses in order to further specify its provisions and to ensure its full implementation after its adoption. Under the Law, the Broadcasting Council shall be obliged to adopt a strategy on the development of the media which entails standards aligned with the European. Not all will be able to attain such criteria and to adapt to the new environment; thus market shall be left to those with the highest quality. Hence, given that the remarks of the international organisations have been taken into consideration in the working version of the new Broadcasting Law, as well as in the Draft Law on Free Access to Public Information, which is in parliamentary procedure, one can say that all interventions in the laws have been made in line with the recommendations of international organisations in order to incorporate in them the European standards.  As a conclusion, the existing working versions of the draft-laws have been harmonised with the European standards. 
c)  In line with the basic approach that the exercise of freedom of expression may not be at the expense of freedoms and rights of other persons, the Criminal Code sanctions as criminal offences the following conducts: libel, insult, disclosure of personal or family circumstances, derogation as general criminal acts and their specified forms, i.e. the same deeds when committed through the media. The Law Amending the Criminal Code was adopted in the beginning of 2004 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/04). The purpose of the amendments was to align the domestic legislation with the European standards.  Article 172 of the Code refers to the criminal act of libel. Paragraph 1 stipulates that a person, who asserts an untrue fact in relation to another person which is damaging for that person’s honour or reputation, shall be punished with a fine or with imprisonment of up to six months. If such act is committed through the media or at a public gathering, its perpetrator shall be punished with a fine or with imprisonment of up to one year (Article 172, paragraph 2). If the untrue fact which has been expressed or disseminated is of such importance that it has resulted in severe consequences for the injured party, its perpetrator shall be punished with imprisonment of three months to three years (Article 172, paragraph 3). Pursuant to Article 172, paragraph 4, the defendant shall not be punished if he/she proves the truth of his/her statement or if he/she proves that he/she had reasonable grounds to believe in the truthfulness of what he/she stated. (This provision has been included in the Criminal Code upon a recommendation of the Council of Europe and has also been acknowledged in numerous rulings of the European Court of Human Rights). Article 173 refers to the criminal act of insult. Pursuant to this Article, a person who shall insult another person shall be punished with a fine or imprisonment of up to three months (Article 173, paragraph 1). If such offence has been committed through the media or at a public gathering, its perpetrator shall be punished with a fine or imprisonment of up to six months (Article 173, paragraph 2).  However, recognising the fact that freedom of expression is a necessary aspect of fulfilment of one’s potential, the Criminal Code provides for exemption from incrimination of insulting statements in scientific, literary or artistic work, in serious critique, in line of duty, journalist work, political or other societal office, in protection of the freedom of public expression of thought or of other rights and in protection of public or other justified interests, if it follows from the manner of expression or from some other circumstances of the act, that it has no significance of insult or has not resulted in considerable damage to honour and reputation of personality (Article 176, paragraph 1). Similarly, the Criminal Code stipulates that a person found guilty of such an act shall be released from conviction if he/she has apologised to the injured party or has revoked before the court what he/she had stated or disseminated. Prosecution of the aforementioned criminal offences is undertaken upon a private suit. (This provision has also been included in the Code upon a recommendation by the Council of Europe). A prominent feature of the amendments to the Code relating to these criminal acts is the individualisation of the sentences. Namely, with the recent changes introduced in 2004, fines are imposed in daily rates, the number of which may be at least 5 and at most 360. (Determination of fines has been regulated in Article 38 of the Code). Pursuant to the Code, court shall decide on the number of daily rates in accordance with the general rules governing the determination of sentences. The court determines the amount of the daily rate by taking into consideration the personal and financial circumstances of the perpetrator. In doing so, as a rule, it takes as its starting point the average net income which the perpetrator has, or could have earned, as well as his/her family or other obligations and his/her financial status at the time of the court decision. The law determines that a daily rate shall be fixed at a minimum of the equivalent of one EUR in MKD and at a maximum of the equivalent of five thousand EUR in MKD. When determining the amount of the daily rate, the court may request notification from banks, financial or other institutions which are obliged to supply such data.  As a conclusion, sentences of imprisonment for libel and insult are generally between 3 months to 3 years. A sentence of imprisonment of a journalist was pronounced in 2002. Namely, a sentence of 3 months imprisonment was pronounced to a journalist for a criminal offence libel committed against a political representative. However, upon an appeal, the Skopje Appellate Court returned the proceedings to the first instance court i.e. the Skopje I Basic Court. The reason for such a ruling of the Appellate Court, as was stated in its explanation, was the fact that the first instance court, when deciding on the verdict, failed to take into consideration the essence of the reasons for the deed.   Following are data on the number of lawsuits involving media employees: in 2001, 38 private libel lawsuits were registered against journalists out of the total number of 63; in 2002 - 46 libel lawsuits against journalists out of the total of 105; in 2003 - 41 private libel and insult lawsuits against journalists out of the total of 78. These are figures from the Macedonian Judges Association, presented at the Conference on Freedom of Expression, Libel and Insult held in late 2003 (The Conference was organised by the Journalists Association and the Council of Europe). On the general tendency in the country, it could be concluded that from the total number of libel and insult lawsuits, the majority is always filed against journalists.  Data on the reported, accused and convicted perpetrators of criminal offences are prepared by the State Statistical Office of the Republic of Macedonia in its annual statistical reviews. However, these reviews do not contain figures on the break-down by profession or for journalists. The latest statistical data (for 2002) was issued in 2003. According to these data, out of the total 315 persons accused for criminal offences against reputation and honour, 114 were for libel, 199 were for insult and 2 for other acts. Out of all, 124 were found guilty, in 137 cases the proceedings were adjourned, 37 were acquitted and in 17 cases the charges were dropped (Figures from the Statistical Review No. 2.4.3.11/449, Reported, Accused and Convicted Perpetrators of Criminal Offences in 2002, issued in September 2003 by the State Statistical Office.)  The 2001 Statistical data demonstrates that a total of 288 persons were accused of criminal offences against honour and reputation, 97 of which were for libel, 188 for insult and 3 for other offences. Out of these 288 persons, 124 were found guilty, in 117 cases the proceedings were adjourned, 37 were acquitted and in 9 cases the charges were dropped.  It follows from these data that among persons accused of criminal offences against reputation and honour, the number of those accused of insult is larger. Furthermore, with regard to persons who were found not guilty, the majority pertain to those cases in which the proceedings were adjourned, followed by those who were acquitted and finally those for whom the charges have been dropped. The Broadcasting Law includes a number of libel-related provisions. Namely, Article 8, paragraph 1, subparagraph 12 sets forth that one of the principles of broadcasting is the protection of privacy and dignity of persons. Besides, Article 31, paragraph 2, subparagraph 2, which refers to the content of broadcasting programmes, stipulates that in broadcasting programmes, respect should be ensured of freedom and rights of persons and citizens, their dignity and reputation.  In provisions governing the right to reply and correction (Articles 62 and 63), the Law provides for the exercise of this right by a person for whom a libel has been publicised. For a broadcasting company which shall not publicise a reply or a correction, a fine has been prescribed in the amount of 30.000 to 100.000 MKD (Article 86, paragraph 1, subparagraphs 7 and 8), while the official in charge in the broadcasting company shall be fined with 5.000 to 30.000 MKD. If the broadcasting organisation refuses to broadcast a reply, the court may pronounce a security measure ban on broadcasting activity for a period of three months to one year (Article 86, paragraph 3).    
d)  The existing Telecommunications Law provides that restriction of the freedom of expression may only be allowed in cases when messages that call for violent destruction of the constitutional order, incite military aggression or stir national, racial or religious intolerance are transmitted (Article 9).  The new Law on Electronic Communications (currently in procedure) provides that a right to expression through electronic communication networks may be forbidden in case there is a direct or serious threat for the public order, health, human lives or public security. In both cases this implies all networks and means of electronic communication in general rather than broadcasting alone. The freedom of reception in the Republic of Macedonia has been guaranteed and no legal impediments exist as to procurement of receivers that operate in frequency bands allocated for public usage, including procurement and installation of satellite antennae or receivers. Cable operators are entitled under the existing Broadcasting Law to retransmission of foreign programmes, upon a prior consent by the Broadcasting Council. The Council may prohibit retransmission of specific broadcasting services in cases they call to violent destruction of the constitutional order, incite inter-ethnic, religious or racial intolerance, contain pornographic elements or influence adversely the development of young generations. The new Law on Electronic Communications provides for full liberalisation of the services provided through networks, i.e. the cable retransmission, instead by a concession (as has been stipulated by the existing regulations), shall be allowed simply upon notification. The new Broadcasting Law stipulates that programmes that are retransmitted through cable shall only be registered in the Broadcasting Council.  With regard to Internet services, under the new Law on Electronic Communications, a licence will be required that shall be issued by a new regulatory body in the area of electronic communications. Content of these services is not subject to legal regulation, i.e. should be subject to self-regulation.     35. Is the right of ownership recognised by the Constitution? Is there any limitation for certain categories of persons (e.g. foreigners, EU citizens) or for certain types of property (e.g. agricultural land)? How is the right to property assured? What are the justifications permitted for any possible restrictions placed on the exercise of this right and which body or bodies may impose such restrictions? 
Pursuant to Article 30 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 1/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03), right to ownership of property and right of inheritance are guaranteed; ownership of property creates rights and duties and should serve the well-being of both the individual and the community; and a person may not be deprived of his/her property or of the rights deriving from it, except in cases concerning the public interest determined by law. This article also determines that if property is expropriated or restricted, rightful compensation not lower than its market value is guaranteed. The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia also prescribes that aliens in the Republic of Macedonia may acquire the right to ownership of property under conditions determined by law (Article 31).  This means that foreign nationals may acquire this right in accordance with a separate law. Some real estate may not be subject to right to ownership of property, such as amenities in common use. Namely, pursuant to Article 56 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, all natural resources of the Republic of Macedonia, the flora and fauna, amenities in common use, as well as the objects and buildings of particular cultural and historical value determined by law, are amenities of common interest for the Republic and enjoy particular protection. The Law also regulates the mode and conditions under which specific items of general interest for the Republic can be ceded for use. Hence, according to the Law on Property and Other Real Rights (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 18/01) objects in common use (streets, roads, bridges, squares, parks) are objects in state ownership and may be used by all natural and legal persons (Article 16, paragraph 4).    Pursuant to Article 16, paragraph 1 of the Law on Property and Other Real Rights, all natural resources, the flora and fauna, amenities in common use, construction land, forests and agricultural land, pastures and waters, and amenities and objects of a particular cultural and historic importance determined by law are amenities of common interest to the Republic.  Amenities that in accordance with the Constitution or particular laws have been declared to be amenities of common interest to the Republic may be subject to the right to state ownership i.e. natural and legal persons (Article 16, paragraph 2), whereas forms of ownership of construction, agricultural and forest land, and pastures and waters are regulated by special provisions (Article 16. paragraph 3). Pursuant to the Law on Public Roads (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 26/96, 40/99, 96/00, 29/02 and 68/04), public roads are amenities in common use and in state ownership (Article 2, paragraph 1 and 2) According to Article 2 of the Law on Waters (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 04/98 and 19/00), waters, watercourses and lakes as amenities of common interest of the Republic of Macedonia enjoy particular protection determined by this Law and are in state ownership. Water in watercourses and lakes may be subject to concession (license) for a limited period of time to a domestic or foreign legal and natural person and in a mode and conditions determined by law. As regards the aforementioned real estate, foreign natural and legal persons have equal legal status with domestic persons as both categories have been excluded from the possibility to acquire the right to ownership. Article 2 of the Law on Property and Other Real Rights prescribes that all domestic and foreign natural and legal persons, including the state and local self-government units may acquire the right to ownership of property under conditions and modes determined by this and other laws. Articles 6 and 7 of this Law prescribe that legal protection of ownership of property is guaranteed, while the acquisition, protection and termination of the ownership right and other real rights are determined by law.  In addition, a separate Chapter 4 of this Law titled Real Rights of Aliens regulates particular conditions under which foreign nationals may acquire the right to ownership of property in the Republic of Macedonia.  Hence, Article 242 of this Law determines that foreign natural and legal persons may acquire the right to ownership of movables in the same mode as domestic persons. However, with regard to acquiring real estate, the Law determines that foreign natural and legal persons may acquire this right through inheritance under conditions of reciprocity in the same mode as citizens of the Republic of Macedonia, unless otherwise determined by an international treaty. Concerning the latter, a difference has been made between natural and legal persons. Specifically, foreign natural persons may acquire the right to real estate ownership through inheritance, whereas foreign legal persons may acquire this right only on the basis of a will.  Article 244 stipulates that foreign natural person under conditions of reciprocity may acquire the right to ownership of a dwelling or residential buildings in the Republic of Macedonia in the same mode as a citizen of the Republic of Macedonia. With regard to business premises, foreign natural persons may acquire the right to ownership of property and the right to long-term lease under conditions of reciprocity and if not otherwise determined by law. In addition, foreign legal persons may acquire the right to ownership of property and the right to long-term lease of dwellings and businesses in the Republic of Macedonia under conditions of reciprocity, unless otherwise determined by law.  As far as acquiring the right to construction land ownership, this Law does not offer such possibility to foreign natural and legal persons except the right to acquire long-term lease of construction land for the purpose of erecting business buildings and premises, and residential buildings and dwellings on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia, provided that the Minister of Justice gives consent following consultations and prior opinions by the Minister of Environment and Physical Planning and the Minister of Finance. Likewise, foreign natural and legal persons may acquire the right to long-term lease of agricultural land in the Republic of Macedonia if the Minister of Justice gives consent following opinions obtained from the Minister of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Management and the Minister of Finance.  The right to acquisition of ownership by foreign states for their diplomatic and consular offices, as well as by organisations and specialised agencies of the United Nations and the Council of Europe, has been regulated by special provisions, according to which they may acquire the right to ownership of buildings and dwellings, or to erect such buildings on construction land. The right to ownership of construction land has been regulated by the Law on Construction Land (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 53/01 and 97/01) and Law on Privatisation and Lease of State Owned Construction Land (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 04/05). Article 6 of Law on Construction Land prescribes that construction land may be in ownership of the Republic of Macedonia and domestic natural and legal persons, under conditions determined by this and other laws. Foreign natural and legal persons may only acquire the right to concession of construction land and the right to a long-term lease, under modes and conditions determined by this and other laws (Articles 14 and 19). The Decree on the Mode and Procedure of Transfer, Lease and the Level of Special Costs of Procedures for Transfer and Lease of Construction Land in Ownership of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 79/01, 103/01, 38/02, 53/01 and 95/04) regulates the mode and procedure of transfer and lease of construction land. A separate provision of this Decree determines that mixed companies (registered legal persons with mixed capital, both foreign and domestic) may purchase construction land in the Republic of Macedonia by direct agreement for the purpose of constructing administrative, business, industrial and other business facilities; public sports and recreational facilities; residential districts; residential collective buildings and complexes and residential individual dwellings, upon the proposal of a legal person of mixed ownership registered in the Trade Register of the Republic of Macedonia, in accordance with an investment programme adopted by the Minister of Transport and Communication. With regard to agricultural land, right to ownership of property is only given to domestic natural and legal persons. Foreign natural and legal persons may use agricultural land on the basis of concession granted by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and pursuant to the Law on Agricultural Land (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 25/98, 18/99 and 02/04), which has been regulated in Article 16 of the Law. Pursuant to the Law on Forests (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 47/97, 07/00 and 89/04), forests in the sense of this law are of common interest to the Republic and enjoy special protection. Forests are in private and state ownership. State forests may not be subject to sale. Pursuant to the Law on the Protection of Cultural Heritage (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 20/04 and 71/04), subject to ownership rights may be immovable or movable cultural heritage and it may be in the ownership of the Republic of Macedonia, the local self-government units and other legal and natural persons. Cultural heritage in state ownership of particular importance may not be transferred. With certain exceptions stipulated in the Law, cultural heritage in state ownership of particular importance may be subject to concession.  In addition, the Law on Protection of Nature (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 67/04) prescribes that only domestic legal and natural persons may acquire ownership of real estate in protected areas of nature. Furthermore, the Law stipulates that categories of protected areas in the sense of the Law are: strictly protected natural reserve, national park, monument of nature, natural park, protected areas and multipurpose areas.  Pursuant to the Law on Mineral Raw Materials (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 18/99 and 29/02), concession for detailed geological researches and for exploitation of minerals may be granted to domestic and foreign legal and natural person registered for performing such activities and in compliance with stipulations prescribed by this and other laws. In accordance with Article 13 of the Law on Denationalisation (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 20/98, 31/00, 43/00-consolidated text and 42/03), a right to file a denationalisation request has a citizen of the Republic of Macedonia on the day of this law’s entry into force. Hence, persons who, upon the entry into force of the Law on Denationalisation (07.05.1998) were foreign citizens (natural persons) are not entitled to file a denationalisation request or to a return of nationalised property. Pursuant to Article 10 of the Broadcasting Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 20/97 and  70/03), a foreign natural and legal person may be co-founder of a commercial broadcasting company with maximum of 25% share in its total capital. In addition, the share owned by more foreign natural and legal persons, as co-founders in a single commercial broadcasting company may constitute a maximum of 49% in its overall capital.  As part of the envisaged changes to the Draft-Broadcasting Law, levelling is envisaged of the conditions under which foreign natural and legal persons may establish or participate in the ownership of broadcasters in the Republic of Macedonia. For changes in the ownership structure, if the participation exceeds the threshold of 10%, the broadcasting organisation is obliged to request approval from the Broadcasting Council. Thresholds have also been determined on the basis of which the Broadcasting Council shall decide in procedure for approval of ownership structure changes. The text of the new Broadcasting Law also includes provisions on transparency of the ownership structure. Broadcasters shall be obliged to submit to the Broadcasting Council, on an annual basis, the information on their operation in the previous year, and which refer to the changes in the ownership structure, company’s status changes, changes in the managing bodies and sources of funding. As regards the restriction of acquired right to ownership of property in the Republic of Macedonia, pursuant to the Constitution ownership may be expropriated or restricted only in cases concerning public interest determined by law. Restriction to acquiring right to ownership by way of expropriation; restriction to construction rights deriving from ownership rights; as well determining public interest, have all been determined by the Law on Expropriation (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 33/95, 20/98, 40/99 and 31/03) and by other laws.  The Procedure for expropriation of property has been regulated by the Law on Expropriation. Expropriation procedures are also stipulated in other laws. Article 2 of the Law on Expropriation lists facilities of public interest that may be subject to restriction of ownership or expropriation. The expropriation procedure is strictly formal, two-sided and contradictory and may only be initiated under conditions determined by law, i.e. upon the proposal of authorised person and user of the expropriation with the involvement of two parties that have conflicting interests – the authorised person (user of expropriation) and the owner of the real estate subject to expropriation. This procedure performed out by an expropriation body (the state administrative body competent for property issues) within the Ministry of Finance and is finalised by an act on adoption or rejection of the expropriation proposal, unless the expropriation user and the real estate owner agree on the compensation beforehand. This means they are given a chance to reach an agreement on the expropriation and compensation before the property is confiscated. Apart from the administrative procedure, court protection has been provided for the process of expropriation and restriction of ownership, i.e. for the determination of equitable market-value compensation for the real estate subject to expropriation. Pursuant to Article 50 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia every citizen may invoke the protection of freedoms and rights determined by the Constitution before the regular courts and before the Constitutional Court of the Republic of Macedonia. This right also pertains to the right to ownership of property. 
36. What are the administrative procedures which are necessary for the transfer of property? How long does it take to complete the procedure for a transfer of property? Which body is responsible for maintaining an urban and land cadastre and property register? Please provide information on the existing cadastre and land registry, and your plans for its modernisation. 
The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 1/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) guarantees the right to property and the right to inheritance. No person may be deprived or restricted of property and the rights deriving therein, except in cases of public interest determined by law.  In case of expropriation or in case of restriction to property, rightful compensation not lower than its market value is guaranteed.  A foreign person in the Republic of Macedonia may acquire the right to property under conditions determined by law.  Pursuant to provisions in Article 148 of the Law on Property and Other Real Rights (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 18/2001), the right to property of a real estate on the basis of a legal act is acquired by registering in the Real Estate Cadastre or in another adequate way determined by law.  The establishment, registration and maintenance of the Real Estate Cadastre are regulated in a mode and procedure determined by law.  The legal effect of the registration occurs following the receipt of the request or the document by the body keeping the public book. Pursuant to provisions in Article 1 of the Law on Land Surveying, Cadastre and Real Estate Rights Registration  (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 27/86 and 17/91), the surveying, cadastre and the real estate rights registration are carried out in modes prescribed by this Law, and pursuant to provisions in Article 8, paragraph 1 of the same Law, the Real Estate Cadastre is a public book in which the registration of data is carried out ex officio or upon the parties’ request. In accordance with Article 57 of the same Law, the registration into the Real Estate Cadastre is carried out by entry and note. The registration into the Real Estate Cadastre is performed on the basis of:     Documents compiled in legally prescribed form;   Final court decisions; and   A law or decision of a state body. The administrative procedures in the course of the procedure on acquiring the right to property (and other real rights), are generally regulated in the Law on General Administrative Procedure, Article 1 in line with Article 2 and 3 (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, Nos. 47/86 - consolidated text and “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 44/02), which has been taken over from the former Yugoslav law after Macedonia’s independence, on the basis of the Constitutional Law on Implementation of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91 and 4/92). The transfer of the right to property (and other real rights) into the Real Estate Cadastre as a public book has been conditioned by a prior implementation of the following administrative procedures: 1.  Establishment of a public book - Real Estate Cadastre for the area covering the application for the transfer of the right. The establishment is carried out by implementing a procedure of first entry of real estate rights for the area of the cadastre unit that covers the application. This procedure is conveyed in a systematised way and in procedures determined by the Rulebook on the Modes and Procedure of Exposing Data on Real Estate and Modes of Real Estate Rights Registration (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 05/88 and 42/95) and is finalised by the announcement of a decision on establishing a Real Estate Cadastre as a public book for a respective cadastre municipality in the Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia. 2.  Establishing documents for transfer of property rights in a form and content prescribed by law (containing data’s of the public book for the registration of real estate rights, i.e. from the Property List as property evidence), or existence of a private document whose form and content has been confirmed (solemnised) by a publicly authorised person - a notary, pursuant to the Law on Notaries (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/96, 25/98 and 06/02). 3.  Evidence for paid tax in the sense of Article 37 of the Law on Property Tax (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 61/04). 4.  Paid administrative fees pursuant to the Law on Administrative Fees (Chapter 5, Tariff No. 56) – (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 17/93, 20/96, 07/98, 13/01, 24/03, 19/04 and 61/04).  The administrative procedures for the transfer of property rights are implemented in Accordance with the Rulebook on Maintenance of Land Surveying and Real Estate Cadastre (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 62/95) and the Rulebook on the Maintenance and Surveying of the Land Registry (“Official Gazette of the SRM”, Nos. 06/75 and 09/75) depending on whether the area to which the application refers has been encompassed by a Real Estate Cadastre (public book) or by records on the land, i.e. a Land Registry.  The time-frame for the administrative procedure after the receipt of the application for the transfer of the property right into the Real Estate Cadastre, or the application for the transfer of the land user into the land registry, has been regulated by the provision in Article 218, paragraph 1 of the Law on General Administrative Procedure and is one month if all applications have been properly completed and submitted. In other cases, the competent body that performs the procedure is obliged to adopt a decision and submit it to the requesting party not later than two months.  The realistic time-frame for a completion of the administrative procedure in the course of the property rights transfer is not longer than 7-15 days in most local offices, while on the area of the City of Skopje it is longer than two months. The State Geodetic Institute with its 30 centralised local offices including the Skopje City Office is competent for the keeping of the so-called City Cadastre (referring to the area of any city, including the City of Skopje) as well as for the Land Registry and the Real Estate Cadastre. This issue has also been regulated by the provisions in Article 35 of the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02), and by the Rulebook on Internal Organisation and Operation of the State Geodetic Institute No. 01-3483/5 from 05.07.2004, as an internal act adopted by the official person administering the body pursuant to his/her authorities, as determined in Article 5, paragraph 2 of the Law, following the consent obtained from the Civil Servants Agency pursuant to its authorities determined by this Law. The Real Estate Cadastre is a public book. It is a fundamental and legally regulated system of registering the total factual, spatial, economic, and property and legal components of the real estate status (land, buildings and special parts of buildings). As such it is a basis for the creation of the spatial information system. The Cadastre is based upon principles of legality, constitutionality and publicity and, as such, it is vital for the provision of legal security in the real estate trade. Basis for its creation and establishment is a prior cadastre survey of the spatial and actual status of the real estate and other collected data on the real estate (surface, modes of land use and its economic power), while as regards buildings and parts of buildings, basis are data for their size (number of stories, surface), construction material and other data as well as data on potential owners. The collecting and editing of data is carried out by plans, according to administrative areas and cadastre municipalities and is implemented according to methodologies and procedures determined by legal and technical standards. The collected and edited data on real estate are presented before citizens and other legal persons in a public procedure which also determines the facts on real estate rights. Following the completion of the procedure is the registration (first entry) of real estate rights. Data determined in the course of the procedure are recorded on magnetic tapes for further use. The procedure ends with a decision on establishment of a Real Estate Cadastre-Public Book, published in the Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia. The decision specifies a term when the basic public book for the concrete cadastre territorial unit shall be opened for use. The property list is the final product of this procedure. The List is evidence for further transactions in the real estate. The procedure lasts from several months to a few years (two or three), depending on the size of the area. The Real Estate Cadastre comprises: cadastral plans (maps); cadastral operate; and the collection of documents. Cadastral maps are created in an analogue (graphical) form, and since 1997 they have been also produced in digital form. The analogue plans (maps) are transformed into digital. By 2010 it is expected that all cadastre plans will be in a digital database and available in electronic form. The cadastral Operate is a systematised attributed database on real estate, memorised on magnet tapes in e-form with an automatic on-line search engine. For the time being, they are only available for use of the local cadastral offices. The central memory base unit in the State Geodetic Institute is available on-line only to the Central Registry. The transfer of the changes in public books from local offices to the central memory unit into the central device of the State Geodetic Institute is carried out once a week by a back-up technology. The project “e-cadastre” which is in its initial phase envisions the establishment of Internet/Intranet accession to the database by the end of 2010. The collection of documents is a collection of legal documents containing originals or verified copies of documents that determine a certain real estate right. The documents are in paper form. According to the development project, the transfer of data into a digital form shall be available to users by the end of 2010. The Real Estate Cadastre as a public book of real estate covers around 45% of the state’s territory. As of October 2003 a new Project on Cadastre and Registration of Real Estate is being prepared under the leadership of the World Bank. The Project shall provide:   Reorganisation and transformation of the geodetic and cadastral service by divesting the non-essential operations from the current organisational form into a new modern, organised, automated and efficient service to citizens and legal persons;   Introduction of private practice in the area of geodetic operations, mapping, digitalisation, etc., for the efficient servicing of the needs of citizens and other legal persons;   Acceleration of administrative procedures by the establishment of public books on real estate - real estate cadastres and a full (100%) coverage of the territory by 2010;   Conversion of cadastral plans (maps) from analogue to digital form and digitalisation of the remaining technical part by the end of 2010, with an electronic availability of data;   Establishment of a complete, automated Geodetic-Cadastral Information System (GeoCIS) for geo-spatial and other data on real estate, and establishment of an e-base into the real estate cadastre and its on-line availability to users and citizens;   Introduction of the option for electronic transfer of real estate rights in transactions by the end of 2010;   Creating opportunities for issuance of documents in a digital form on the facts contained in the real estate cadastre for areas where the digitalisation of the graphical and alphanumerical part will be completed, until the introduction of an e-availability of such documents;   Institutional strengthening of the organisation competent for cadastre operations; registration of real estate rights (in a new organisational form) and securing full public confidence in the real estate rights data as well as legal security in the real estate trade;   Securing conditions for a permanent expert training and specialisation, and strengthening the capacity of human resources that would be capable to further implement the project.  37. Denationalisation: What is the percentage of properties returned to persons dispossessed by the Communist regime? (Please provide precise statistics of nationalised property: houses, agricultural land, forests, etc., total claims received by the authorities, claims processed and completed, claims accepted and rejected, indication of competent authorities in this process, etc.) When is the denationalisation process estimated to be completed by the Government? 
The denationalisation process has been regulated by the Law on Denationalisation (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 20/98, 31/00, 43/00-consolidated text and 42/03). On the basis of Article 70 of the Law Amending the Law on Denationalisation (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 31/00), the Legislative Committee of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia, in May 2000, established the consolidated text of the Law on Denationalisation (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 43/00-consolidated text). The Law determines the conditions and procedure for restitution of property and the type, conditions and procedure for awarding compensation for property confiscated on behalf of the state since 2 August 1944 (denationalisation). Pursuant to the Law on Denationalisation, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia adopted a Decree on the Implementation of the Denationalisation Procedure and a Decree on the Manner and Procedure of Establishing the Value of Property Subject to Denationalisation (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 43/00). The practical application of the Law on Denationalisation started in September 2000. According to the records of the authorised committees, since then and until September 2004, a total of 19.185 denationalisation claims were received. So far, the competent denationalisation committees passed 8.066 rulings (42%). This number includes 5.041 rulings (62,5%) endorsing the claims; 903 rulings (11%) partially endorsing the claims; 1.916 rulings (24%) rejecting the claims; and 206 claims (2,5%) for which the procedure has been suspended. Final are 5.141 rulings (63,7%). Out of the total number of rulings endorsing or partially endorsing the claims, property was restored by 2.714 rulings (45,65%), of an area and category as follows:   Housing premises – 36.163 m;    Business premises – 120.421 m;    Agricultural land – 596.555.646 m;    Building land – 1.066.149 m; and    Forest land – 17.247.796 mThe total number of rulings endorsing or partially endorsing the claims also includes 3.230 rulings (54,35%) by which compensation was determined in the form of bonds, for property that cannot be restituted. Three series of bonds have been issued thus far for the final rulings upon claims lodged by 31 December 2003. The total value of the issued bonds is 89.100.000 EUR. The registration of bonds on behalf of the claimants within the body competent for their registering and servicing (Central Securities Depositary) is done, ex officio, by the competent denationalisation committees. Pursuant to the Law, the Minister of Finance decides upon denationalisation claims. For that purpose, he/she may establish one or more committees (denationalisation bodies). In that sense, 13 first-instance denationalisation committees have been established in regions and areas. Parties in the denationalisation procedure are the claimants (former owners of the confiscated property or their heirs) and the Public Attorney’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia, as a representative of the state interests. Against a first-instance ruling, a dissatisfied party is entitled to file a complaint before the second-instance body (Committee within the Government of the Republic of Macedonia deciding in second instance in administrative denationalisation matters). Against a second-instance ruling, a dissatisfied party is entitled to initiate an administrative dispute before the Supreme Court of the Republic of Macedonia. Subject of enforcement is a final ruling for denationalisation. Pursuant to the Law on Denationalisation, denationalisation claims in administrative procedure may be filed not later than 07.05.2005. After the expiry of the deadline, an appeal for compensation in litigation procedure may be filed before a competent court; restitution of property may be requested only if no legal or factual obstacles exist. Pursuant to the Law on Denationalisation, the deadline for filing denationalisation claims is not preclusive, i.e. no prescription arises after the deadline. Therefore, it is impossible to accurately anticipate the time period within which all procedures (administrative and court) will be completed i.e. when the denationalisation process is over. However, by taking into account the current dynamics of the process, it may be assessed that the majority of cases (around 90%) in administrative procedure would be resolved by the end of 2008. 
38. Respect of privacy: is privacy safeguarded by law? Is any case of telephone tapping or house search allowed without a judge's warrant? 
In 1997, the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia ratified the Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 11/97), whereby the regulations of the above Convention have become part of the internal legal order. In accordance with Article 8 of the abovementioned Convention, every person has the right to respect for his/her private and family life, home and correspondence. The public authorities shall not interfere with the exercise of this right, except such as in accordance with the law and is necessary in a democratic society in the interests of state security, public safety or the economic well-being of the country, for the prevention of disorder or crime, for the protection of health or morals, or for the protection of the rights and freedoms of others. Article 25 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) provides explicit guarantee on the respect and protection of the privacy or personal and family life and of dignity and reputation. The essence of the right of privacy is a generic term that contains several rights and consists of the freedom of each individual to decide independently on all issues within the domain of his/her private and family life without any interference by other persons or by the authorities. In addition to this, the right of privacy is exercised and realised by guaranteeing the security and confidentiality of personal data, the inviolability of the home, freedom and privacy of correspondence and all other forms of communication. (for more details see I_H_16). Consequently, the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia in Article 18, guarantees the security and privacy of personal information. Citizens are guaranteed protection from any violation of their personal integrity deriving from the registration of personal information through data processing. The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, in Article 26, guarantees the inviolability of the dwellings, establishing that this right may be restricted only on the basis of a court decision in cases of detection or prevention of criminal offences or the protection of people’s health. Article 17 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia guarantees the freedom and privacy of correspondence and all other forms of communication. At the same time, there can only be an exception to the principle of inviolability of the privacy of correspondence with a court decision, where necessary for the course of a criminal proceeding or if it is required in the interests of the defence of the country.  The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia provides guarantees for the exercise of the fundamental rights and freedoms by stating that each citizen can call upon protection of his/her rights and freedoms established by the Constitution, before courts and before the Constitutional Court of the Republic of Macedonia in a procedure based on the principles of priority and urgency. At the same time, the citizen has the right to be informed about the human rights and fundamental freedoms and to actively contribute, individually or together with other citizens, to their promotion and protection.  The right to privacy is not an absolute right and exceptions to this right may be made in cases determined by law. By establishing precisely the conditions under which the principle of privacy may be violated, as well as by prescribing the procedure for implementing such an exception, the guarantee that the right to privacy is being observed and exercised is provided. The exception to the principle of security and privacy of personal information is stipulated in the newest Law on Personal Data Protection (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.07/05). On the legal solutions in the new Law on Personal Data Protection, for more details see I_H_39.  The exceptions to the principle of inviolability of the home, i.e. establishing when a house search is allowed is regulated by the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04).  The Law on Criminal Procedure stipulates that a search of the home or other facilities of the accused or of other person may be conducted if there are reasonable grounds to believe that the search will result in apprehension of the accused or that traces of the criminal offence shall be found or objects of importance for the criminal proceedings (Article 198). According to the provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure, the search is ordered by the court in a written, elaborated order, which explicitly designates the place and the person to be searched, as well as the objects, which are searched for or confiscated from the person (Article 199, paragraph 1). The search warrant is shown before the search to the person who personally or whose home will be searched. Before the search, the person to whom the search warrant refers will be asked voluntarily to turn in the person or give away objects which are searched for. (Article 199, paragraph 2) However, the search may be conducted without prior presentation of a search warrant and without previous request for turning over the person or objects if an armed resistance is presumed or when suspecting that a severe crime is conducted by a group or organisation it is considered necessary to conduct the search suddenly or if the search is to be performed in public premises. (Article 199, paragraph 3) In accordance with the Law on Criminal Procedure, the householder or the holder of other premises will be summoned to be present at the search, and if he/she is absent his/her authorised representative will be summoned or some of his/her adult members of the family or neighbours (Article 200, paragraph 3). During the search of premises or persons, two adult citizens will be present as witnesses. The search of a female is performed only by a female officer, and the witnesses are also female. Before the start of the search, the witnesses will be warned to pay attention to the performance of the search and they will be reminded of their right, before signing the minutes for the search to write in their objections if they consider that the contents of the minutes are incorrect (Article 200, paragraph 3). The Law on Criminal Procedure sets forth the possibility that the search is conducted without the presence of witnesses if their presence is not possible immediately to be provided and there is a danger of delay. The reasons for a search without the presence of witnesses must be written in the minutes (Article 200, paragraph 4). The search of premises and persons is to be performed carefully without disturbing the order of the residence (Article 200, paragraph 7). During the performance of the search, only those objects and identity cards i.e. documents will be temporarily confiscated which are in connection with the aim of the search in that particular case (Article 200, paragraph 8). If during the search of premises and persons, objects are found which have no connection with the crime for which the search is intended, but which point to another crime to be prosecuted ex officio, the objects will be confiscated and a receipt for the confiscation will be immediately issued. The public prosecutor will be immediately informed in order a criminal procedure be initiated. These objects will be immediately returned if the public prosecutor finds that there are no grounds for institution of a criminal procedure and there is no other lawful ground according to which those objects should be confiscated (Article 200, paragraph 9). The Law on Criminal Procedure prescribes the obligation that for each search of residences or persons minutes be made. The minutes are signed by the official conducting the search, the person at whose home or on whom the search is conducted and the persons whose presence is compulsory (Article 201, paragraph 1). The objects and documents, which have been confiscated will be included and notified correctly in the minutes (Article 201, paragraph 2). Authorised officials of the police may, without a search warrant, and without the presence of witnesses, perform a search of a person while enforcing a court order for apprehension or while depriving a person from freedom if it is suspected that the person possesses arms or tools for attack or if it is suspected that he/she will throw away, hide or destroy the objects which are to be confiscated from him/her as evidence in the criminal procedure (Article 202, paragraph 2). The Draft Law on Communication Interception is in parliamentary procedure for the purpose of precisely regulating the conditions and the procedure for deviation from the constitutionally guaranteed right of inviolability of correspondence and all other forms of communication. The mentioned Law will regulate the conditions and the procedure for communication interception, the working methods, the storage and use of obtained information and data, as well as the control of the legality of communication interception. The Draft contains five separate chapters: general provisions; the conditions and the procedure for communication interception for the purpose of detecting and prosecuting the criminal offenders; the conditions and the procedure for communication interception for the protection of the interests of state security and defence; supervision and control; transitional and final provisions.  Expressing the democratic development of the state, the Draft Law subscribes to the principle that no one may intercept communication without an order of a competent court, unless they are intended for or there is agreement by the person or persons involved in the communication. In accordance with the proposed legal provisions, the interception of communications of a given person may be ordered by the court when there are grounds for suspicion that this person has committed a criminal offence for which imprisonment of at least four years is prescribed, or a criminal offence for which imprisonment of up to five years is prescribed, and for which there are grounds to believe that it is conducted or has been conducted by an organised group, gang or other criminal association, in order to provide data and evidence necessary for successfully carrying out a criminal procedure which cannot be provided in any other way.  The only relevant institution for submitting a request for communication interception, in accordance to the proposed provisions, is the public prosecutor, who submits the request on their own initiative or, upon the proposal of an authorised person, by the Minister of the Interior. The admissibility of the request is decided on by the investigative judge with an order within 24 hours from the time when the request was submitted. At the same time, the law guarantees the right to appeal to the competent public prosecutor if the investigative judge does not agree with the request for issuing a court order. The appeal is to be submitted to the criminal Chamber of the competent court within 24 hours from the notification of the disagreement. The investigative judge will reject the request for communication interception if it relates to the communication of a lawyer appointed to defend a person whose communication is the subject of interception; to communication that is carried out in the offices of the President of the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia, the President of the Republic of Macedonia, the Prime Minister of the Republic of Macedonia; and to communication that is carried out in the offices of members of Parliament in the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia.  The duration of communication interception according to the proposed provisions is established as not longer than 30 days from the day of issuing the order for communication interception. However, a possibility is provided for an extension of up to 90 days more on the basis of submitting an additional proposal with a separate explanation of the reasons for which the extension is required. The law also regulates the procedure for serving the order and its implementation, as well as the storage, delivery and the use of the collected data. At the same time, it provides for time limits and the way of protecting and destroying the collected data, as well as for the way and the conditions for notifying the accused and acquainting them with the collected data from the interception of their communication.  The proposed provisions foresee an obligation of the investigative judge to deliver all the data gathered on the basis of the issued order to the competent public prosecutor who is to estimate if there are legal grounds for submitting a request for initiating an investigation. If the public prosecutor does not submit a request for initiating an investigation within 30 days from delivering the data collected with the interception of communication, the law stipulates an obligation of the court to pass a decision for their destruction. The court may also adopt a decision for the destruction of the collected data in cases when it estimates that the collected data bear no importance for the procedure, however, by previously obtaining an opinion of the competent public prosecutor. The basic intention that the data and the information obtained with communication interception are to be used in the interest of and for the objectives of the criminal procedure is also exercised by stipulating a legal provision that the court decides on the admissibility of the data obtained by the communication interception in a criminal procedure, against which the concerned parties have the right to appeal to the criminal Chamber of the competent court within 24 hours from serving the decision. Upon finality of the decision in the criminal procedure conducted against a person whose communication has been monitored, the court adopts a special decision to destroy the evidence within 15 days. The destruction of the data is performed by a commission, comprising a judge, a public prosecutor and a person authorised by the Minister of the Interior. The law provides the right to compensation for damages to the person whose communication has been intercepted contrary to the provisions of this law, which is decided on by the court that has issued an order for communication interception, in a fast-track procedure that may not last more than 3 months. The damaged party that is not content with the court decision has the right to appeal to a higher court within 8 days from the day of reception. The right to compensation for damages is also provided for a citizen who has suffered damages because the data collected from interception of his/her communication have been published before issuing the court’s decision for admitting the mentioned data to be used as evidence in a criminal procedure, or if destroyed data have been published.  In accordance with the provisions of the Draft Law on Communication Interception, the court may order interception of the communication of a person suspected of preparing to commit a criminal offence against the State, against the armed forces or against humanity and international law.  Except in abovementioned cases, the court may order interception of communication in the event of preparing, encouraging, organising, or participating in an armed attack against the Republic of Macedonia, or in the cases when a person is disabling the security system, unless there is no other way to obtain data for such an activity in order to prevent the crime, the armed assault, or the damage to the security system of the country.  In the mentioned cases, the competent bodies for submitting a request for communication interception of a person are the Minister of the Interior and the Minister of Defence. The Draft Law stipulates the Supreme Court as responsible for approving the request for communication interception and provides a possibility for submitting an appeal to the Supreme Court on the part of the applicant if the judge does not agree upon the submitted request, decided upon by a council of three Supreme Court judges. A member of the council may not be the judge that decided upon the request for issuing an order for communication interception, thus fully implementing the principle of judiciary control and protection. With the order for communication interception the judge of the Supreme Court will allow communication interception for the necessary time, but not longer than three months. After expiration of this period, on the basis of an additionally explained proposal, the judge may order the communication interception to be extended for a period of up to one year, including the time designated with the first order. In accordance with the principle of protection of privacy, the personal data collected with communication interception are kept in special conditions at the Ministry of the Interior, i.e. at the Ministry of Defence, for up to one year after the expiry of the time determined with the court order, after which all the data and the materials related to the execution of the court order are destroyed under the supervision of the judge who has issued the court order, minutes whereof are taken in which only the number of the court decision is recorded. The Law on Communication Interception also regulates the supervision of the enforcement of the measures by the Ministry of the Interior and the Ministry of Defence, envisaging that the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia establish for that purpose a Commission consisting of five members. The Commission submits an annual report to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia on the undertaken control of the legality of the implementation of the measures by the Ministry of the Interior and the Ministry of Defence within two months after the end of the current year. With the entry into force of the Law on amending  the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 74/04) the right to privacy may also be limited under the conditions and in the way determined with this Law by applying special investigative measures. According to the regulations of the Law on Criminal Procedure, an order by the investigative judge, i.e. an order by the public prosecutor may authorise undertaking the following special investigative measures:    Communication interception and entry in the home and other premises or transportation vehicles for creating conditions for communication interception, under the conditions and according to the procedure established by law,   Inspection and search of the computer system, seizing a computer system or parts thereof or the base for storing computer data,   Secret surveillance, monitoring and audiovisual recording of persons and objects by technical means,   Simulated purchase of objects, as well as simulated bribing and simulated acceptance of bribe,   Controlled delivery and transport of persons and goods,   Using undercover agents for monitoring and collecting information or data,   Opening a simulated bank account, where proceeds of crime can be deposited, and   Registration of fictitious legal persons or using existing legal persons for data collection.  The application of the special investigative measures is foreseen only for providing data and evidence necessary for successfully conducting the criminal procedure that cannot be collected trough other methods or whose collection would involve substantial difficulty, for criminal offences for which imprisonment of at least four years is prescribed, for criminal offences for which imprisonment of up to five years is prescribed and for which there are grounds to believe that has been committed by an organised group, a gang or another criminal association. In the event when there is no knowledge of the identity of the perpetrator of the crime, special investigative measures may be ordered concerning the subject of the criminal offence.  In cases determined by law, in the preliminary investigative procedure, special investigative measures are determined by an order of the public prosecutor or the investigative judge, and in the course of the investigation, only by an order by an investigative judge. In the preliminary investigative procedure, particular investigative measures are determined by an order written and argued by the investigative judge, on the basis of a proposal written and argued by the public prosecutor. At this stage of the criminal procedure, the investigative judge decides with a written order on the application of all special investigative measures, except for the special investigative measure: communication interception and entry in a home and other premises or transportation vehicles for creating conditions for communication interception. If there is disagreement between the public prosecutor and the investigative judge as regards the application of the special investigative measures, the Chamber of the basic court, consisting of three judges, shall decide.  In the preliminary investigation procedure, when there is no knowledge of the identity of the perpetrator of the criminal offence, special investigative measures may be authorised with a written and argued order by the public prosecutor, and on the basis of a written and argued proposal by the Ministry of the Interior also. The public prosecutor in the above case may decide, with a written order, to apply special investigative measures, except for applying the special investigative measures: communication interception and entry in a home and other premises or transportation vehicles for creating conditions for communication interception, and inspection and search in computer systems, seizing computer systems or parts thereof, or the base for storing computer data. The order for the application of special investigative measures is enforced by the Ministry of the Interior, the Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia and the Financial Police. The order contains data about the individual against whom investigative measures are applied when the perpetrator is known, the grounds of suspicion for the committed crime, the facts wherefrom the application of special investigative measures emerges, as well as the manner, extent and duration of such measures. The implementation of special investigative measures, except for the enforcement of the special investigative measure: communication interception and entry in a home and other premises or entry in transportation vehicles for creating conditions for communication interception, may last up to four months. However, upon a proposal of the public prosecutor, when the order is issued by the investigative judge, i.e. upon a proposal of the Ministry of the Interior, when the order is issued by the public prosecutor, the duration of the special investigative measures may be extended for at least three months for justifiable reasons. If the special investigative measures are undertaken without an order of the investigative judge, i.e. without an order of the public prosecutor or are undertaken contrary to the regulations of the Law on Criminal Procedure, the evidence gathered through the use of such measures may not be used in the criminal procedure. Nevertheless, the data, reports, documents and objects collected with the use of special investigative measures under the conditions and in the manner prescribed with the regulations of the Law on Criminal Procedure may be used as evidence in the criminal procedure.  
39. Data protection: Provide information on any legislation or other rules governing this area, and the adherence of such rules to relevant international conventions. What is done in order to ensure efficient protection of data? Does any independent data protection supervisory authority exist? (Please note that these questions have also been raised under the specific point on data protection under Chapter 24.) 
The right to privacy regarding the processing of personal data, as one of the fundamental freedoms and rights of the individuals and the citizens in the Republic of Macedonia is regulated  in the Article 18 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01, 84/03), which guarantees security and privacy of personal data and protection from possible violation of the personal integrity of the citizens deriving from registration of personal information through data processing. In the legislation of the Republic of Macedonia, the constitutional guarantee of security and privacy of the personal data until recently was governed by the Law on Personal Data Protection(“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 12/94 and 4/02). The new Law on Personal Data Protectionwas adopted on 25.01.2005 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 07/05). This law is compatible and aligned with the standards and the criteria foreseen by the European Parliament and the European Council Directive on the Protection of Individuals with Regard to the Processing of Personal Data and on the Free Movement of such Data 95/46/ of 1995 and the Convention for the Protection of Individuals with Regard to Automatic Processing of Personal Data No. 108 of the Council of Europe of 28.01.1981 ratified by the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 07/05). The substance of the Law on Personal Data Protection(“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 07/05) is divided into 11 separate chapters. Chapter 1 - General Provisions, defines the subject and the aim of the law, which is focused on protection of fundamental rights and freedoms of the citizens, with a special emphasis on protection of rights to privacy regarding personal data processing. In drafting the provisions systematised within this chapter, the Constitutional guarantee of security and privacy of personal data and protection from violation of the personal integrity of the citizens (Article 18) was taken into consideration. The legal definitions strictly follow the terminology used in the Directive 95/46/Consistently incorporating the contents from Article 3 from the Directive 95/46/, the Law explicitly identifies the exceptions from its application, focused on processing of personal data performed by natural persons purely for personal or household activities, processing of personal data in criminal procedure, as well as protection of the interests of security and defence of the Republic of Macedonia (Article 4). Chapter 2 of the Law on Personal Data Protection- Processing of Personal Data, specifies the conditions which the personal data should meet. When defining the aforementioned provision, the starting point was the content of the Article 6 from the Directive 95/46/, where the principles concerning the quality of personal data are established. Hence, the personal data shall be processed fairly and lawfully, in conformity with the Law. This data shall be collected for specified, explicit and legitimate purposes and shall be processed in a manner according to these purposes; they shall be adequate, relevant and not excessive in respect to the purposes they are collected or processed for. The data shall be accurate, complete and updated as needed. Inaccurate or incomplete data, having in mind the aims for which they were collected or processed, will be erased or rectified. The personal data shall be kept in a form that enables identification of the subject of personal data for not longer than it is necessary to fulfil the purposes for which the data were collected or for which they are further processed. The Data Controllers are responsible to comply with the abovementioned principles concerning the quality of personal data.  The Law establishes the principles of making data processing legitimate. Previously given consent of the subject for processing of personal data is established as a mandatory and necessary prerequisite for processing of personal data. Exceptions from the aforementioned rule are also specified. Namely, it is established that personal data can also be processed without the consent of the subject if it is necessary for performance of a contract where the subject of personal data is a contracting party, or upon a request of the subject of personal data, prior to entering into a contract; for compliance with a legal obligation of the Data Controller; for protection of the vital interests of the subject of personal data; for performance of activities of public interest or of official authority vested in the Data Controller or a third party to whom the data were disclosed.  The chapter 3 - Processing of special categories of personal data, implements the relevant provisions contained in the Directive 95/46/. The Law prohibits processing of special categories of personal data. This prohibition shall not apply: if the subject of personal data gives consent to processing of these data; for enforcement of specific rights and obligations of the Data Controller in the area of Labour Law, to a degree and with adequate safeguards established by laws in this area; for protection of the vital interests of the subject of personal data or of a third person, if that person is physically or legally incapable of giving his/her consent; if the processing is performed with appropriate guarantees by foundations, associations or any other non-profit institutions with a political, religious, trade-union or other purpose, under condition that the data processing is related solely to their members and that these data are not disclosed to a third party without the consent of the subject of personal data; if the processing relates to data which are manifestly made public by the data subject; when it is necessary to establish, exercise and defend the rights of the subject in a procedure before competent bodies; if the processing of the data is for purposes of medical prevention, diagnosis, provision of care or treatment or management of a healthcare organisation and if the processing of those data is performed by a health professional subject who is under oath of professional secrecy; and when for reasons of public interest there is a need to perform an important activity established by law, or the processing is done on the basis of a decision by the Directorate for Personal Data Protection. The Law stipulates that processing must be specially designated and protected, while transfer through a telecommunications network may be carried out if the data are specially protected with encryption methods to render them unreadable during transmission. This chapter also determines the conditions under which the personal identification number may be processed. Chapter 4, Rights of the Data subject, is central in the draft law. This chapter makes a distinction between the information presented to the subject of personal data in cases of collection of data from the data subject and information presented to the subject of personal data where the data have not been obtained from the data subject. The rights of the data subject have been arranged by subject matter, as follows: the right to examine the data collection; the right to submit a request to rectify, erase or block the processing of personal data, if the data are incomplete, inaccurate or out of date, or if their processing is not in conformity with the provisions of this law and the right to request that their personal data are not used for advertising purposes. The Law on Personal Data Protection explicitly provides that the scope of the rights and obligations of the subject of personal data established by provisions of this Law can be restricted in a way and under conditions established by law, to an extent necessary to fulfil aims due to which this restriction is introduced and if it is needed: for protection of the national security and defence; for prevention; investigation, detection or prosecution of perpetrators of criminal offences; because of breaches of the ethics for regulated professions; for protection of important economic and financial interests of the state and for protection of a subject of personal data or the rights and the freedoms of the citizens.  The content of Article 15 of Directive 95/46/, is incorporated in a special provision of the Law, which guarantees that no court decision which produces legal effects concerning the performance of certain person can not be based solely on automated data processing which purpose is evaluation of certain personal aspect relating to that person. While the paragraph 2 of the same provision specifies that another decision can be based only on automated data processing if it is made in the course of entering into a performance of a  contract and the person was provided the opportunity to express his point of view (to safeguard his legitimate interests) or the decision was made in concordance with the request of that person or in accordance with a law which lays down measures to safeguard the data subject’s legitimate interests. The chapter 5 - Confidentiality and protection in processing of personal data, contains provisions which specify the duties of any person who has access to collections of personal data on the behalf of the Data Controller or the Data Processing Agent, including the Data Processing Agent, to provide for confidentiality, protection of personal data and to process the data in accordance with the authorisations and instructions received from the Data Controller, if not otherwise prescribed by law. For providing confidentiality and protection of processing of personal data, the Data Controller must implement appropriate technical and organisational measures and these measures must correspond to the equipment and costs needed for their application. Therefore they shall ensure a level of security appropriate to the risks represented by the processing and the nature of the data to be protected. The list of technical and organisational measures which are applied by the Data Controller pursuant to the Law is extensive and complex, in order to provide comprehensive protection of personal data from all potential forms of unlawful processing. On the basis of a signed contract, the Data Controller can transfer certain activities from within his/her competence to the Data Processing Agent, if the Data Processing Agent guarantees that they will undertake and respect adequate technical security and organisational measures for protection of data processing. The Data Processing Agent has the duty, when processing the personal data, to act in accordance with authorisations and instructions received from the Data Controller and in accordance with provisions of this Law. The Data Controller has the duty to maintain records on the undertaken technical and organisational measures, as well as on the signed contracts.  The provisions in chapter 6 - Records of collections of personal data and central register, establish the content and manner for keeping records on any collection of personal data, an obligation of Data Controller to notify the Directorate for Protection of Personal Data before performing wholly or partly automatic processing operation and an obligation of the Data Controller to submit data on any newly opened collection of personal data, as well as change of data from the existing personal data collections. The records from the Central Register kept by the Directorate are publicly accessible and they are published in the Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia.  The chapter 7 - Transfer of personal data to other countries, specifies that a transfer of personal data to another countries can be performed only if the third country provides an adequate level of protection of personal data. There is a precise enumeration of the circumstances assessed by the Directorate for protection of personal data before performing a transfer of personal data to a third country.  If the country where the data from the collection of personal data should be transferred does not provide an adequate degree of protection of personal data, the Directorate will not authorise the transfer. The Law specifies the cases where by exception a transfer of personal data to a third country is performed, if the other country to which the data should be transferred does not provide an adequate degree of protection.  The chapter 8 - Making personal data available to users, contains provisions which are regulating the substance related to making personal data available to users, as well as exchange of personal data between state bodies. It is established that the Data Controller can make personal data available on the basis of a written request submitted by the user, if the data are needed to perform activities within the legally established scope of competencies of the user. It provides a prohibition on providing personal data whose processing, i.e. use cannot be carried out in accordance with the provisions of this Law and if the purpose for requesting such personal data is in accordance with specific, clear and lawful purposes for which personal data is collected. The chapter 9 of the Law, dealing with the Establishment and responsibilities of the Directorate for Protection of Personal Data, defines the Directorate for Protection of Personal Data, as an independent supervisory authority, performing control over the legality of of processing of personal data. For more details see answer 24_B_03.  The chapter 10 - Penal Provisions contains provisions which prescribe misdemeanour sanctions in case of violation and inconsistent enforcement of provisions of this Law. For committed misdemeanours, fines as the only sanction for the perpetrators (natural and legal persons) are prescribed. Fines are prescribed within the scope established in the Law on Misdemeanours (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97 and 35/97). Chapter 11, Transitional and Final Provisions, lay down the timeframe for appointing a Director of the Directorate for Protection of Personal Data (six months), as well as a timeframe for the Directorate to adopt the secondary legislation provided for with this Law (six months). The natural and legal persons processing personal data must align their work within two years from adopting the secondary legislation. Besides the basic Law which governs personal data protection, this area is subject to regulation in a number of other laws.  The Law on Organisation and Operation of State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02) provides that state administrative bodies do not disclose data related to the national security, official and business secret, as well as personal data of citizens in accordance to the Law which governs protection of personal data of citizens. The constitutional guarantee of protection of personal data is also regulated by the Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04). Given the need for protection of the data subject, in Chapter 15, Crimes Against the Rights and Freedoms of Human Beings and Citizens, the criminal act “abuse of personal data” has been introduced. The legal essence of this criminal offence consists of a prescribed fine or prison sentence of up to one year for the perpetrator who, contrary to conditions established by law and without the consent of the citizen, collects,  processes or uses their personal data. The same fine is provided for the person who will penetrate into the computer information system of personal data with the intention to use the data for him/herself or another person in order to gain benefit or to cause harm to another person. The criminal offence abuse of personal data has an aggravated form if the mentioned criminal offence is committed by officials in carrying out their duty, where a prison sentence of three months to three years is provided. Taking into account the particular danger of the abovementioned crimes for the freedoms and rights of human beings and citizens, it is prescribed that the attempt for committing such a crime is also punishable. Legal persons can also be perpetrators of the primary form of this crime, consequently being punished with a fine. The criminal sanctions established in the Criminal Code can be pronounced to a perpetrator of the mentioned criminal offence under the conditions determined in the Criminal Code and on the basis of a legally executed criminal procedure in accordance with the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04). The Law on Voter’s List (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 42/02 and 35/04), determines the personal data contained in the voter’s list. The list contains the following data: the personal identification number of the citizens, their surname, the name of one of the parents, their name, gender, permanent address (municipality, area of residence, street, house number, entrance number and apartment number), date of registration and deletion and date and type of data amendment. The above personal data are protected in accordance with the Law on Personal Data Protection and they must not be used for any other purpose, except for exercising citizens’ voting right in accordance with the Law on Voter’s List. Any citizen may, within the period determined with this law, file a request for registering, amending or deleting data in the copies of the voter’s list provided for public inspection if they or any other citizen are not registered in it; if a person is registered who does not have the right to vote or does not reside in the area of the municipality, or a person who has passed away, and if the personal name and address of the person or the personal name and address of another person have been inaccurately entered. Copies of the voter’s list, with data related to the ordinal number, surname, name, gender, date of birth and address, are provided to registered political parties and to independent candidates.          Basic personal data on citizens is recorded in the Registry of Births, Marriages and of Deaths. In accordance with the Law on Personal Identification Records (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 08/95 and 38/02), registry books are kept, protected and used in accordance with law. The original copy, the certificate from a registry, as well as a transcript or a copy for entry in a registry, are issued upon request of the person to whom the data in those documents refer. The documents are also issued to a concerned party, i.e. a legal entity or body when there is legal interest established by law. The person to whom the data relates or another interested person, where there is direct legal interest established by law, have the right to inspection of registries or the documents and decisions upon which entries are made in the registries. The Law on Reporting Dwellings and Residence of Citizens (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/92, 12/93 and 43/00) establishes that the Ministry of the Interior provides protection from unauthorised access and use of the data contained in the records on the dwelling, change of home address and residence of the citizens. The personal data on asylum seekers, recognised refugees and persons under humanitarian protection, the data on their residence and the rights they enjoy in the Republic of Macedonia are contained in the Central Collection of Data, established, processed and used by the Ministry of the Interior (Asylum Section). The above collection of data is established, processed and used by the person handling the collection in accordance with the provisions of the Law on Personal Data Protection. In accordance with the Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 49/03), the data from the Central Collection of Data cannot be exchanged with the country of origin of the person to whom such data relates or with the country of origin of the members of their family. In order to execute the decision for expelling from the territory of the Republic of Macedonia a person whose asylum request has been irrevocably denied or whose right to asylum in the Republic of Macedonia has been terminated with an irrevocable decision, the Asylum Section may exchange the following data with the competent authorities of other countries:   The name and surname, date and place of birth, gender, citizenship, last residence and home address, data on the number of family members and on the documents issued by the country of origin; and   Fingerprints and a photograph;    The personal identification number of the citizen is a unique designation on the identification documents of the citizen. In accordance with the Law on Personal Identification Number (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 36/92), the Ministry of the Interior designates a personal identification number to the citizen according to the place of registration of the newborn child in the Registry of Births kept on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia. The Ministry of the Interior provides the keeping, use and protection of the data from unauthorised access in accordance with law.  Law enforcement officers, in accordance with the Code of Police Ethics (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 03/04), are obliged to adhere to the citizens’ right to privacy in accordance with the Constitution and the laws of the Republic of Macedonia. Collecting, keeping and using personal data by the police is performed in accordance with law and the ratified international agreements for protecting personal data, restrictively and in the extent necessary for carrying out legal duties. The police objectively inform the public of their activities, in accordance with the principles of confidentiality of data (observed for protecting the personal integrity of citizens, observing the principle of presumption of innocence, as well as for conducting a criminal procedure, etc.). Therefore,  professional procedures for relations with the media are established.  The Law on Classified Information (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 9/04) establishes the measures and activities for protecting classified information. The measures and activities for security of individuals i.e. issuing a security certificate, have a special place among the stated measures and activities. The satisfaction of the conditions for issuing a security certificate is established through a security audit carried out upon previous written consent of the person to whom a security certificate is to be issued. The data from the completed security questionnaire are used for the purposes of the audit.       The Law on State Statistics (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 54/97) regulates the protection of individual data (of natural or legal persons) collected and processed for statistical purposes. The existing law establishes the meaning of the expressions used and their protection. The individual data related to a legal or natural person, collected and processed for statistical purposes are confidential data and they can be used as separate data for statistical purposes only. Access to the above data may be provided for statistical purposes only and, by exception, for scientific purposes (without the identification data about the data subject). The quoted law underlines that individual data cannot be separately used to make any decisions concerning the person they relate to. When publishing statistical data or preparing them, upon the request of users, the data are published, i.e. prepared in a form preventing the identification of the subject of the data, unless the subject of the data has agreed to such publishing, i.e. providing. Data providers are notified of the protection of data. The measures and techniques for protecting individual data collected and processed for statistical purposes are established in a Rulebook on the Measures and Techniques on the Protection of Individual Data Collected for Statistical Purposes (SSO internal document), adopted by the Director of the State Statistical Office. A Commission for Protection of Data has been established within the above state administrative body in order to supervise the protection of data. In order to align the contents of the above law with European regulations, it is planned in the course of 2005 to approach the development of amendments and supplements to the contents of the Law on State Statistics.  The Law on State Statistics is aligned with:   Council Regulation (EC) No 322/97 of 17 February 1997: OJ L 052 22.02.1997;   The Convention for the Protection of Individuals with regard to Automatic Processing of Personal Data No. 108 of the Council of Europe of 28.01.1981;   Directive 95/46/EC of the European Parliament and of the Council of 24.10.1995 on the protection of individuals with regard to the processing of personal data and on the free movement of such data; and   Recommendation of the Council of Europe No. R (97) 18.   The Law on Single Registry of the Population in the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the SRM”, No. 46/90) provides for the introduction, keeping and contents of the single automated registry of the population in the Republic of Macedonia, the competent authority for keeping the registry, the protection of the data from the registry and the processing, publishing and use of the data from the registry.  The Law on Personal Identification Records of the Insured and Beneficiaries of Pension and Disability Insurance Rights (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 16/04) provides for special competencies of the Pension and Disability Insurance Fund and for protection of the data on the insured and beneficiaries of pension and disability insurance rights. The abovementioned Fund determines, with a general act, the technical and organisational measures for securing the data from the aforementioned personal identification records. The protection of the data contained in the records on the insured and beneficiaries of pension and disability insurance rights encompasses undertaking measures and activities for protecting the data from: unauthorised access, unauthorised processing , prevention of destruction, loss, modification, abuse and unauthorised use of the data. The Law on Keeping Labour Records (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 16/04), regulates that the data contained in the records established by this Law can be used for statistical purposes and for other official needs. Legally established data can also be used by individuals to whom the mentioned data relate in order to exercise their rights. The legal possibility has been established to exchange data among institutions and state bodies for the purpose of performing the legally established competencies of these entities. The Rulebook on Processing, Using and Protecting the Data in the Information System of the Employment Agency of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 35/03) closely regulates the method of processing, using and protecting the data in the information system of the Employment Agency of the Republic of Macedonia.          The Law on Social Care (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 50/97, 16/00, 17/03 and 65/04) provides an obligation for the social security institution and the employees to keep professional and official secrets. The Law protects the data and the facts found out during the conduct of the procedure and during the decision-making concerning the rights of beneficiaries of social security, of legal family protection, and on the competencies established by criminal regulations. The above obligation also relates to all the facts and data that may harm the reputation, dignity and interest of the citizen and their family.  The Law on Family (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 80/92, 09/96, 38/04 and 83/04 – consolidated text) establishes that the data on adoptions are an official secret. The Law on Health Care (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 38/91, 46/93, 55/95, 17/97 – consolidated text and 10/04) specifies that when providing healthcare, healthcare workers are obliged to take care of the beneficiaries subject to healthcare, to respect their dignity, to adhere to medical ethics and to keep the professional secret. The obligation to keep a professional secret refers, in addition to healthcare workers, to other workers in healthcare and other organisations who use medical records or in any way (in performing their tasks) come across data contained therein.  The Law on Keeping Healthcare Records (“Official Gazette of the SRM” Nos. 37/79, 18/88 and “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 15/95), adopted from a former republic regulation by Article 5 of the Constitutional Law on the Implementation of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia specifies that the data entered in the records established with this Law are kept as data of permanent value. In accordance with the Law on the Protection of the Population from Contagious Diseases (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 66/04), reporting AIDS and the HIV infection, as well as microbiological findings for Treponema pallidum, HIV, Neisseria gonorhoeae, congenital infections with the Rubella virus, Tohoplasma gondii and Chlamydia gondii is anonymous.         A Law on the Protection of Mental Health is under development in the Republic of Macedonia, and its provisions will be aligned with the provisions of the Law on the Personal Data Protection. According to the existing Law on Telecommunications (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 33/96, 17/98, 22/98 – consolidated text, 28/00, 04/02, 37/04), the holders, operators of telecommunication networks and means, as well as the providers of public telecommunication services are obliged to provide inviolability of message confidentiality within their technical abilities. The protection of the confidentiality of messages does not apply for messages for which a deviation from this obligation is provided with international agreements concluded, i.e. acceded by the Republic of Macedonia, and with the regulations of the Republic of Macedonia. The Law on Electronic Communications, which is being developed (soon it will be in parliamentary procedure), regulates the issue of ensuring data protection in the way and procedure established by Directive 2002/58/EC related to processing of personal data and protection of privacy in the field of electronic communications. The Draft Law contains a separate chapter on the protection of the secrecy and confidentiality of communications. This chapter will contain, inter alia, provisions regulating protective measures for providing networks and services, communication confidentiality, caller or connecting line identification, location information that are not traffic information, automatic call diverting etc.    The Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,  Nos. 03/02, 51/03, 85/03 and 40/04) provides for the obligation of the members of the Council of the National Bank and the employees of the National Bank to keep official and business secrets. This obligation binds these persons for five years following the end of their membership in the Council of the National Bank, i.e. the termination of their employment with the National Bank. The data that are an official and business secret may be provided only upon written request of the court. As an exception, in cases laid down by law, the National Bank delivers data to the Ministry of Finance, the Deposit Insurance Fund and the Directorate for Money Laundering Prevention, and such data present an official secret for these entities. The Banking Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 63/00, 103/00, 70/01, 37/02, 51/03, 85/03, 83/04) establishes the persons who may not reveal data and information established as a business secret of the bank by law, statute and other bank acts. The obligation to keep a business secret that persists after the termination of employment with the bank also relates to persons with special rights and responsibilities, bank employees and other persons with access to bank operations. The data that are a business secret of the bank, and that the bank is obliged to deliver to the National Bank and to other bodies and institutions in accordance with law, are an official secret. The data on savings deposits and on bank deposits of natural and legal entities, as well as data on the operations of natural and legal persons through accounts, are a business secret of the bank. The above data may be provided only in the following cases:   If the client provides written consent to reveal the data;   Upon written request or order of the competent court;   Upon written request of the national bank for the purpose of supervision, or another body authorised by law; and   If the data are provided to the Directorate for Money Laundering Prevention, in accordance with law.  In accordance with the Law on Securities (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 63/00, 103/00, 34/01, 04/02, 37/02, 31/03, 85/03 and 96/04), the Central Securities Depositary is established in order to determine and settle obligations on the basis of securities transactions and to keep a Registry of securities in the Republic of Macedonia.     The Central Securities Depositary, as a central database, contains electronic data on the issued securities, registering the rights arising from securities, all holders of those rights and the rights arising from securities that can be enjoyed by third persons. The right to obtain data about ownership is enjoyed by the owner of non-financial securities, the issuer of securities and legally authorised bodies and institutions if they need such data in a procedure they conduct within their authorisations or for the needs of their regular operation in accordance with law. The management and the employees of the Central Securities Depositary, as well as certified auditors, are obliged to keep the confidentiality of the data that they have known in carrying out their everyday work, unless they are obliged to provide such information in accordance with the quoted law or another law. The Rules of Order of the Central Securities Depositary establish an obligation for keeping the confidentiality of data up to five years following termination of the employment of the management and the employees in the Central Securities Depositary. The Law on Securities contains special provisions regulating operations with long-term securities with regard to confidential data delivered to the Securities and Exchange Commission and defining the notion of internal information, and it also lists the persons subject to the obligation to keep internal information and their obligations for keeping such information.  In accordance with the Law on Supervision of Insurance (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 27/02 and 98/02), insurance companies are obliged to treat as confidential all the data about the insured and/or other insurance beneficiaries that they have acquired in the course of performing insurance operations. The members of the bodies of insurance companies, their shareholders, employees and other persons, who in the course of their work have access to confidential data, may not transfer them to third parties or allow third parties to use them. The obligation to keep confidential data does not apply in the following cases: 1.  If the data are necessary to establish facts in criminal procedures or other court procedure and if the competent court has filed a written request to provide data; 2.  In cases provided for by the law on prevention of laundering money and other proceeds from crime (“Official Gazette of The Republic of Macedonia”, no. 46/04); 3.  If the data are necessary to establish the legal relations between an insurance company and a policy holder and/or another insurance beneficiary in performing legal procedures; 4.  If the data are necessary to perform coercive procedures on the real property of a policy holder or another insurance beneficiary and if the competent court has filed a written request to provide data; 5.  If the data are collected by the Ministry of Finance or another competent supervision body for the purpose of conducting supervision within the established responsibilities; 6.  If the data are requested by a tax authority with regard to conducting procedures within its competence; 7.  In cases provided by a law regulating mandatory insurance; In accordance with the above Law, the Ministry of Finance or another competent supervision authority, tax authorities and courts, use policy holders database, incurred damage database and the database for appraising insurance coverage and degree of damage, for the provided purposes only. Insurance companies and the State Insurance Bureau are obliged to collect, process, use and deliver personal data necessary for concluding insurance contracts, in accordance with the Law on Personal Data Protection and the special regulations with regard to the insurance database. Insurance companies and the State Insurance Bureau are entitled to establish and maintain the following databases: 1.  Policy holders database; 2.  Incurred damage database; 3.  A database for appraising insurance coverage and the degree of damage; The following personal data are collected for policy holders databases: 1.  The name and surname, date and place of birth, permanent or temporary home address of the policy holder; 2.  The company name of the insurance company, policy number, insurance duration, insured event and insurance coverage; The following personal data are collected for incurred damage database: 1.  The name and surname, date and place of birth, permanent or temporary home address and nationality of the persons involved in the damage incurred, as well as witness data; 2.  The crimes and misdemeanours related to the damage incurred; 3.  The type of harmful event; 4.  The place, time and course of occurrence of the damage; 5.  Description of the damage from the harmful event; The following personal data are collected for the database for appraisal of insurance coverage and extent of damage: 1.  The name and surname, date and place of birth, permanent or temporary home address of the policy holder that insurance coverage concerns, as well as the same data about the indemnity claimant; 2.  The temporary injuries and health condition, type of physical injury, duration of treatment and consequences for both the policy holder and the damage compensation applicant; 3.  The income generated by the policy holder and the indemnity claimant; 4.  Retirement (old-age or disability), re-qualification and extent of the disability of the policy holder and the indemnity claimant; 5.  The costs for medical treatment, medical preparations and orthopaedic aids for the policy holder and the indemnity claimant; The data in the policy holders database are kept for ten years after the expiry of the insurance contract or, in the event of damage, ten years after closing the case. The data in the database for incurred damage and appraisal of insurance coverage and extent of damage will be kept for ten years after closing the case of incurred damage. In accordance with the Law on Financial Police (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/02), the financial police officer is obliged to keep a state, official and business secret they have encountered in the course of performing the work within their competence. Misdemeanour sanction is provided for a person who does not keep a state, official or business secret they encountered in the course of performing their competencies.  Independent Data Protection Supervisory Authority The Law on Personal Data Protection entails a separate chapter, Establishment and Duties of the Directorate for Protection of Personal Data. The proposed legal provisions provide for the establishment of the Directorate as an independent state authority with legal entity capacity for the purpose of supervising the legality of the undertaken activities in processing personal data and their protection. The Directorate is managed by a director appointed and dismissed by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia, upon proposal of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, for a five-year term with the right to re-appointment, but no more than twice. The director and deputy director of the Directorate are accountable for their work and the work of the Directorate to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia.  A person satisfying the following conditions may be appointed a director: he/she must be a citizen of the Republic of Macedonia, an eminent lawyer, and must not have been subject to a security measure for prohibition of performing a profession, activity or duty. The director’s term of office may be terminated by dismissal or in the event of death. The director is dismissed if they request that themselves, if they are sentenced for a crime to an unconditional prison sentence of at least six months and for non-professional, partial and unconscientious operation.   The director’s function cannot be combined with other public functions or professions. The director is independent and autonomous in carrying out their function. The director files to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia an annual report on the work of the Directorate and, if necessary, upon request of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia, files additional reports. The annual report on the work of the Directorate is published in the Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia. The Law also regulates the duty for the director and the employees of the Directorate to keep the data they have come across in their work as an official secret, both during their term of office, i.e. employment in the Directorate, as well as afterwards.  The Directorate has the following competencies: it evaluates the legality of the processing of personal data; it publishes the principles of processing personal data and ensures their adherence by the Data Controllers; it does research and has access to collections of personal data compiled by the data controller according to types of subjects and objectives; it controls the operations for processing of personal data applied by the Data Controllers; it collects data necessary for its proper work; it keeps a Central Registry for Collections of Personal Data; it keeps records for transfers of personal data to other countries; it receives reports from or complaints concerning the processing of personal data by a Data Controller; it issues prohibitions on further processing of personal data by the Data Controller, it issues an opinion for secondary legislation acts to Data Controllers and carries out other work provided for by law. In addition to the above competencies, upon a report filed by a Data Controller prior to approaching operations for processing of personal data, the Directorate provides an opinion whether certain operations for processing personal data present a special risk to the freedoms and rights of the data subject. In the event of suspicion of existence of a special risk to the freedoms and rights of the data subject, the Data Controller is obliged to request the opinion of the Directorate.    For the purpose of carrying out the work within the competence of the Directorate regularly and efficiently, the director and the employees of the Directorate are authorised to: enter any premises where a registered system of a collection of personal data is processed, after presenting an appropriate individual authorisation and a document for official identification, and inspect the collections of personal data; seek written or oral explanation and call and examine persons with regard to the collection of personal data investigated; to seek presentation of the paperwork and any other data with regard to the subject of control, test the equipment used for processing the personal data and the equipment where the collections of personal data are kept, and order the preparation of an expert analysis and an opinion for the work of the Data Controller.  If the control establishes injuries to the provisions of this Law in processing personal data, the Data Controller is obliged, at latest within 30 days from the day of establishment of the injury, to align their work with the provisions of this Law, and, in particular, to remedy the reasons that brought about such injuries, to complete, update, correct, reveal or keep the confidentiality of the personal data; to adopt additional measures of protection for the collections of personal data; to stop the transfer of personal data to other countries; to secure the data or their transfer to other subjects or to erase the personal data. An administrative dispute can be initiated against the decision of the director.  The grounds for the implementation of the new law is the establishment of the aforementioned independent authority within six months from its entry into force.  